Authors
David Wilcock
Number of Reviews
130

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
THE TRUMAN SHOW
(PARAMOUNT PICTURES)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 42 MINUTES
STARRING JIM CARREY AND ED HARRIS
DIRECTED BY PETER WEIR
After a long wait, Jim Carrey's dramatic debut finally makes it to the big
screen. In case you've been asleep for the last few months, the plot centres
on Truman Burbank (Carrey) who leads an seemingly idyllic life in the
beautiful town of Seahaven. His life seems so perfect, however, because it's
controlled by Christoff (Harris) creator of The Truman Show, the program
Burbank is unwittingly the hero of. That's right, Burbank's life is being
broadcast live to the American public, and Seahaven and all it's inhabitants
are inclosed in a massive sound stage. The film takes the Jerry Springer
format one step too far...
With an idea so different, it would be easy for the director and
screenwriter to dumb it down and appeal to the lowest common denominator.
Luckily, the film remains sensible enough to appeal to all ages, yet never
seems to be a dumb Carrey movie. Talking of Carrey, he's perfect in this
movie, enjoying the best role in his career. His character is a re-inforced
Stanley Ipkiss from The Mask (1994) and is completely suited to Carrey's
persona. He occasionally falls into Ace Ventura mode, shrieking and being
silly, but generally the audience is watching subdued Carrey. He's not
completely dramatic like the film promises, however. Ed Harris brings an
extreme intensity to Christoff, the megalomaniac creator of the show. Quiet
and well spoken, he burns an image into the viewer. Unfortunately, he's
barely in the film, and for the first hour dosen't appear at all! Also
disappointing is Natascha McElhone's character Sylvia. She plays the role
well, but her character is sadly underwritten and is pushed to the sidelines
just when the audience is used to her. The supporting cast is excellent, and
the town of Seahaven looks delightfully perfect, so perfect it's creepy. The
Philip Glass soundtrack is also superb, and is used to great effect during
the film.
Peter Weir keeps the film going, clearly having fun. The film is far more
upbeat than his  previous films Dead Poets Society and Green Card. Although
it is slightly slow to begin with, about half an hour into film the pace
really picks up, and when Christoff is introduced fully the film is on a
roll. Sadly, though, the film is practically over when the film is in full
steam. Also, concerning the ending, it is slightly too ambiguous, which was
disappointing. The screenwriter, Andrew Niccol, who bought us Gattaca (1997)
delivers an entertaining script, and manages to keep the plot in trim. While
Christoff's plans to keep Truman in do get increasingly silly, they never go
over the line, which would have been easy for Niccol to do. Also, there's
some funny gags involving product placement and the people who watch the
show.
Overall, The Truman Show is excellent entertainment. Certainly different
from the usual crap Hollywood produces, it should be viewed by everyone. It
offers something to every member of the audience, and you would almost
certainly not come out disappointed.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Matrix, The (1999)
Starring Keanu Reeves, Laurence Fishburne and Carrie-Anne Moss
Directed By Andy and Larry Wachowski
Running Time: 2 hours 16 minutes (U.K cut)
After the minor thriller Bound, the Wachowski brothers follow up their
directing debut with this nifty piece of sci-fi action. Keanu Reeves plays
Thomas, a lowly worker who works for a software firm. He is soon contacted,
however, by Morpheus (Fishburne) who wishes to talk to Thomas about the
'matrix.' Thomas agrees, and Morpheus tells Tom the unthinkable: Tom's
'world' is created by computer, and the entire human race appear to be
plugged in to this fake existence. Morpheus identifies Thomas as 'Neo,' the
messiah who can save the human race from the matrix. Yes, Keanu is indeed
Jesus. The film then follows Neo, Morpheus and the rest of the rebel clan as
they try and destroy the matrix machine, while trying to avoid the sunglass
clad 'Agents' who wish to destroy them.
The plot is cliched, the acting occasionally off, and the dialogue not so
hot, but The Matrix is a surprisingly well made, and even intelligent movie.
Reeves, it appears, is back on track after the hiatus after Speed. Although
lacking in some areas, The Matrix delivers where it should: sci-fi hokum
with some violence chucked in to boot. The action is a real stand out, using
'flo-mo,' a system where the action goes into slo-mo, while still 'panning'
around the actors. It's an awesome sight, but sadly not used much until the
end of the movie. Also, the movie seems to spend a helluva long time
explaining what the Matrix actually is, which gets tiresome. Still, the kung
fu and gunfight sequences that punctuate the movie are fast paced and well
done, and are good entertainment.
The actors also play a part in providing some fun. Although Reeves still has
little or no acting talent, he is curiously suited to the role he is given
here. His 'where the hell am I?' look actually fits around his confused
character. I'm sure this was all completely unintentional on Reeves behalf,
but it works anyway. Fishburne, usually confined 'Samuel L. Jackson Jnr.'
roles, holds his own here, and is the highlight of the film. Unfortunately,
his character is curiously underwritten, and is given little to do at the
end of the film. Although he is given a lot of dialogue, much of it is 'plot
forwarding' and not much development is given to the character itself, which
is a shame. Maybe in the inevitable sequels we'll see more of him.
Carrie-Anne Moss provides eye candy as the attractive but empty Trinity, and
Hugo Weaving is evil enough as the relentless Agent Smith.
Much of the stuff contained in The Matrix has been seen in many other films,
but not with this much style or energy. The special effects actually help
the film, with some nice scenes of the Matrix itself (although it still
looks like one large computer graphic.) The film has a gritty, Blade Runner
feel that adds to the disturbing atmosphere. The gun battles are well
staged, and there's enough twists and turns in the plot to hold the viewers
attention.
In summary, The Matrix, while not making any great leaps in screenwriting or
acting, is a well crafted and directed thriller. Don't go in expecting non
stop action, however, as you'll be disappointed. Only the first and last 15
minutes contain 'pure' action. The rest of the movie is a taut, sometimes
slackly plotted (the movie is overlong) that provides enough interest and
laughs (sometime unintentional) to be above average sci-fi hokum. Star Wars
will have to go a long way to beat this, especially for the adult crowd. The
epitome of hip sci-fi.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Starring Jeff Goldblum, Julianne Moore and Pete Posthewilate 
A Universal Picture
So we finally get the long anticipated sequel to Jurrasic
Park. And it's better than the orinigal. It's far more
suspenseful, darker and scarier than the first one, and also
has some very good set pieces. But, of course, the plot and
writing is not really up to par. But the directing is
excellent.
The film starts with a horrifying incident with a young girl,
and then Sir Richard Attenbourough saying that there is a
second island. Goldblum and his girlfriend, plus another
guy and a photgrapher go over, to see how it's going.
Goldblums daughter smuggles onto the boat which is
taking them, so she ends up there aswell. 
At the island, after the oohing and aahing at the dinosaurs,
they get down to buisness. But then, evil agents from
InGen come to the island, led by Pete, who want to
capture the dinosaurs and take them back to a theme park
in San Diego (which Hammond started but never finished)
So Goldblum and Co fight to save the dinos. 
There are some incredible set pieces in the film. One,
involving a trailer hanging over a cliff, is way too long, but
is directed so well by Speilberg, that you have no choice
but to enjoy it. Also, the Raptor scene in the long grass is a
excellent piece of filmaking. To be honest, many of the
scenes are better than the ones in Jurrasic Park. Sure, the
plot has wholes big enough for a T-Rex to walk through,
but it IS great fun (much like Batman and Robin) If you
liked the original, you're going to love this. Highly
recommended 

Title
Review for Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom (1984)
Running Time: 118 minutes (1 hour 58 minutes)
 Starring Harrison Ford, Kate Capshaw and Ke Huy Quan
 Directed By Steven Spielberg
 OSCAR(R) Nominations: Best Music, Visual Effects (Won)
Steven Spielbergs headache inducing, if not pariculary exciting,
second Indiana Jones adventure. A prequel to Raiders of the
Lost Ark (1981), this film sees intrepid archaeologist/adventurer
Indiana Jones (Ford) plunged into a dark world of child slaves,
thugees and dark rituals. It's up to Jones, and his child friend Short
Round (Quan) and singer Willie Scott (Capshaw), to save the
kids, and stop the thugees from finding two diamonds that could
give them a lot of power.
Temple of Doom starts well enough with a well directed
performance of 'Anything Goes', performed by Willie. We then
have one of the greatest opening sequences ever when Jones
bargains with two Chinese over a diamond. Naturally, the
bargaining goes wrong, and the sequence turns into a slapstick
routine with Jones trying to find the diamond which is being kicked
all around a restaurant. It's a very well directed scene, and features
even more chaos than Speilbergs own 1941 (1979) jitterbug
scene. After this, there's an exciting plane crash. But after the plane
crash, the film starts to go downhill when Indy is set on his quest.
The main problem with the film is that it tries to out do Raiders of
the Lost Ark on every level. The film features more 'gross out'
gags, more stunts, more explosions and more gory deaths, but
strangely it all seems 'dead.' It all seems to be in there just for the
hell of it. Unlike Raiders, where all the big chases and stunts were
exciting, Temple of Doom piles on so many deaths, explosions
etc. it just cancels itself out. The film is trying so hard to make the
audience excited, it just falls flat on it's face.
Also, the heroine in this picture is pathetic. She just shouts and
screams, and points out the obvious. She seems to just ask 'What
is it?' questions, so Indy can explain to her, but mainly to the
audience, what is going on in the film. From the start, Capshaw is
terrible, just shouting and screaming and being really annoying. If I
were Indy, I would of tried to dump her as quickly as possible.
Had the screenwriters wrote her part better, her whining and
screaming could of been funny. However, like everything else in
this film, she is hugely exgrarated, and almost seems pointless in
this film. The child sidekick, though, is nowhere near as annoying,
and is good fun. He has some good lines, and even gets the chance
to kick some thugee butt. Ford, as usual, is fun, although he was
better in Raiders, and even Indiana Jones and the Last
Crusade (1989).
Spielberg's direction, however, is too frantic. The film belts along,
and never lets the audience catch up. He never gives the audience
a chance to enjoy a stunt, because the picture moves along too fast
to let the audience enjoy it. It's a shame, because there are some
good stunt scenes in there, including a amazing mine cart
sequence.  It's just on the first viewing, the audience will never
catch up on them. Also, the script is weak. It's mainly just
references to the first film (even though this is a prequel) and the
dialogue between Indy and Willie is dud. The script only really
works with scenes between Indy and Shorty, but they work more
on the strength of the actors than the script. Also, the film is a bit
too violent for young kids, the target audience. If your child can
stand watching hearts ripped out and men crushed by rock
crushers, they may enjoy this film.
It's not all that bad, though. Some of the action scenes are good,
and the film has a great sense of humor. Some of the scenes made
me laugh out loud. But, overall, it just isn't much fun. It's too dark,
too eager to excite us, and Indy has hardly any character in this
film. Temple of Doom, then, is disappointing, and the weakest of
the Indiana Jones trilogy.

Title
Review for Enemy of the State (1998)
Will Smith stars in this amiable action movie directed by Top Guns Tony
Scott. Smith is Robert Clayton Dean, who manages to get possession of a tape
showing the murder of a congressman. The murderer (Jon Voight) wants this
tape back, and Will's life is put on the line as he tries to work out why
the hell everyone is trying to kill him. Helping him is 'Brill' an ex-agent
played by Gene Hackman.
Enemy of the State provides enough thrills to keep the popcorn punters
happy, although it might disappoint all the members of the audience who
prefer to have their stories with a little bit more meat. While the
direction is certainly flash, and the chases good fun, some the plot twists
are silly, and the technology used seems a little to advanced for it's own
good (even entering Blade Runner territory.) Still, director Tony Scott
keeps the thrills coming, and the film is directed and paced like some hyper
music video (much like Top Gun) Will Smith is more than adept at playing the
action hero, delivering his lines with a cocky ease. Hackman does a great
character role, even if it does amount to shouting a lot. Jon Voight is a
suitably cool bad guy, and Lisa Bonet is fine as Smiths wife.
The story, by David Marconi, is a little predictable, but it's a good
premise to hang a action movie on. It might take a lot of liberties from The
Conversation, including one scene which is a big homage, but this doesn't
really attract any of the excitement away from the film. It certainly won't
win any awards for originality, though. While no smart statements are
delivered, the script is certainly above average in action movie terms.
While Enemy of the State is, for the most part, good, it sadly suffers from
being 30 minutes too long. The film looks like it's going to end on a
perfect conclusion, but then it just keeps on going. This movie could easily
have been wrapped up much quicker, but it's a bit too involved in it's own
story, and it soon has to wrap up a lot of lose ends, which is a shame.
Still, the pumping music, fast cuts and fun acting detract slightly from
this.
In the end, Enemy of the State is a 'higher class' of action movie, and
while it could have been shorter, it's an entertaining and sometimes clever
look at the world of espionage, and is worth a look.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Rush Hour (1998)
A standard buddy movie with the added delight of Jackie Chan. The little guy
from Asia is also dynamite on screen, and that's no exception in this
western interpretation of a Chan film. The trailer explains this one's
concept the best; "when the fastest hands in the east meets the biggest
mouth in the west." The biggest mouth in the west happens to be new
sensation Chris Tucker, fresh from The Fifth Element. Chan and Tucker play
Detectives Lee and James Carter, who are both on the case of finding a young
Asian girl who has been kidnapped. The standard buddy movie stuff happens:
big explosions, 'witty' one liners, and a silly plot. Rush Hour is more
amiable than most buddy films, however, due to the chemistry between the two
leads, and Chans outrageously fast action sequences.
This is definitely Chans film, and he lights the screen every time he
appears. His action scenes are much funnier and faster than anything Arnie
or Stallone has done, and they also rely much less on guns. His English is
also very good, and away from action he's still likeable and delivers a
rounded performance. Tucker is more unpredictable, he's a more immature
Eddie Murphy. He's high pitch whine could grate, and he doesn't get the
lines he deserves, but he could be worse. Still, something clicked with
American audiences, as this film was one of the sleeper hits of 1998. The
supporting cast are the usual stereotypical police, and the 'love interest'
is the amusing Elizabeth Pena. If you're an action freak, don't worry: the
film doesn't even attempt to provide any character development (except the
standard scene where the mismatched cops 'bond.') Tom Wilkinson makes an
unexpected appearance fresh from The Full Monty, and an embarrassed looking
Chris Penn also pops up (probably as a favour to someone.)
There's some reasonable action, and some impressive explosions which make
Rush Hour all the more enjoyable, if somewhat predictable. The soundtrack is
good, featuring the usual Def Jam tunes to a funny sequence where Chan puts
Beach Boys on the radio. ("Don't ever touch a black mans radio" Tucker
retorts.) The writers, Ross LaManna and Jim Kouf, have churned off an
average script, but it is somewhat likeable. There's nothing here that
hasn't been seen before, however. Director Brett Ratner also handles things
pretty well, but again it's somewhat average.
Thankfully, Rush Hour, like it's title, never lags, due to Chans quirky
charm and Tuckers "Eddie Murphy" shtick. The plot may be middle of the road,
the character development non existent, and the film does seem to have
nowhere to go about three quarters into the film, but there's nothing
fundamentally flawed with the movie. Jackie Chan fans should certainly take
a look: for everyone else, Rush Hour is an entertaining waste of 97 minutes.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Jackal, The (1997)
Running Time: 124 minutes (2 hours 4 minutes)
Starring Bruce Willis and Richard Gere
Directed by Michael Caton-Jones
A remake of The Day of the Jackal (1973), Michael Caton-Jones (Rob Roy,
1995) violent, though occasionally entertaining film is pretty average.
Bruce Willis plays an assasin simply known as The Jackal. His latest job is
to kill an important member of the U.S.A government, and F.B.I agent Cater
Preston (Sidney Poitier) and an ex-terrorist Declan Mulqueen (Gere) try to
stop him, helped by a russion major Valentina Koslova (played well by Diane
Verona) It's a simple cat and mouse chase, featuring lots of 'toys for the
boys' (i.e a very big cannon, loads of guns) and a few twists along the way.
Although the film is fun for the first 20 minutes, with Willis putting on a
variety of disguises, much like Val Kilmer in The Saint (1996) but when
Gere is introduced into the film, it goes rapidly downhill. Quite frankly,
it's Gere who ruins the whole picture. His Irish accent is terribly
unconvincing, and his character dull, and not intresting at all. In fact,
the audience will probably warm more to The Jackal, who is supposed to be
the bad guy! Willis is great fun at being evil, seemingly having a good
time in the film. His character is just not evil enough, though, although I
doubt Willis could ever pull off pure evil, he's got a 'good guy' image
attached to him. If someone like Christopher Walken (Batman Returns, 1992)
or Al Pacino (The Devils Advocate, 1997) was playing him, I have a feeling
the Jackal character would have had that extra edge.
Poitier is pretty much on auto-pilot as the F.B.I agent, with a pretty much
average performance. There's nothing outstanding with his performance, yet
there's nothing really bad with it either. However, Verona is fun as a
russian major, with a good accent, and also some excellent acting. She
deserves to be in a film better than this, as she is pretty much wasted
here (like Charlzie Theron in The Devils Advocate, 1997) She defintely has
the best performance in the film. 
Michael Caton-Jones direction is average, although some scenes do have some
tension, such as a tense situation featuring the Jackal and Valentina
inside a house. But, like most of the cast, he seems to be on autopilot,
directing most of the scenes in a safe fashion. He dosen't really attempt
to pull off any tricks, he just directs the action. And that's the problem
with the whole film, really. It plays it terrible safe. It dosen't attempt
to try anything new, yet it dosen't really do anything wrong. This is stuck
right in the middle of 'average' With only Verona, and to a certain extent,
Willis having fun, The Jackal is actually less fun than it could of been. 
The music is quite good, however, usually re-inforcing what is on screen.
The effects are O.K also, including a quite good scene in a subway tunnel.
But, generally, The Jackal is one of the most average films I've seen. I
can't heavely fault it, yet I can't really commend it either. Resonably
entertaining, average Hollywood fare.

Title
Review for Dark City (1998)
The director of The Crow (1994) returns with this happy epic, set in a
world where the sun is always shining and everyone is cheerful. Only
kidding. As you could guess by the title, Dark City is a dark,
depressive, but somewhat entertaining picture. Set sometime in the
future, the film begins when we see John Murdoch (Sewell) wake up with
no memory. He can't remember his wife Emma (Connely) or the murders
that he has been framed for. And when he encounters strange, tall
people wearing silly hats trying to kill him (called 'The Strangers'),
he tries to get answers. With the help of Dr. Scheriber (Sutherland)
he tries to work out what the hell is going on. Hot on his tail on
this time is world weary cop Inspector Frank Bumstead (Hurt.)
Despite the dark setting, and the depressive mood the picture has,
Dark City is entertaining. The first thing that makes the film fun is
the cast. Director Alex Proyas has managed to assemble a pretty good
cast for what is essentially a very silly sci-fi movie. Rufus Sewell
does a good job looking confused, and also does the action scenes all
right aswell. Sutherland appears to be having fun as the doctor, even
if he is overacting just a little.  His delivery of his lines really
started to annoy me, though. (He pauses every two words.) More
worringly, he's looking more like his father every day. Connelly fine
in her role, although it dosen't require much. Her singing voice, by
the way, is Anita Kelsey, so don't expect any Connelly hits in the
chart's any time soon. William Hurt is not bad, even though he dosen't
really appear to be trying. Also popping up is Ian Richardson and
Richard O'Brian as two of The Strangers. Both are good english actors,
and watching them dress up in the most stupid costumes, blurting out
lines which a B movie screenwriter would be proud of is actually quite
amusing (if you're British, that is.) Then again, O'Brien dressed up
stupid in The Rocky Horror Picture Show (1975) so looking silly is no
stranger to him.
Like The Crow, the film is directed like a music video with a large
budget.  Proyas uses fast cuts, quick zooms and a dance soundtrack to
great effect, as they manage (along with the acting) to drown out the
poor dialogue (written by Lem Dobbs, David S. Goyer and Proyas
himself.) The fast paced directing helps the movie bound along. The
dialogue just slows it down. It's clumsy, stupid, and in the end, just
boring.
The best thing about Dark City, however, is the look of the film. The
city is impressive, it's look the place The Crow (and Deckard from
Bladerunner, 1982) would live. The special effects are also
impressive, especially the ones in the overblown finale. Dark City is
a definite case of style of content. If you get bored of the movie,
just sit back and enjoy the great scenery, the great directing, and
the soundtrack. This things alone probably make Dark City worth
watching. It may not be the best film of the year, but Dark City is
worth watching, and is ultimately just good fun.  
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Mouse Hunt (1997)
(DREAMWORKS SKG)
RUNNING TIME: 99 MINUTES (1 HOUR 39 MINUTES)
STARRING NATHAN LANE AND LEE EVANS
DIRECTED BY GORE VERBINSKI
After the mediocre The Peacemaker (1997) and the interesting if dull Amistad
(1997) Dreamworks tries again to have a hit with this children's movie. They
haven't got a hit on their hands, but Mouse Hunt is entertaining enough to
keep the kids happy. Nathan Lane and Lee Evans play brothers Ernie and Lars
Smuntz, who inherit a string factory, and a very spooky old house, from
father Rudolph (William Hickey.) They discover that the house is built by a
famous architect, and could receive $10 million if they manage to sell it.
However, one thing stands between vast wealth: a tiny mouse. But the chaos
it causes is unbelievable, and the film centres around the two brothers
trying desperately to get rid of the furry pest.
What Dreamworks have churned out is standard slapstick fare, although much
more visually pleasing and darker than most 'Home Alone' type movies. The
house looks really spooky, and really cool. The special effects are also
good, with the mouse looking pretty realistic in the CGI shots. Also, the
wide spread destruction is done well by CGI, and there's a hilarious
animatronic cat, called 'Catzilla' who really is a terrifying beast (almost
too scary for the child sitting next to me in the theater.) The sets are
excellent, with some great art direction, and good cinematography by Phedon
Papamichael. The house and effects, though, were too intense for some
children in the theater (not a good sign for a 'kiddies' film) although most
of them could handle it.
Complementing the comic effects perfectly are Lane and Evans, doing a grand
job working with the effects. Lane is good as the straight man, delivering
lines with perfect timing ("It's Hitler with a tail", he tells Evans on why
they should kill this mouse.) Also, Evans (a popular british comic) is
perfect with physical humour (the filmmakers were probably looking for a
cheap Jim Carrey-a like), and the scene where his clothes get caught in the
string factory machinery is slapstick genius. Christopher Walken makes an
appearance as a near psychotic bug exterminator, and is good fun. The
director, Gore Verbinski, graduating from commercials, fills the screen with
superb visual, and handles the slapstick really well. (The funeral at the
start is brilliant slapstick.)
But, beneath all the comedy, this is one dark movie. There is hardly any
light, it's almost continually raining, the house is spectacularly
forbidding, and some of the scenes (a man choking, then dying, on a
cockroach, the aforementioned Catzilla scene) could be a bit much for
children. Also, some of the jokes fall flat, and it even resorts to having
Lane and Evans just hit each other with frying pans. There are some standout
scenes (a chase inside a piano is genius), but generally, the visual are
aimed for adults, while the jokes are aimed for children. And there are
definitely not enough jokes for adults (unlike recent Disney films, which
try too hard to appeal to adults now-a-days.)
In the end, though, Mouse Hunt is enjoyable enough for kids, and should have
them laughing. Adults, though, should just sit back and enjoy the scenery.
Entertaining, but flawed and shallow.
OVERALL RATING=**1/2 OUT OF *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
After the success of Speed (1994), the Keanu Reeves
vehicle, at the box office, it was obvious that there wuold
be a sequel. Set on a boat instead of a bus, it's about
Patric and Bullock trying to foil a mad bomber played by
Daefoe. Sadly, it is complete and utter rubbish. In fact, I
was almost suprised by it. I didn't honestly reliase that
action movies get much dumber, or boring than this. From
the totally unnessacary car chase at the start, to the
horrible, no thrills at all finale, it was just plain
rubbish.
Firstly, I'll have to say it's the performances of the good
guys, Patric and Bullock. The sad thing about Patric's
performance is that he's taking the whole thing seriously.
He is really trying to ACT through the whole movie, and
it's just not possible to do. So, he just comes across as
really dull, not a big, larger than life character who does
everything in a jokey type of way (e.g Bruce Willis or
Arnie) Bullock has no point in this film, except to say how
she wish this wasn't happening, and trying to calm people
down. The only person who knows this film is naff is
Daefoe, who gives us a fantastically enjoyable
performance as the mad man on the ship, and must have
one of the best psycho laughs I have ever heard. Sadly
though, he hardly has any screen time, but he really picks
the film up when he does. The supporting characters do a
good job at looking scared, but you don't feel anything for
them, unlike the passengers in Speed. 
Another annoying element is the directing. De Bont seems
to think that high action involves the camera jerking
around all over the place. I've seen the camera stay still for
longer in episodes of NYPD Blue. I don't remeber this
being used in Speed or Twister (1996) or any of the films
he did as Director of Photography. Perhaps he was just
trying to make us sea sick, like the people on the boat.
Anyway, instead of reinforcing the action, it just drowns it
out. You're so busy trying to catch up with what's
happening, you just don't enjoy it anymore. It may LOOK
exciting, but you won't feel excitied. 
Other things help the film go downhill. There's a pointless
sub plot involving a little girl trapped in a lift.  There's no
element of danger in the film, like in Speed, where the bus
had to stay over 50 m.p.h, even if that meant crashing
through cars, or leaping over bridges. In Speed 2, there's
not really much to crash through in the middle of the
ocean, except at the end where the boat is heading straight
for a town, but it can't slow down. Even this it gets wrong,
with no idea on how to direct the boat crashing through.
Thankfully, however, we've been spared the swearing of
the original, so younger kids (which was Speed's major
audience) can watch it. In fact, any child under 12 yrs will
probably enjoy this the most. 
Overall, this film is a major disappointment. Speed was a
hugely enjoyable film, with a good villian and hero, lots of
suspense, danger and good supporting characters. Speed 2
has a good villian with too little screen time, and..that's it.
Even the music, usually so easy to do in action movies, is
awful. There's hardly any comedy (very much needed in
an action film) and hardly any danger or suspense. Give
this film a miss. 
Overall Rating=* 1/2 out of ***** (Just saved from * by
Daefoe performance) 

Title
Review for Last Days of Disco, The (1998)
An entertaining 2 hours awaits the audience in this film set in the early
80's. Sevigny and Beckinsale play disco chicks Alice and Charlotte, who are
on the lookout for love. Alice is mousy, shy, intellectual, Charlotte is
bitchy, out-going and fun. We join their adventures as they go through a
variety of adventures, and men, all to the background of the local disco.
Whit Stillman has both written and directed an interesting and believable
story. Alice and Charlotte are both well written characters, and the
actresses who play them aren't bad aswell. Sevigny delivers an honest
performance, and makes the audience feel for her character. Beckinsale plays
extreme bitch personified, yet her character never becomes completely
unlikeable. The huge supporting cast also play a part in making sure this
movie is thoroughly entertaining. The dialogue is sharp and well written,
with many funny set pieces. For example, there's a great discussion about
Lady & The Tramp by the main characters. The disco tunes playing in the
background also make sure that this admittedly long film is good fun.
The direction is good, bringing out the drama and comedy in the scenes. But
their are slight flaws with the movie. Firstly, although it is supposedly
set in the 80's, the characters are very, very 90's. The way they dress and
act have a very 90's feel to them. Although the male hairstyles look
slightly 80's, frankly the 80's atmosphere just wasn't conveyed, which is a
shame. Also, as mentioned above, the film is too long, and some parts do
lag. The charm of the characters do help these moments, but generally the
editing could of been a bit tighter. The plot also side-tracks into a silly
cocaine dealing bust, which seemed out of place in this movie. Finally,
their are almost too many characters in the film, and despite the running
time, the film never really spends enough time on them. Some of the
characters are very slight, which is a shame. The conclusion, while funny,
is also surprisingly weak, and certainly not strong enough.
But despite these qualms, The Last Days of Disco is a funny, warm movie,
which is certainly worth seeing, and is a fitting homage to the disco era of
the 80's. Worth a look.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Beetlejuice (1988)
BEETLEJUICE (1988)
STARRING MICHAEL KEATON, GEENA DAVIS AND ALEC BALDWIN
DIRECTED BY TIM BURTON
RATED (15) IN THE UK, (PG) IN USA
A WARNER BROTHERS (THE GEFFEN COMPANY) RELEASE
Tim Burtons comedy-horror classic. A happy couple (Davis and Baldwin) while
shopping in a country town, happen to die, from their car falling off a
bridge. They comes back to haunt their house, yet no one can see them,  Now
that there house is empty, there estate agent (who's been trying to get
them to sell) uses this oppurtunity to sell the house off. However, the new
family have different ideas. While the husband (Jeffery Jones) and the
daughter (Winona Ryder, who was 15!) like it as it is, the wife (Catherine
O'Hara) and her designer want it changed. Davis and Baldwin aren't pleased
about this, so they try to scare them out. They're not good enough,
however, so they hire a 'Beetlegeuse', (Michael Keaton,) to scare them out.
What follows is a mad rollarcoaster ride.
The secret to this film enjoyment is it's outrageous speacial effects. It's
more like watching some whacked out cartoon than an movie. Although blandly
directed by Burton, some of his scenes are near classic (the Harry
Belafonte round the table, for example) But the effects really do add
something. Watch Davis rip off her face! Gasp as Baldwin runs around with
no head! They really are quite special.
But of course, the best thing about this film is Keaton. He is brilliant.
Not in this film for nearly long enough, when he IS onscreen, the film sky
rockets. He has this beautifully perverted voice which he uses so well.
Davis and Baldwin also do a good job as the dead couple, and they case
worker is also very funny. Jones and O'Hara do an excellent job as the
living couple, and Ryder is suitably weird enough as the cooky daughter.
Another element that adds to this film is Danny Elfmans fantastic score.
Very gothic, and very effective. Of course, Harry Belafonte also helps to
make the score an sucess.
Overall, this film mainly depends on the performances and effects, and
thankfully these are both good. The film runs at a resonable length aswell,
90 mins, so you won't get bored. Recommended.

Title
Review for Mimic (1997)
Everyone knows that old rule, 'Never work with children and animals.' In
this latest horror flick Mimic case, it's 'Never work with children and
genetically enhanced killer animals' instead, as Mimic features both of
these and succeeds in doing nothing except mildly engaging the audience. The
film begins in New York, where we see children dying from a mysterious
disease, which is being carried by cockroaches. Dr. Susan Tyler (Sorvino)
creates a genetically enhanced bug (the 'Judas' breed) , however, which is
designed to kill all cockroaches. The bug does it's job, the cockroaches all
die, and the terror is gone. 'Three years later' appears on the screen, and
we discover that the Judas breed is back, bigger than ever, and ready to
kill. The spin on this bug, however, is that it can mimic it's predator, and
in this case....it's humans. That should teach us for squishing all those
bugs.
What should be a roller coaster ride with bugs everywhere, tons of gory
deaths and some massive set pieces instead turns out to be a rather subdued,
almost boring movie which plods along at a very slow pace. Perhaps the movie
was trying to be thought provoking, and trying to avoid the 'Predator' type
movie it could easily have become. If it is, then the director and writers
have made the wrong move, because this is perfectly suited to be an all out
action fest. The director, who bought us Cronos, a far superior film,
directs the film in a calm, and frankly dull movie. There are few exciting
sequences, instead just a lot of people talking. If the dialogue was
intelligent, then it would be all right, but it's sadly babbling nonsense.
In fact, the script is embarrsingly weak, and the characterizations not much
better .Sorvino and company are as 2D as characters come, with the script
not bothering to develop them.  There is some action in this film, but it's
directed in such an annoying way, it's just infuriating to watch. The camera
cuts all over the place, disoreitating the audience, and instead of
involving the audience in the action, it merely alienates them.
The peformances are O.K, if slightly below average. Sorvino is O.K, although
she's not very good at conveying terror, or anything emotion really. The
supporting cast are all sterotypes, with characters such as a big black
security guard with a foul mouth, a geeky scientist with spectacles, and
what could be the most stereotypical mexican 'old timer' ever. Their
reasonable good fun, however. Mimic, then, may fail with it's story, pacing
and characters, but the film does look good. Like Dark City, Mimic is a
definite case of style of content. It may be a bit too gloomy for it's own
good, but the sets look nice, and parts of the film are directed well. But
looks aren't good enough to save Mimic from the depths of mediocre,
somewhere where it shouldn't really belong. A good opportunity, then,
wasted. A shame.
OVERALL RATING=**  OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK Š1998
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Mighty Joe Young (1998)
Apart from the cute RKO symbol at the start of the film, there's no
surprises in this new Disney film. 'Mighty Joe' happens to be a giant ape,
who befriends Jill (Theron) who's mother was killed by poachers. Jill meets
Gregg (Paxton) who wants to move Joe out of his natural habitat and into a
wildlife preserve, where he feels Joe would be safer. Although reluctant,
Jill agrees. However, Joe soon attracts interest from a poacher (Rade
Serbedzjia) the very same poacher who killed Jill's mother. Will Joe escape
their clutches? Will Jill and Gregg fall in love. Well, would we expect
anything else from the mouse?
>From the outset, it's obvious that Mighty Joe Young is going to be nothing
but an enjoyable kids movie. Although it's incredibly predictable, it's made
well enough and is passable entertainment. Although Ron Underwood tries
nothing new when directing, the cast and the special effects are nifty
enough to make this good. The under-rated Theron, after a good performance
in The Devils Advocate (1997) delivers another good acting turn here, making
an under developed role into something quite likeable and appealing to kids.
Although she tries to be to child like during some parts of the film, her
performance certainly isn't a failure. Bill Paxton, or 'Mr. Bland' is as
bland as ever, and cursed with the worst hair seen in Hollywood for a very
long time. His performance is alright, and he's starry eyed enough to carry
the role, but someone a little more exciting would have done. Serbedzjia is
the typical Disney bad guy, yet he doesn't overplay the role, which is a
shame really, because this movie really needs an outlandish character.
Joe himself is a wonderful piece of technology from Rick Baker. Although the
CGI looks a little fake, the model is excellent and features a nice range of
actions. It's also a believable model, something missing from movies
recently. Although he's a very 2D character, he's a good enough plot device.
However, he is loveable enough for the young ones, and he's easy to root
for.
Unfortunately, the story telling suffers from Disney's obsession at bland,
straight forward scripting. The script, by Ruth Rose, is full of morals, yet
isn't quite so patronising as some of Disney's worst efforts. The family
theme is played strongly, as there's no doubt that children will learn about
friendship and family from this movie. Unfortunately, however, the pacing is
all wrong. While the scenes in the jungle are nice, in this Godzilla world
the children will be looking for something for a bit more action. Indeed,
Disney were going to make this an Godzilla competitor until pulling back the
release date. Therefore, we get 1 hour 30 minutes of sloppy morals and only
20 minutes of Joe running amok, which is a bit of a let down. It's a shame,
because the action scenes are well done, and the last 20 minutes give the
film a buzz lacking from the material beforehand. Although the action kicks
in before boredom will take over, it's still too little too late.
As a family movie, Mighty Joe Young will not hit all the targets. Although
children under eight will no doubt love the simple to understand story, the
parents in tow may get bored with the obviousness of it all, a common
problem with Disney movies. Although featuring pretty scenery, a nice
soundtrack and excellent effects, the film is lacking that spark that family
films like A Bugs Life have. Far from mighty, therefore, but still not a
complete disappointment.

Title
Review for Civil Action, A (1998)
Starring John Travolta, Robert Duvall, William H. Macy and Kathleen Quinlan.
Directed By Steven Zaillian
Running Time: 1 hour 50 minutes.
A new courtroom thriller starring John Travolta that _isn't_ written by John
Grisham? There's a miracle everyday in Hollywood. This interesting vehicle
adapted from the true story novelised by Jonathan Harr is an straight
forward telling of the lawfirm Schlichtmann (Travolta) Crowley and Conway
(Zeljko Ivanek and Tony Shalhoub) and their involvement in a case against
contaminated water. However, this case proves to be hugely expensive for
them, and they are drawn into a battle of money and wits against defendant
lawyer Jerome Facher (Duvall.)
Adapted by Schindlers List writer Zaillian, A Civil Action is a better
courtroom drama than most because much of the movie is set outside the
courtroom. In a nice sequence, the film introduces us immediately to
Travolta's character and train of though, although the other members of the
law firms seem to be compromised in the character developed area. Although
Travolta's character is delved into greatly, Conway, Crowley and accountant
James Gordon (Macy) are rather faceless, although played with sterling
effort by the cast. William H. Macy is particularly good as the edgy
accountant who grows more crazy as the firm goes deeper into debt. Shalhoub,
after an excellent performance in The Siege is good here, but plays a minor
role in the big scheme of things. Ivanek, sadly, doesn't get much of a
chance to make an impression on the audience. Robert Duvall is good as the
world weary Facher, but it's far too simple a role for him and lacks any
real depth. He's fun, but he's not very deep. Quinlan appears in and out of
the movie as the leader of the group of parents who are fighting the
pollutants of the water (their children died of leukaemia,) and her
performance is merely average. John Lithgow and Dan Hedaya, however, are
both fun in incredibly minor roles.
Travolta himself has shown he can save nearly any movie, even crap like
Phenomenon (but not Michael.) He obviously enjoys working with Duvall again
(and vice versa) and it's their scenes together that are the highlights of
the movie. Travolta is more than able enough to carry the movie, and his is
the only character that's fleshed out with any depth. But the movie never
comes to an great conclusion about him, and the end of the movie may leave
you annoyed by the fact that the film can't seem to wrap up a potentially
interesting character. Perhaps placing the words 'Based on a true story' at
the start of the movie was the filmmakers way of wimping out: they must have
thought the audiences would of loved these characters because their are real
people. But it doesn't work, and having faceless characters makes the film
flat and sometimes boring.
Apart from the characters, however, the film in other respects is fine. The
direction is impressive and pacy enough, although their are some truly odd
camera angles chucked in for no apparent reason. Both the drama and the
minor action scenes are handled well enough. There's some suitably 'JFK'
type music running throughout, written by Danny Elfman, who I still feel is
more comfortable when writing music for darker films. The pacing is fine,
although it occasionally drags, and the ending is to abrupt.
Although flawed, A Civil Action does contain enough suspense and tension to
keep audiences pleased. Although it doesn't try anything new, A Civil Action
is solid entertainment, and is probably worth watching if you want a quick
fix of courtroom drama. It's just a shame that a potentially interesting
movie is nothing more than average.

Title
Review for Shakespeare in Love (1998)
This story about the Bard and his love for a woman named Viola is witty,
dramatic and very very enjoyable. The plot centres around William
Shakespeare (Fiennes) who is stuck for ideas for his next play. He soon
hashes one together, and gets a cast together, featuring the likes of Ned
Alleyn (Ben Affleck), but the one cast member who strikes him is a young
'boy' played by Paltrow. They soon start a relationship, but she is already
set to be married to the slimy Lord Wessex (Colin Firth) who wants nothing
but her money. Will Will (pun kinda intended) both keep Viola and get his
play finished in time?
Despite a simple story conceived by Tom Stoppard and Marc Norman,
Shakespeare in Love is undeniably charming. Wit and drama is dished out in
equal amounts, and there's a fair bit of sentimentally in there aswell. The
cast give all their worth to the well realised script. Fiennes is a standout
as the young William, giving an energetic and well rounded performance. Ben
Affleck is fun as the 'Bruce Willis' of the Elizabethan age, offering a
change of pace for him since the hectic Armageddon. Colin Firth doesn't have
much to work with what is a very two dimensional character, but he gives a
suitably slimy performance even if he is nothing but a plot device. Also
popping up are British comedians  Martin Clunes and Mark Williams giving two
likeable performances, Geoffrey Rush as a flustered theatre manager, and
Dame Judi Dench makes an appearance as Queen Elizabeth, who gets a very
funny scene at the end of the film. The cast list goes on, and each
individual performance is a delight.
But it's Paltrow who has to carry the film, and while she's a competent
actress, she's never experienced a role as challenging as this one.
Thankfully, she's really rather good, delivering Shakespeare lines with ease
and brings a lot of charm and warmth to her character. I find it hard to
believe, however, that Shakespeare mistook her for a boy, and even with a
moustache she still looks as beautiful as ever (make of that what you will.)
And, the chemistry between Fiennes and Paltrow is intense, although with
boyfriend Affleck on set it may have been a bit embarrassing for her acting
slushy with another man right in front of her own man!
While the story is wafer thin, it's well handled by Mrs. Brown director John
Madden, who grabs the audience attention and keeps a strong hold on them. I
found it very hard not to be entranced by the film, with it's rich, vibrant
colours and costumes and entertaining interpretation of the screenplay.
There's also lots of contemporary references to look out for, the long
'credit's list on Will's new play being one of them. The soundtrack is nice,
and the entire production is very enchanting.
Knowledge of Shakespeare and his plays aren't really needed, although it may
help to get some of the jokes. The film is based around one of the Bards
better known plays, 'Romeo & Juliet,' which thanks to Leonardo DiCaprio has
been opened up to a whole new generation of teenage girls. In summary, it's
very hard not to like Shakespeare in Love. It truly is a lovely film, and
would be an excellent use of two hours.

Title
Review for Payback (1999)
Starring Mel Gibson, Maria Bello and Kris Kristofferson
Directed By Brian Helgeland
Running Time: 1 hour 50 minutes
A 'sort of' remake of the Lee Marvin classic Point Blank, Payback is an
overly violent, egotistical vehicle for Mel Gibson. Although the movie
offers some laughs, this film is too hit and miss to be truly enjoyable.
Gibson plays Porter, a 'nice guy' who losers $70,000 to both his wife
(Deborah Unger) and his partner in crime Val (Gregg Henry.) Mr Nice Guy soon
becomes Mr Bad Guy, as Porter deals with the 'Outfit' to get his money back,
meeting a variety of characters along the way.
Payback is a well made enough thriller, with good action and some nice
jokes. Although the film tends to use over the top violence to achieve it's
laughs, this is a enjoyable enough ride. Mel dominates the whole
proceedings, and while he carries the film enough, he's never believable
enough to make a truly bad guy. His 'hard assed' face is all very good, but
when he speaks it's comes off as a low mumble which is irritating. Also,
someone decided a voice over would be a good idea, but it turns out to be
the worst voice over since Bladerunner (1982) with annoying muttering by
Gibson over the proceedings. The rest of the cast fare somewhat better:
Bello is fun as a stereotypical call girl, the only 'good guy' in the movie.
Familiar to viewers of T.V's E.R, Bello is fine on television but fails to
make an impression on the big screen. More fun Lucy Alexis Lu as a
terrifying S &M girl, and Gregg Henry as Mel's psychotic ex-partner. Kris
Kristofferson, a victim of Paybacks infamous re-shoots, is nice and intense,
if underwritten. Finally, William Devane turns in an excellent performance
as Carter, a super slimy crime boss, and James Coburn is fun as a sharp
dressing villain.
The direction by L.A Confidential writer Brian Helgeland is nice, the action
especially done well. Sadly, the 'talky' scenes are boring and long winded,
which slows down the film. This film should be more of an action movie than
the drama it's obviously trying to be. The film is shot in a grainy blue
colour which adds to the gritty feel of it all in an effective way. And it's
also nice to root for the bad guy, although Porters charisma doesn't come
apparent to the last 30-40 minutes of the film, making it somewhat hard to
root for him at the start. In fact, I warmed to the 'proper' bad guys before
Porter. The violence quota is also high, although the very violent scenes
usually use implied, rather than explicit, violence.
There's a cool soundtrack running throughout, and the come uppance of all
the bad guys are enjoyable enough. The last twenty minutes are hugely
enjoyable, a great cat and mouse chase which has an upbeat pace missing from
the rest of the film. And here lies the main problem with Payback: the
pacing is off. This film should be a fast moving, pacy, violent epic, which
instead gets itself bogged down in 'character developing' scenes it doesn't
need. When the violence arrives, it's a breath of relief, and enjoyable. But
then the drama comes back, and so does the boredom.
Payback, therefore, is a worthwhile film, although flawed enough to not make
this a classic. Gibson fans will enjoy it, as there is a _lot_ of Gibson,
and for the rest of us: Payback is a slow thriller which delivers the goods
a little too late. A shame.

Title
Review for eXistenZ (1999)
Starring Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jude Law and Willem Dafoe
Directed By David Cronenberg
Running Time: 1 hour 37 minutes
eXistenZ is a classic case of good idea, bad execution. The film opens with
an preview of a new computer game called 'eXistenZ', where players are
hooked up to the game via wires that go into their spinal column. However,
during the demonstration, the creator of the game, Allegra Geller (Leigh) is
shot at by an extremist anti-games terrorist group. Geller, along with P.R
manager Ted Pikul (Law), flee, and are soon on the road together. They both
eventually hook up into the game to make sure it's still working, and we
join their adventures in the 'lifelike' world of eXistenZ.
eXistenZ has the potential to be an enjoyable action sci-fi romp which also
plays with the audiences mind. However, this being an Cronenberg movie, any
life the movie may have had is drowned in a message-filled mess. There's
little tension, and the only entertainment the film brings come from the
over the top violence that occasionally punctuates the movie. It's a shame,
as there are some great ideas, including guns made from body parts and some
eerie imagery. But the plot is static, and not much happens until the last
30 minutes were we finally enter the game eXistenZ.
The cast don't help the film much. Jennifer Jason Leigh, although usually an
talented actress, seems bored with the film, and doesn't appear to do much.
She mutters most of her lines, and appears to have no interest in what she's
doing. She does look attractive, however. Jude Law is nothing but
irritating: his wide eyed, 'where the hell am I' look does nothing but
grate. Having two lead actors who don't appear to be interested in their
roles doesn't help the film move along. The supporting cast have more fun:
Willem Dafoe is fun as ever as an garage owner, and Ian Holm puts on a
ridiculous accent as an game pod 'surgeon.' Fortunately, they are only
'supporting' actors, and barely feature in the movie. But generally, the
cast do little to make the movie fun.
Cronenberg himself has problems with the film. Even with all these great
gadgets and gizmos, Cronenberg seems more content _really_ fleshing out
boring characters to the point of irritation. The game pods and organic
guns, potentially fun gadgets that could be used much in the film, are sadly
underused. Even the game eXistenZ isn't the most entertaining computer game
in the world: it's certainly no Quake II. Cronenbergs direction only seems
to work when dealing with the strange and gross, a reason why the The Fly
worked so well. Again, in eXistenZ only the gross bits work: there's an
disgusting scene in a Chinese restaurant, for example, that really works,
and anything involving implantation or organic guns usually puts some life
into the film. Other than that, the script, also by Cronenberg, warbles on,
leading to an outrageously obvious conclusion and an hugely ambiguous ending
that irritates beyond belief.
eXistenZ is terribly disappointing. Cronenberg had a potential winner, but
it's just done so badly. The material desperately cries out 'action movie!'
and is not suited to character study at all. There's very little meaning,
and little to grab the attention. eXistenZ could well be the longest 90
minutes of your life, and unless you worship Cronenberg, eXistenZ is worth
waiting for home video.

Title
Review for Antz (1998)
Starring Woody Allen, Sharon Stone and Gene Hackman
Directed By Eric Darnell and Lawrence Guterman
Running Time: 1 hour 42 minutes.
Dreamworks latest picture, after Small Soldiers, is another children's flick.
And again, like Small Soldiers, most of the gags will probably go right
over your kids head. Woody Allen plays 'Z', a neurotic worker ant in a
massive ant colony. By a chance encounter, he meets and falls in love with
Princess Bala (voiced by Stone.) They split company, but Allen wants to meet
her again, so he convinces a soldier ant voiced by Sylvester Stallone to
swap places with him, so he has a better chance of meeting the princess
again. However, he manages to get both himself and the princess in a variety
of adventures in the outside world.
Like Toy Story (1995), Antz is completely computer generated by a company
called PDI, and looks brilliant. The graphics are superb, witty and easy on
the eye. There are literally hundreds of details in every scene. Although
the ants look like they are made out of wood, they move and act perfectly.
The voices behind the ants are excellent also. Woody Allen makes Z
completely hilarious, and although his angst may seem slightly out of place
in this movie, it's toned down from his previous work (although he somehow
manages to get erotic fantasies into the script.) Stallone is also good, and
the teamwork between Allen and Stallone is great, playing each other off
perfectly. Gene Hackman and Christopher Walken as the evil Soldier leaders
bring an edge to the movie, and Dan Ackroyd, John Mahoney, Jennifer Lopez
(as Stallone's lady) and Danny Glover (good as an ill-fated soldier ant) all
play a part in bringing to life the characters. The only weak link is Sharon
Stone, who seems to give no effort to her performance. Being a major
character in the film, this is slightly annoying to adults, although
children will probably not care.
The film is directed well, although it is much easier to direct on computer
when you have full control of what happening. The battle scenes are
excellent, the romantic scenes are well handled and not too sickly, and the
comedy is well done aswell. It's hard for a Woody Allen film not to be funny
however (apart from Scenes From A Mall.) Also, the wild visuals always make
sure that the film is a delight to watch. Although the script is
occasionally cliched, and there's the occasionally slow bit, Antz will
probably not be sending you to sleep.
The main flaw with the film, though, is that it's a little too adult for
kids, but a tiny bit childish for adults. Woody Allen's comedy is really not
for young ones, but the look and feel of the film is certainly aimed for
children. There's also a smattering of bad language in there for no apparent
reason, and Z talking about erotic fantasies is clearly out of place in this
movie. Generally, however, Antz is an unexpected delight. A Bug's Life, the
new film from Toy Story creators Pixar, has quite a bit too live up to.
Worth a look.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Cop Land (1997)
Stallone attempts to 'act' in this cop drama. The film is set
in a neighbourhood pratically built by Kietal, who's
nephew (played by Michael Rappaport) is involved in a car
crash and killing of two black youths. Keital dosen't really
want to get involved in anything, gets rid of Rappaport,
and Stallone and De Niro try to work out what the hell is going on. 
This film should be brilliant. It sounds like a great plot, the
actors are first grade, and the supporting cast is good
aswell, and Stallone is attempting to deliver a good
performance. However, it can't hold up. Although the
acting is fantastic (even Stallone isn't bad) the directing and
story is dull and long winded 
Some scenes go on for too long, with nothing really
happening in them. In fact, the only scenes that do work
are action scenes, which I suspect Stallone was trying to
avoid. In this film, serious means dull. The dialogue is
warbling, and basically just repeats the same points over
and over, no matter who is delivering them. The plot,
which has potential, is wasted, again just being cliched
after a while. In fact, the only thing that does keep the film
going is Kietal and De Niro, both delivering their usual
good performances. However, Stallone, although not given
much to say, gives a good performance. 
However, it's not all that bad. As said above, the action
scenes are well done. Theres also a very good ending,
which uses the cinemas sound system well. In fact, the last
10 minutes of this 2 hour film are one of the best endings
of 1997. If only the rest of the film was as good as the
ending. 
Cop Land, then, turns out not to be a power house film,
but a rather dull, and not every exciting film. Hugely
disappointing, and I can't really recommend it. 

Title
Review for Top Secret! (1984)
After the sucess of 'Airplane!', the Zucker brothers made this spy spoof
starring Val Kilmer. Set in Germany, the film centres on Nic Rivers
(Kilmer) an American who is in Germany to play a concert. However, the only
reason the German officials are holding this contest is too distract the
German public while they hatch a devious plan. A group of rebels know about
this, and what to stop it. Rivers joins them to help them out.
There isn't really much of a plot in this film. What there IS a lot of
though is action, music and lots of laughs. This is just as funny as
Airplane! The film is so incredbly silly, you have no choice but to enjoy
it. All of the jokes are well thought, with many more hits than misses. The
songs (espeacially 'Skeet Surfin', the title song of what can only be
described as 'Clay Pigeon Surfing) are well performed by Kilmer (that's his
singing voice!) and some of them quite funny. The supporting cast do a good
job aswell, reinforcing the gags. You will even see Michael Gough in this
film, (now known as Alfred in the Batman films) doing a bit comedy,
including delivering ones of the films funniest lines, 'Oh No!'
Thankfully, the film is short, and it's over before you even know what has
happened. As soon as one gag comes, another one pops along, so there's
never any dull bits. The film does peter out towards the end, but you've
laughed so much before hand you won't notice. There also dosen't seem to be
an proper ending, the film just comes adruptly to an halt and goes to the
credits.
Overall, this film is great fun. It's more violent than Airplane!, but it's
done in a comedy style. Kilmer is very funny, and pulls the gags off well.
So, if you want to hire out a spoof film, forget High School High (1996) or
The Naked Gun 33 1/3, The Final Insult (1994), and hire this out instead.
It's great fun!
(You will find this review on the WMP Archive on Monday, 25th August at
http://www.btinternet.com/~wilcock)

Title
Review for Trading Places (1983)
STARRING DAN ACKROYD, EDDIE MURPHY, JAMIE LEE CURTIS,
DON AMECHE AND RAPLH BELLAMY.
John Landis's classic comedy is quite funny, although not as funny as
everynoe likes to make out. The stroy centres around The Duke Brothers
(Ameche and Bellamy) making a bet to see if a good buisnessman comes
from its genes, or is environment. The two unlucky victims are Ackroyd
(there accountant) and Murphy (a tramp.)
Watching Ackroyd go downhill thanks to the Dukes (and a corrupt cop) is
funny, and watching Murphy taking advantage of his new lifestyle is ok
aswell. The movie then goes a bit dead near the middle, with not much
going.
But its near the end that the film really starts to pick up. First, we
see Ackroyd try to frame Murphy (while in a Santa Clause suit, stuffed
with food) and then trying to kill himself. Also, the fancy dress party
on the train sequence is funny aswell. (With a dodgy sub plot centering
around a horny gorilla)
Overall, this film is generally quite funny, and the performances make
this film funnier than it really should be.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
Dreamworks, after Mouse Hunt, again try to break into children's films with
this comedy. While better than Mouse Hunt, and having Joe 'Gremlins' Dante
on board to direct, it still dosen't exactly set the silver screen alight.
The 'story' is that a toy company has released toys (Commando's and
Gorgonites, strange alien beings) which have a chip stored inside them so
advanced they are able to think and act for themselves. Alan Abernathy
(Smith) manages to get hold of both types, and they soon escape from their
boxes and go on the rampage. It's up to Alan and love interest Christy
Fimple (Dunst) to stop the Commando's who are know hell bent on destroying
the Gorgonites, and anyone who tries to help them (including Alan and
Christy!)
Although Small Soldiers has an interesting premise for a children's film, it
is sadly underused, and is reduced to a generic, 'Home Alone' style film by
the end. This movie could of been the new Toy Story, thanks to impressive
CGI effects, a story that appeals to children (their toys could be alive)
and Joe Dante has shown before he can add a dark comic underside to a
seemingly normal film (e.g. Gremlins.) But, the writers, Ted Elliot and Zack
Penn, have added little inventiveness to the script. There's enough in here
to keep kids amused, but the premise is hopelessly underused. Their are a
few interesting set pieces, including a terrifying attack from 'Barbie' type
dolls, but there's nothing here that is startlingly new. To add insult to
injury, Dante insists on directing the film in a rather dull story. The
movie is also incredibly slow paced, with a huge amount of padding to help
fill out the running time.
The players try to offset this with some good performances. The two child
leads are likeable, and there's some chemistry between them. They both have
some goofy charm to them, and act how kids would act. Although what they say
is sometimes cliched. The adult actors are two bad here. There's no major
stars in the film, so everyone is given the chance to deliver a good
performance. Kevin Dunn (Hot Shots!) is fine as Alan's dad, playing the
father figure quite well, even if he does look too much like Al from Home
Improvement. The late Phil Hartman also pops up as Christy's dad, and is
luckily quite funny in what turned out to be his last on-screen appearance.
Dante regular Dick Miller pops up as Joe the lorry driver, and he gives the
film some bounce at the start. Finally, Jay Mohr and David Cross are kooky
enough as the scientists who create the toys.
The voices of the soldiers themselves are perfect. The producers got the
cast of 'The Dirty Dozen' to voice the commando's, with Tommy Lee Jones
playing the leader. Each one fits perfectly with their character. For the
Gorgonites, the cast of Spinal Tap (Christopher Guest, Harry Shearer etc.)
were used, and again they suit their characters perfectly. Finally, the
soldiers themselves are beautifully created by Stan Winston, who bought us
the dinosaurs in Jurassic Park.
But despite the good performances, the film suffers from weak directing, a
poor script, and dull set pieces. Although the ending does have some life to
it, and the film is not totally dull, Small Soldiers is slightly dull. For
kids, it's fine, if somewhat violent, but sadly there isn't enough here that
appeals to adult. A missed opportunity.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for 10 Things I Hate About You (1999)
Starring Julia Stiles, Heath Ledger and Joseph Gordon-Levitt.
Directed By Gil Junger
Running Time: 1 hour 37 minutes.
Shakespeare's 'The Taming of the Shrew' gets transferred to 90's America in
this fun tale of romance. Julia Stiles plays Katarina Stratford, a bitchy
'hate chick'  who's sister, Bianca (Larisa Oleynik) desperately wants to
date boys. However, daddy (Larry Miller) won't let Bianca date until
Katarina dates, and there isn't much chance of that happening. Enter Cameron
(Gordon-Levitt) who desperately wants to date Bianca. Of course, he can't
date Bianca until Katarina dates, so Cameron and friend Michael (David
Krumholtz) set in forth a plan to get weirdo Patrick (Ledger) to date
Katarina. Not everything, however, goes to plan.
Writers Karen McCullah Lutz and Kirsten Smith have delivered a script that
makes Shakespeare actually quite good fun. The dialogue is funny, and the
film goes along at a cracking pace. In fact, the film moves a little too
fast, because some plot developments occur in a hurried way that aren't
entirely believable. The largest casualty of the fast paced script is
Katarina, who goes from independent chick to soppy, big eyed typical
teenager in the space of seemingly a few days. The film also gives the
current Hollywood saying, which is "if you don't conform, you won't be
popular." A worrying trend. Still, the dialogue is fresh, and the jokes come
out at a steady rate which gives the film a lively feel, and doesn't sound
like the writings of a forty year old desperately trying to sound cool.
The actors are obviously having a good time with the material. Most of the
cast have transferred from television, and are less brattish than some of
the brat pack appearing on the screen at the moment. Stiles has great fun
playing the easy role of being a bitch, and has fun running off the endless
insults. Her characters a little flat, however, and her transformation is
more than a little shaky. Still, she looks great, acts well, and handles the
main role with ease. The hulking Ledger is good fun as the seemingly
braindead Patrick, who's charm increases throughout the movie, until he
becomes the most likeable character in a likeable cast. Gordon-Levitt
suffers from the 90m.p.h script, and his character is therefore lacking. He
gives a decent performance, but he never has enough time to truly shine on
the screen. He also looks about thirteen years old. David Krumholtz is
hilarious as the typical geek, and this, following his performance in Slums
of Beverly Hills, shows he has a great comic talent. The pretty if empty
Larisa Oleynik (also known as Alex Mack) makes the least impression in the
movie, her performance is a bit boring and two dimensional. Allison Janey
pops up in a bit role as the horny school counsellor, and like most bit
roles gets all the best lines and disappears with her pay cheque.
The rest of 10 Things I Hate About You follows the standard teen flick
formula. There's a glaring rock sound track featuring a good selection of
rock tunes. There's the 'hip' school teacher, overplayed by Daryl Mitchell.
There's a performance or four by a live band. And the film ends at a prom,
and the weather is always good. It all seems a little too perfect, and for
some people watching spoiled kids live out their spoiled lives holds no
opinion. But it's better made here, and thankfully the characters are fully
likeable.
10 Things I Hate About You is a worthwhile teen flick, directed with a
bouncy flair by Gil Junger which gives the film a light, fluffy feel. The
ending is obvious, the sentiment piled on. But 10 Things I Hate About You is
a worthwhile movie that is good for a matinee.

Title
Review for Ransom (1996)
Ron Howard teams up with Mel Gibson in what should be a fun packed,
action thriller. However, there is one word that really describes what
this film is like. And that word is 'Average'
This has to be one of the most 'ok' films I have ever seen. The plot is
about Mel Gibson trying to get his son back after he is kidnapped by a
group headed by a policeman (Sinese). However, halfway through the
film, instead of Gibson paying the ransom, he decides to make it a
'reward' to the first person who brings the kidnapper to him, dead or
alive.
Rene Russos part, as Gibsons wife, is underwritten, and hardly does
anything in this movie at all. However, the best role in the movie has
to Sinese. He has a real evil quality about him, and makes a very good
bad guy
Another major problem with the film is that it is terribly overlong.
The film goes on for 1/2 hour longer than it should. You're glad when
it finally ends, which is a bad sign for a thriller.
Overall, I was disappointed with this film. It's like Ron Howard had
nothing better to do, and made this to make some quick money. With a
bit more development, this could of been one of the best thrillers of
the year. However, it turns out to be merely average.

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 20 MINUTES
STARRING MATTHEW BRODERICK, JEAN RENO AND MARIA PITILLO
DIRECTED BY ROLAND EMMERICH
Fantastically over hyped, Godzila finally lumbers onto the big screen. The
film opens with footage of nuclear testing on the french polynesian islands,
then an attack on a boat from some beast, and finally we join Dr. Nick
Tatopoulos (Broderick looking about 17 years old) doing some research  in
Chernobyl. Some shady U.S government guys appear, and ask him to come to an
island where they have massive footprints, from what looks like a giant
lizard. And what's more, this beast is heading for New York. Gulp!
Although Godzilla should be a non stop roller coaster ride, and at some
points it is, there is something curiously uninvolving and unexciting about
this movie. The main faults lie with the acting and writing, common problems
with 'summer blockbuster' movies. Broderick is pretty useless as the hero,
with no humour or a 'tough guy' image. While Emmerich's previous summer
flick, Independence Day (1996) had wisecracks and action from Jeff Goldblum
and Will Smith, this has neither. Also, Maria Pitillo, as Broderick's former
girlfriend, is just as useless, with a chronic disability in acting. She's
incapable of showing emotion, speaks every line in the same way, and
basically she's total crap. It's up to french actor Jean Reno to save the
day, and indeed he does, turning in a campy performance as a french secret
agent. Shame he has such little screen time in such a overlong film. Hank
Azaria also turns up as a crazy cameraman named 'Animal', and he adds a
little life to the picture. Also making an appearance is Harry Shearer
(probably best know for doing voices in The Simpsons) as a slimy news
reporter.
O.K, so the acting is not up to par, but it never is in these movies. But
what about the script? Well, that's not up to par either. Emmerich and
screenwriting pal Dean Devlin seem so caught in the destruction of New York
City that they forgot to write a script. The dialogue is banal (Broderick
looks at a lot of fish and utters 'That's a lot of fish.'), and the
character development is non existent (Reno plays the typical frenchman ('No
croissant?'), Broderick forever remains a geeky scientist.) Also, the film
is seriously lacking a sense of humour. The jokes that are uttered are
pathetic, and there's an 'hilarious' running gag about Siskel and Ebert.
(The mayor is Mayor Ebert, and is assistant is called Gene! HA HA HA HA!.)
The plot is dire, and in the end just rips off Jurassic Park (1993) by
having lots of baby Godzilla's (i.e. Velicorapters) running around New York.
Right, so the script and acting suck. But what about the special effects?
Thankfully, they're are quite good. Godzilla is an impressive piece of CGI,
although we don't see much of him because the movie is so dark. The
destruction of New York is pretty well done aswell. But although they are
impressive, they can't save Godzilla from being an hugely disappointing and
boring movie. The movie goes on for far too long aswell, and it can't seem
to decide on a ending. And of course, the ending itself leaves possibility
for a sequel. Let's just hope one never arrives.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me.
When the original Austin Powers was released in cinemas around three years
ago, the screening I attended had about five people in total watching the
film. The Spy Who Shagged Me, (TSWME) the inevitable sequel, had about
thirty times that figure, a testament to Austin's video popularity. The hip
spy from the sixties returns to celluloid in this colourful, largely funny
sequel to 'International Man of Mystery.' Mike Myers plays the titular
Austin Powers, now living in the nineties with Vanessa Kensington.
Unfortunately, Austin's mojo is stolen by the evil Doctor Evil (Myers
again). Austin must return to the sixties to regain his mojo from the evil
doctor, and must also stop Dr. Evil from blowing up the earth with a large
"laser." He teams up with sexy CIA agent Felicity Shagwell (Graham) and sets
off on his rather silly quest.
Mike Myers always seems to be lazy when making a sequel, usually by
recycling jokes from the original film to a less funnier extent. That
problem occasionally rears it's ugly head here: for example, the dancing
interludes don't seem nearly as funny as the original film, and barely raise
a laugh. However, although rather hit and miss, TSWME has enough laughs to
keep the film running until it decides to end just before it runs out of
steam. The cast, largely made up by Myers who plays three roles, is
energetic and fun. Robert Wagner repeats his brief part from the original
movie, before being replaced by Rob Lowe, who basically plays Robert Wagner
rather well. Mindy Sterling is fun as the German scarebag Frau Farbissina,
and Seth Green returns as Dr. Evils estranged son Scott. Heather Graham is
only slightly disappointing as Felicity, although this is largely to do with
the fact that her character is intensely shallow, little more than a sex
object. She looks great, but is more than a little empty. Finally, Verne
Troyer is rather good as Dr. Evils smaller clone, Mini-Me, although the
character is largely wasted until a funny fight between him and Austin near
the end of the movie.
The gags are largely good, stand outs include a funny tent gag, and a funny
performance of 'Just the Two of Us.' The film seems to have benefited from a
larger budget, with a much sharper, funnier look than the first film. It all
looks like a large set however, and clearly not filmed much in England (as
Austin points out.) The plot is full of inconsistencies, but Myers and Co.
desperately try to cover this up by telling the audience to 'go with it,'
which seems like a cop out. Vanessa Kensington's fate, for example, is badly
handled and then thrown away.
But although the set pieces are funny and some of the one-liners sharp,
there are some parts of TSWSM that just don't work. 'Fat Bastard,' a
Scottish assassin who weighs a metric ton, is largely unfunny, although he
gets one of the best lines near the end of the movie. Mini-Me is never fully
used. Austin is also curiously underused, and Dr. Evil gets far more screen
time. This is largely a good thing however, as Dr. Evil is much funnier than
Austin Powers, which is a bit odd seeing as Austin is meant to be the star.
But all the gags are delivered with a likeable charm, so even the ones that
don't work can get a smirk. There are some dead bits, but the belly laughs
that follow usually compensate. The film also delves into toilet humour far
more often than it's predecessor, and this gags aren't as funny or original
as the rest of the films jokes.
Overall, TSWSM is short and sweet enough to be good for some light comic
relief. It will keep you laughing, and Mike Myers charm practically flows
from the screen. There's enough effort to make this film work, and it is a
worthy enough successor to the already cult movie. It won't get you
thinking, but Austin Powers will certainly get you laughing.

Title
Review for Strange Brew (1983)
This film was recently on TV (in the UK), and as I've never seen Doug and
Bobs McKenzies first (and only) film, I decided to sit through 90 mins of a
very mixed bag of jokes. 
The film starts off a bit weak, with a rather lame joke featuring the MGM
lion. We get introduced to Doug and Bob (Moranis and Thomas), who are
Canadian beer drinkers who have a tendency to go 'eh!', and call each other
'Hosers' (This film is in Hosearama)
Basically, the 'plot' goes like thus... Doug and Bob get free beers by
putting a mouse in a beer bottle, going to the beer shop saying they found
this mouse in the bottle, and then asking for a new crate of beer. However,
their plot fails in a shop, and they are told that if they want free beer,
they must go to the breweries and ask for it there. However, the two idiots
get caught up in a plot involving Brewmiester Smith (Max Von Sydow) and
must go and prove their innocence.
What follows are some funny jokes, and also some pointless, not very jokes.
This is really the main problem of the film. If you stick with the film,
then you are sure to find some good jokes. But there are far too many
misses to make it a classic comedy. However, if you ARE  a Canadian beer
drinker, then maybe you'll find some of the gags funnier then I did.
Overall, I was disappointed with this film. It even got a bit boring in
some parts of the movie, and this film could've been a lot funnier than it
was. Disappointing.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
LETHAL WEAPON 4
(WARNER BROTHERS)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 7 MINUTES
STARRING MEL GIBSON AND DANNY GLOVER
DIRECTED BY RICHARD DONNER
The gangs all here, again, in this amiable action comedy. Gibson and Glover
are back as cops Riggs and Murtaugh, who both feel that they're 'getting too
old for this sh*t.' Well, it looked like the director, and the
scriptwriters, and getting too old also, as this movie is firmly stuck in
the 80's. Anyway, the boys are caught in a plot about illegal smuggling of
Chinese folks into America. Glover lets one of the families stay in his
home, but he's picked the wrong family. Bad guy Wah Sing Ku (Jet Li) is soon
looking for them, and then intent on getting rid of the lads, plus Rigg's
wife Lorna (Rene Russo) who is now nine months pregnant. Joining the good
guys is Chris Rock, supposedly 'playing' a character called Lee Butters, and
old favourite Joe Pesci as annoying side-kickabout Leo Getz. And, of course,
the familiar action and jokes are spread throughout the movie.
Well, maybe 'movie' isn't the right word for Lethal Weapon 4. Perhaps
're-union' is more like it. LW4 is less of a movie rather than a big
get-toghether of the cast and the director. Everyone seems to be having a
great time on-screen, all laughing and joking and have a 'good time.'
However, this dosen't convey to the audience, and we feel like spectators
looking though a window to a great party inside. Therefore, LW4 skimps on
script and character development, and concentrates of the jokes and action.
Actually, it centres on the jokes more, because it took a good 40 minutes
before the proper action began. Yes, LW4 suffers the problem of 'developing'
characters we are already familiar with and don't really care about. The
actors charms help pull of this slow start, however, and the chemistry
between Gibson, Glover and Pesci is magical.
When the action finally appears, it's well handled and fairly entertaining,
if somewhat familiar. There's the usual fist fights, gun shoots and car
chases. Sadly, there's no 'new' feel to them, they've been recycled from a
million films before. The writer, Alfred Gough, dosen't try anything too
original, and tries to stick to standard action fare, which is does very
well. The jokes are O.K, although their are funnier because of the cast, not
the jokes themselves. Gibson can make any gag seem great, and Chris Rock,
far better here than Doctor Dolittle, is a welcome addition with his Eddie
Murphy style delivery. Richard Donner gets the job done, and some of the set
pieces are well done, especially the first 10 minutes. Overall, though, it's
all a little underwhelming.
LW4 is far from being a bad movie, it's just not too good either. It's
marginally better than Lethal Weapon 3, but not as entertaining as the first
or second movie. While this type of movie was great in the 80's, it seems
out of place in the 90's where we expect action movies to have a little more
punch to them, and razzle dazzle. It's fun, and not boring, but in the end,
LW4 didn't really need to be made, and is just an excuse for everyone to get
back together. And the corny, ridiculous 'we're great friends' ending is one
of the funniest endings in movie history.
In other words, making a fifth movie would be like milking a dead cow.
Warner, please make Lethal Weapon now rest in peace. Amen.
DAVID WILCOCK Š1998
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Siege, The (1998)
Starring Denzel Washington, Annette Bening and Bruce Willis.
Directed By Edward Zwick
Running Time: 1 hour 55 minutes.
With the look, and sometimes feel, of a typical, 'no-brainer' Hollywood
action movie, The Siege is surprisingly so much more. A well crafted film
from the unknown veteran Edward Zwick, and with an superb cast, The Siege is
a much better film than it should be. The story centres around New York,
which is suffering from a massive bombing attacks from Arab terrorists. FBI
agent Anthony Hubbard (Washington) and his team are trying to solve which
terrorist group is committing these acts, and to stop them. Helping him is
Elise Kraft (a stand-out Bening) who has a somewhat shady history. The
attacks become so great, however, that martial law is soon declared on the
city, led by General Devereaux (Willis), and many injustices are being
caused on innocent Arabs living in the city. Hubbard soon wants to stop the
terrorists, and the American army.
Zwicks third collaboration with Washington, after Glory and Courage Under
Fire is a thought provoking, exciting thriller. The cast and director help
immeasurably to make the film an enjoyable spectacle. Washington is suitably
edgy and tough as the run down FBI agent who gets increasingly pissed as the
events around him unfold. He can convey all emotions from fear to sadness,
which is lucky because the film demands all of them. Bening is as usual
excellent, giving a much, _much_ better performance than this film really
deserves. While many great actresses feel embarrassed doing films like these
and deliver an lazy performance, Bening gives it her all as usual, treating
this film like any other she's done. It's a shame that she is just known as
'Warren Beattys wife' at the moment, she is so much more than this. The weak
link comes as Bruce Willis, still desperately trying to prove he's a thesp,
and not John McClane. He gets an A+ for effort, but a C for execution. He's
performance is not a total shambles, but when put against Washington and
Bening both on seemingly very good days, it was going to be tough for him.
He hasn't got much screen time, but when he is on screen he makes little
impact, which is a shame. Also, his hair seems to get crazier in every
movie. But one relatively unknown actor who gives probably the best
performance, especially for a supporting one, is Tony Shalhoub, superb as a
translator on Washingtons team. He leaves a big impression on the audience,
and delivers a thoroughly enjoyable and memorable performance. Sadly, he
somewhat pales when put next to Denzel and Annette.
Zwick handles the subject matter superbly, with fast paced action and tons
of dramatic tension. The initial encounter with the terrorists involving a
bus is incredibly frightening and well handled, and the scenes of panic when
martial law is enforced are also well handled. The way the film looks at
Arabs is well handled by screenwriter Lawrence Wright, although the dialogue
could be a bit stronger, which is one of the films failings. Also, it's good
to see the way the government handle the middle east situation in a
believable way, not the usual 'kick all their asses in' (portrayed in True
Lies.) The music is suitable suspenseful, the special effects and
pyrotechnics well done.
In the end, The Siege is a great thriller, that will appeal to many ages.
Although it may be a bit too patriotic for world wide audiences, it's great
to see an action movie with a little bit of thought behind it. Recommended.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for True Lies (1994)
            Starring Arnold Schwarzenegger, Jamie Lee Curtis, Tom Arnold,
Bill Paxton and Art Malik
Schwarzenegger stars in one of the silliest films of 1994. Everything in
this film is ridiculous, and the audience suspension of disbelief is pushed
to the limit. Schwarzenegger plays a secret agent who, somehow, manages to
convince his wife (Curtis) thathe is a computer salesman for 15 years. Why
didn't he just come out with it? She probably would have found it more
attractive. And I wish I knew how to keep a secret for 15 years. Anyway,
Schwarzenegger gets involved in a plot involving a terrorist (Malik) and
Curtis also gets mixed up into it. Throughout the film, we also suffers
Schwarzenegger sidekick, played by Tom Arnold, cracking a few jokes.
And this is one long action movie, coming in at 2 hours 20 minutes. Like
most of Camerons films, such as The Abyss, Terminator 2 and the recent
Titanic (which are all over 2 hours, and Titanic is 3 hours 22 mins), every
scene is his favourite
one, and he is never sure what to edit out. Sadly this film is just too
long (but not as boring or tedious as Terminator 2) and if it wasn't saved
by the exciting action at the end, this film would be a waste of time.
Bill Paxton provides some more comic relief as a man who cons women
(including Curtis) that he is a secret agent. There's some funny
Schwarzenegger 'acting' as he tries to show anger, but fails miserably.
There's also a good sequence with Paxton and Schwarzenegger as they drive
in a car. 
The film has some other good things aswell. The action scenes are well
directed, pulling surprises and some big set pieces. Malik is suitably evil
as the terrorist, although most of his screen time is near the end, and we
never see any motivation on why he would want to bomb America, there's just
a quick 10 second sequence of him giving a quick speech. This is not good
enough, and considering the length of the film anyway, a little more time
could of been spent on Malik's character, who is actually quite intresting.
The recent George Clooney vehicle The Peacemaker set up the terrorist
better, and this film should of set up the terrorist like The Peacemaker.
Schwarzenegger's peformance is the usual quick speeches, one liners and
grunting, Arnold is moderatly amusing, Curtis issuitably dorky, although a
dance sequence with her is incredibly embarassing, and Paxton is great fun.
Tia Carrere (Wayne's
World, High School High) is wasted, however, and her character seems a bit
pointless. The special effects (by Digital Domain, who did the effects for
Dante's Peak) are good, especially in the last 30 minutes. The score is
punchy enough, although it's a bit too 'majestic' for this type of film. 
But the screenplay, by Cameron and based on a french film called La
Totatle! is stupid, and some of the scenes would just not happen in real
life. The ending, though fun, is ridiculous. The editing is too loose, with
far too many minor scenes. This film could of come in at 2 hours with a few
cuts, and the film does lag a bit during the middle.
Overall, though, True Lies proves to be just enough fun considering how
long it is, and, in the end, is just a basicSchwarzenegger movie, although
not as good as Total Recall, which is more fun, and not as long. Just about
recommended.

Title
Review for Rushmore (1998)
Starring Jason Schwartzman, Olivia Williams, Mason Gamble and Bill Murray.
Directed By Wes Anderson
Running Time: 1 hour 33 minutes
A strange whimsical love story, Rushmore has enough charm, wit and style to
spare to rise it against it's predictable plot. It shouldn't work, but...it
works.Schwartzman plays Max Fischer, a student at the prestigious school of
Rushmore. Although he founded, or runs, nearly all of the societies at the
school, his school work performance is terrible, and he is constantly
threatened to be kicked out. Max falls in love with a new teacher Rosemary
Cross (Williams.) Max enlists the help of Herman Blume (Murray) who is
suffering the mother of a mid life crisis. But Max and Herman soon turn
against each other as they both try to win over the heart of the confused
teacher.
The plot is obvious from the word 'Go,' and sadly the film offers no
surprises story wise. Rushmore also leaves answers to a lot of questions,
principally why Max is so useless at school. But the quick pace of the film
detracts the mind from these questions, and the whole movie takes over and
charms. Wes Anderson adds a somewhat surreal feel to the film, with the
whole thing playing like a stage play. Each scene is played in a charming
manner. It's hard to describe how the film works, but...it works.
The characters are essentially a twisted and bitter lot, but it..works. Max
is a horrible, horrible person, but somehow it makes sense that he should be
the hero of this piece. But again his behaviour leaves a lot of questions
open: his father is a barber, but Max tells Herman that his dad is a brain
surgeon. Herman finds out he isn't, but nothing is said about this. Not even
his dad seems offended. Strange. While on the subject of Bill Murray, he is
excellent in this movie. This is Peter Venkman suffering married life at 50,
and Murray handles the role well. In fact, he's pretty bloody funny, and
although his character is a bastard, Murray makes it...work. Olivia Williams
is a slight disappointment, but she handles the role well.
Some tinkling muzak plays throughout the film, which again adds to the
charm. School life is portrayed well, including a big Scottish bully played
by George Farish. There's some cute, straight out comic scenes, such as when
Max visits his ill headmaster. Max also puts together some pretty amazing
stage plays, which are funny in themselves. There's so many nice quirks that
make Rushmore so pleasant to watch. Mason Gamble, previously known as the
live action Dennis, is really rather good as Max's friend Dirk Calloway and
Sara Tanaka is nice as Margaret Yang, who falls in love with Max.
Although the ending is obvious, the film has a fun time getting there, and
so does the audience. Although it leaves a few to many niggling thoughts to
make it truly great, Rushmore is a pleasant surprise, and will put a smile
on your face. Rushmore....works.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Lucas was wise to start his Star Wars trilogy with Episode 4: Episode 1 is a
boring, empty spectacle that features some nice special effects. After the
familiar 'A long time ago....' opening, the film starts with the opening
yellow crawl that features in every Star Wars movie and computer game. The
plot is that the trade confederation are blocking off supplies to the
peaceful planet of Naboo, ruled by Queen Amidala (Portman) Jedi Knights
Qui-Gon (Neeson) and Obi Wan (McGregor) are sent to negotiate a deal with
the confederation to stop the blockade. However, this simple blockade is not
all it seems, and the Jedi Knights soon have to deal with many more dangers,
including facing the evil Darth Maul (Ray Park.) They also meet the future
Darth Vadar, Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd)
Star Wars is largely a failure in all the major areas of filmmaking: script,
direction and characters. The script desperately tries to make an thin and
boring story into a two hour epic. The trade confederation plot is just not
as exciting as the death star, and as the film goes on the drama becomes
more and more non-existent. There's no underlying tension, and no urgent
need to see what the outcome is. The film also takes a leisurely pace in
telling the boring story, which doesn't help. There's no snap to make the
film work, it moves at a plod.
The script is boring: all the characters speak in morals, especially Anakins
mother. There's no group spirit evident here, and when all characters can
speak only in profound statements or bark orders, it's evident that not much
is going to happen. The two leads are hideously boring, static characters
given little to do and too much time to do it. Qui-Gon and Obi-Wan hold no
presence on film, and give little for the audience to root for. The audience
will probably warm more to bad guy Darth Maul, if he had been given more
screen time. Maul is one of the most underused bad guys in  film history,
even if he does provide the only 'straight' plot line in the film (all the
other plots in this film are to be concluded throughout the trilogy.) Anakin
is annoying and unlikeable., instead of cute and huggable as Lucas no doubt
intended. It's probably not surprising that his hateful little boy,
unfortunately blessed 'Ani' by everyone he knows, joins the dark side and
kills everyone as quickly as possible. The comedy relief is supposedly
provided by the gangly Jar Jar Brinks, although in the end none is provided
in the film by him. Although his floppy features will no doubt be great for
stuffed toys, the lines and actions he is given are painfully unfunny. The
only good laugh is when his tongue is burned by a 'pod' racer, because I
knew he wouldn't be able to talk for a while. Queen Amidala is a nothing in
the film, she serves no real purpose apart from the fact that she must
'serve her people,' and go goo-goo over Anakin. Again, her role will become
more important in the later episodes, and is given little to do here.
The actors don't help the movie much either. Liam Neeson seems bored and
embarrassed, and seems desperate to leave the movie as quickly as possible.
McGregor comes across as a posh mothers boy, with little charm. The casting
director must have chose him because he's Scottish like Alec Guinness:
there's little other explanation for it. Natalie Portman is plagued by
hideous costumes and a poor script, but she delivers a spunky performance.
And Jake Lloyd looks at everyone with hateful eyes and delivers his lines in
a bored voice. There's very little talent evident with him, it's hard to see
why Lucas chose him when there are better child actors out there. He's not
even very 'cute.'
The main claim of the film, the special effects, are okay. There's nothing
impressive about them, yet they complement the story well. The CGI takes
away much of the human element, however. The battle droids for example, the
replacement for the stormtroopers, are characterless little computer
graphics, lacking the humour and humanness that came from the stormtroopers.
Episode 1 is just disappointing. It's got high production values, but little
else. The music is meandering, except near the end. The plot gives us no-one
to root for, or even care for. The effects are nice, but dull. The plot goes
on for half an hour longer than it should. There's an air of manufacturing
among the whole sorry affair, and many clichés are catered for throughout
the film. Apart from a remotely exciting pod race sequence, Episode 1 is a
dry affair that serves little purpose, except to make money and to get us to
watch Episode 2 to see what happens to the many unfinished plot lines in the
film. Disappointing is barely the word.
RATING=** OUT OF *****

Title
Review for Pulp Fiction (1994)
After his stunning debut, Resevoir Dogs, Tarintino followed it up with
four tales all interlinked with each other. Each story is well
written, well acted, and well directed. It's is one of the most clever
films out there.
The film starts with two people (Amander Plummer and Tim Roth)
discussing robbery in a restaurant, and then they rob the
restaurant.We then get to the four stories. In the first story,
Travolta and Jackson are excellent as two hitmen who have to kill some
kids who haven't been following their bosses orders. It's horribly
violent, yet wickedly funny at the same time, and actually quite
scary. The second story concerns Travolta taking out the bosses wife,
played by Uma Thurman. Unfortunatley for him, she has a drug overdose,
and he has to try and get her back. Again, it's another funny story,
and well acted again. The third story concerns a boxer, Bruce Willis,
trying to get back his gold watch (although there's a lot more to it
than that), and the final story is continuing what happens at the
start of the film, with Travolta and Jackson trying to control Plummer
and Roth. It's another tense scene, still funny, but terrifying. It's
a masterpiece of direction and acting.
Of course, the film is full of swearing, extreme violence (although
not as bad as Natural Born Killers, it's a bit more violent than Dogs)
and even a bit of rape (the Deliverance way) Although not quite as
'gritty' as Dogs, the violence is still shocking. It's played more for
laughs though, and, of course, it's full of Tarintino's witty
dialouge. The film looks really good, especially the diner where
Thurman takes Travolta. There's a fantastic soundtrack running
throughout. This film has all the hallmarks of a classic. Naturally,
it was totally ignored by the OSCARS, but did win the Palme D'or at
Cannes. Be warned though, this film is not for the faint of heart, and
is not really a good film to show the kids either. But overall, this
is a brilliant, witty, violent masterpiece. Rent it out now!

Title
Review for What Dreams May Come (1998)
Robin Williams, this time without a beard, returns to drama in this sloppy,
sickly sweet fantasy with few redeeming features apart from the incredible
effects. He plays Chris Nielsen, who meets Annie (Annabella Sciora) and
promptly marries her. They have two great kids, who sadly die in a car
crash. Just when it couldn't get any worse, Chris gets killed in a car
crash, and goes to Heaven where he meets his guide Albert (Gooding Jnr.)
Annie can't take the grief anymore, and kills herself. (All sounding like
good fun so far?) The 'penalty' for suicide is to go to Hell, and Chris goes
on a mission to try and rescue her using the help of the Traveller (Max Von
Sydow.)
Based on a novel by Twilight Zone writer Richard Matheson, What Dreams May
Come is clunky, manufactured material doused with a extra load of sugar.
This is the worse Spielberg film Spielberg never made. Everything is wrong
about this movie: the performances are forced, and the audiences fail to
relate to any of the characters. Williams puts on a convincing upset face,
but that's all it is: a face. There's no emotion behind it. Sciora's
performance is lazy, and bogs down the whole film. She may look pretty, but
she can't act. Max Von Sydow is O.K as the traveller, if nothing special.
Cuba Gooding Jnr, thankfully, adds some bounce to his performance, and is
certainly the best performer in the film. It's a shame that his character is
so flat and 2-D, and offers no room for improvement.
All the performers have to work with a soppy script, that tries it's best to
get some emotion going, but never takes off the ground. There are _some_
scenes which could be real heartwarmers, but the faceless characters don't
help to get anything out of the performers. While films like E.T used great
actors, music and direction to pull of a masterful heart-tugging scene, What
Dreams May Come is haphazard, expecting the emotion to come out of the scene
automatically. Instead, it's all rather boring. Sure, the music is pretty
(by Michael Kamen) and the cinematography isn't bad (by Eduardo Serra) but
there's something lacking. The script doesn't help, filled with hopeless
romantic clichés, and dud speeches. Richard Matheson can write some awesome
science fiction stories, sadly this novel would look embarrassed in a
bargain bin, let alone being converted into a $70 million vehicle for Robin
Williams.
Despite being set in Heaven, What Dreams May Come is mightily depressing.
The film rushes a happy ending, but everything before this is very, very sad
and black, which just adds to make the ending even more hopeless and stupid.
But there's one redeeming feature about this failure of a movie: the special
effects. Heaven and Hell are truly incredible places, and the actors fit
perfectly with the virtual sets. But despite this, What Dreams May Come,
proves to be nothing but the biggest disappointment of 1998. Instead of
raising questions about existence, it raises boredom. Sadly, I recommend you
give this film a miss. Better luck next time, Robin.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
A sci fi/comedy starring Jack Nicholson, Pierce Brosnan, Annette Benning,
Glenn Close, Martin Short and other stars.
The martians have landed in this hillarous Tim Burton movie. Before
entering the cinema, I was initially a little bit nervous about what
this film would be like. Many people were saying that this film was
silly rubbish, and there was no point to it all. How wrong they were. I
left this film feeling much happier than I was before I entered the
cinema.
The story is about Martians attacking Earth. Using ray guns (hooray!)
they generally cause havoc around the U.S and other countries.
Nicholson plays the president who must try to stop invasion, and also
taking advice from his loopy officials.
But, basically, its a load of set pieces showing the Martians
destroying Earth. The way people are killed by the ray guns is great,
they is a hillarous (and mildly disturbing scene) involving a Martian
lady, a mad general who just wants to nuke the aliens away, (and ends
up getting squashed by an aliens foot) and a gory finale involving lots
of alien heads exploding.
But, most of all, this film is fun. The Martians are full of character,
the performances are spot on, and the all star cast help make the film
more enjoyable. The film is a million times better then the dire
INDEPENDANCE DAY, and is a real tribute to the tacky '50s invasion
movies.  They are is a great score by Danny Elfman, and lots of laughs.
This has to be the best invasion I've seen for a long time.

Title
Review for Blade (1998)
Wesley Snipes both stars and produces in this silly action flick. Snipes
plays 'Blade,' a half man, half vampire who's goal in life is to avenge the
death of his mothers by blowing the hell out of the blood suckers. In the
opening scenes, we can see he does this with particular gusto. Blade somehow
gets involved with rebel vampire Deacon Frost (Dorff) who feels that vampire
should take over the world. Blade tries to stop this, with help from
scientist friend Abraham Whistler (Kris Kristofferson) and female co-star
Karen (N'Bushe Wright. Yes, that is her name.) Blood, guts and explosions in
follow, all wrapped up in a big MTV type package.
The main problem with Blade is the fact that it's too tied up in it's own
stupid mythology, and this bogs down the whole film. While the audience is
waiting for the next mass homicide by Blade, we're instead 'treated' to
Frost and co. babbling on about some mystic vampire chronicle, and how the
blood beast (or something) will take over the world. I suppose this is all
fine if you're a fan of the Marvel comic, but the average audience member
may want some more bang for his/her buck.
When the action comes, it's pretty good, directed in a hyper kinetic, 'music
video' way. Unlike some other movies, where hyper kinetic means
'unwatchable,' the British director Norrington handles it all pretty well.
This film is not really for the faint of heart: there's a lot of blood
spurting, and in a homage to Scanners (1981) there's a few heads blowing up
in particularly graphic (yet obviously fake) way.
The performers are O.K, with Snipes seemingly having a good time as the
larger than life hero. However, he's a bit too serious for his own good in
this movie, and comes across as a bit boring. Dorff is much more fun as the
bad guy, even if he is a bit one note. He's suitably evil, however.
Kristofferson delivers a 2D performance, and Wright is pretty good in the
action babe role. Overall, the cast is slightly weak. While in other action
movies this wouldn't be so bad, because there's so much script in Blade, the
character flaws show up more. And in some cases, characters appear without
being explained at all!
The film also suffers from a overlong running time, and the fact that the
action is too far and few between. It's a shame, because when the action
does come up, it's well handled and pretty exciting. Had the film been less
concerned with the story, and more with the action, Blade could of been a
far more enjoyable movie. Sadly, though, Blade gets too bog down in plot,
and is nothing more than an average film.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Slums of Beverly Hills (1998)
Starring Alan Arkin, Natasha Lyonne and Marisa Tomei.
Directed By Tamara Jenkins.
Running Time: 1 hour 30 minutes.
Appearing from nowhere, Slums of Beverly Hills turns out to be a pleasant
surprise. Lyonne plays teenager Vivian, who hates her large breasts. We join
her and her family during their adventures in the 'slums' of Beverly hills
(those two floored apartment buildings.) Adding some spice to the drama
Tomei who plays tearaway Rita who's just escaped from a rehab clinic and
lives with Vivian, her dad Murray (an excellent Arkin) and two brothers
Ricky and Ben (Eli Marienthal and David Krumholtz.) Also joining in the fun
is Eliot (Kevin Corrigan) their Jewish neighbour.
Although Slums is nothing more than another coming of age, it is a well made
and funny one. Jenkins, who both directed and wrote the film, has bought to
the screen a wonderfully witty, poignant film that is very hard to dislike.
Although nothing much really happens in the film as a whole, many of the
individual vinaigrettes are funny, and very truthful. Jenkins based much of
this film on her own experiences, and it shows. None of the scenes seemed
force, the whole movie feels natural. And many are downright hilarious. A
scene involving an vibrator had the whole cinema doubled over (even if the
punchline was obvious) and their are various other jokes in the film that
raise laughs.
The cast are also excellent. Lyonne brings an intense honesty to her role,
and Tomei delivers an excellent performance as the dizzy Rita (even better
than her performance in My Cousin Vinny.) Kevin Corrigan is highly memorable
as the intellectual Eliot, and the two brothers are also very good. The best
performance goes to Alan Arkin, however, as the bald headed, stressed out
father. His very natural handling of his character makes him shine through,
he has a gentle honesty about him.
While the acting and events are well realised, there are some flaws with
character development and plot. Sadly, the plot is very threadbare, it seems
more like an collection of sketches loosely tied together. And although the
characters are all likeable, they seem a little stereotypical. Jenkins tries
to develop the characters, but it comes off a little cliched, which is a
little disappointing. The movie never really strays away from the coming of
age formula.
Still, with the excellent performances, the funny jokes, and a bouncy music
score, it is very hard to dislike the movie. While there are problems with
the plot and character development that can be hard to ignore, the honesty
and humour of the film nearly wins through. Jenkins has delivered a
promising debut: let's hope she can work on the flaws for her next movie.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Sphere (1998)
(WARNER BROTHERS)
RUNNING TIME: 134 MINUTES (2 HOURS 14 MINUTES)
STARRING DUSTIN HOFFMAN, SHARON STONE, SAMUEL L. JACKSON
DIRECTED BY BARRY LEVINSON
With his successful books and movies, Michael Crichton is doing well.
With early successes with Westworld (1973) and Coma (1978), and recent films
such as Jurassic Park (1993), his films have been entertaining. However, he
seems to taken a wrong turn somewhere with Sphere. This $100 million mess by
good director Barry Levison (Disclosure) is dull, long winded, and a huge
disappointment. Considering the huge budget, the all star cast, and a story
by Crichton, Sphere is majorly disappointing.
The film opens with Norman Goodman (Hoffman), a psychologist who thinks
he is visiting an airplane crash to console the survivors. However, when he
arrives, he his told by supervisor Barnes (Peter Coyote) that he is actually
investigating an spacecraft. Along with Goodman is mathematician Harry Adams
(Jackson), biologist Beth Halperin (Stone) and Ted Fielding (Liev
Schrieber.) They investigate the spaceship, find a massive sphere inside,
meet an alien intelligence called Jerry, and basically weird crap happens.
Unfortunately, something went wrong along the way with Sphere. The film
starts off entertaining enough, but throughout this very long movie, it just
gets sillier and sillier. The film jaunts along from scene to scene, never
fully explaining what is going on. The actors and directing don't help,
either. Hoffman is on autopilot (and almost seems embarrassed) throughout
the movie, churning out dull lines, and probably wondering what the hell he
is doing in this movie. Stone is useless, displaying no emotion, and fails
to convince the audience that she has any feelings for Hoffman. The only
person who seems to be having fun in this movie is Jackson, who's funny as
the mathematician who slowly goes crazy and entering the sphere. But he's
hardly in it, and by the end of the film he is just as dull as Hoffman and
Stone. The same goes for Peter Coyote, who hams it up as the officer, but is
then killed off halfway through. The director, Barry Levinson, who directed
the better Crichton adaptation Disclosure (1994) messes up with the drama
and the action. The drama scenes are, quite frankly, boring, and the action
scenes suffer from overkill, with Levison throwing the camera all over the
place (much like the godawful Speed 2, 1997)
The writing doesn't help much, either. Although Crichton is great with
plots, he's terrible with dialogue, and practically every line in Sphere is
a dud. The speech is too simple, I was hoping it would be a bit more
intelligent.  Practically every line is just stating the obvious. None of it
is smart. Also, where the hell did the budget go? The sphere itself is
impressive, and there's a few nice special effect shots, but where the $100
million went is anyone's guess. There's a giant squid attack in the picture,
but not once does the audience see the squid, even though the film has a
massive budget. I assume the picture was trying to build up tension by not
showing the squid, and if handled correctly it probably would. But the whole
scene is done badly, and I was just hoping we could see the stupid squid.
Finally, the film has no idea what genre to be. Levison can't handle his
own plot. It leaps from hokey sci-fi, to horror, and finally The
Shining/Event Horizon psychological thriller. And, of course, the film is
very much like The Abyss (1988), although in it's defense, Crichton did
write Sphere before The Abyss was released (and is far superior to this
rubbish.) It's not all that bad though. The plot is all right, there's a few
jump scenes (although nothing very scary) and there's the occasionally
interesting bit. But overall, Sphere is a big waste of some fine talent, a
lot of money, and a potentially good movie. Not really worth seeing.
OVERALL RATING=  ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
Starring Mark Whalberg, Burt Reynolds, Julianne Moore and
Heather Graham
One way of telling if a film is good or not is by the length. If a film
is only 90 minutes, but feels like 300 minutes, then it's crap. But if
a film last 2 1/2 hours, and feels like 90 minutes, then it's excellent.
Boogie Nights falls into the latter catagory. The director,
Anderson, delivers a funny, hip, yet sometimes violent film, which
flies along.
Mark Whalberg, a.k.a Marky Mark, plays Eddie Adams, a
seventeen year old with a certain 'gift' in the midriff area. Jack
Horner (Reynolds) is a adult film director, who decides that Eddie
would be great in the adult movie business. After running away
from home, Eddie joins Jack, changes his name to Dirk Diggler,
and starts making erotic movies.
In the movie business, Dirk meets a whole load of characters
(which the film introduces very quickly and slickly) such as Scotty
(Phillip Seymour Hoffman), Rollergirl (Graham) Amber (Moore)
and Floyd (Phillip Baker Hall), and Little Bill (William H. Macy)
All the characters are well written, well played, and the audience
gets to know them pretty well, thanks to the excellent script. We
learn about Ambers grief about not being able to see her child due
to a divorce, Rollergirls hard time at school, and Little Bills wife,
who sleeps with everyone except her husband.
But the best thing about the excellent Boogie Nights is Paul
Andersons direction and writing. The direction is fast, thrilling, and
never holds up. There are some great shots, some lovely
steadiocam and handheld camera sequences, and lots of other neat
directional touches. The writing is fabulous, with some intelligent
dialogue, some funny dialogue, but none of the dialogue is crap,
like most Hollywood films (such as The Lost World: Jurassic
Park (1997), or Tommorow Never Dies (1997).) Boogie
Nights really is a spectacular feat of direction and writing, on par
(and sometimes betters) Quentin Tarantino's films Resevoir Dogs
(1992) and Pulp Fiction (1994)
The soundtrack is also excellent. Like American Graffiti (1973),
the film features some great old songs on the soundtrack, which
heightens the atmosphere, and gives the film an extra lift. Also, the
costumes are great. The clothes really do look like what people
wore in the seventies and eighties.
The film, although excellent, does have some flaws. Firstly,
Wahlberg, although excellent, cannot do highly scenes which
require him to be angry. In both scenes where he has to act angry,
his acting is so 'off', the scenes tension and anger is lost. But the
rest of the cast are excellent. Burt Reynolds is brilliant, Julianne
Moore shows real emotion, and William H. Macy is great aswell
(but he always is.) Another flaw with the film, though, is that the
ending seems a bit tacked on. It seems Anderson saw the film was
going on a bit, and needed to wrap up quickly. It's a shame, really,
as the rest of the film is perfectly paced.
But they're small niggles really. Boogie Nights is an excellent film.
Superb directing, writing, acting and music, all combine to make
one spectacular film. Whatever you do, do not miss out on
Boogie Nights.

Title
Review for Scrooged (1988)
Starring Bill Murray and Karen Allen 
Directed by Richard Donner (Lethal weapon, The Omen, Superman)
A Paramount Pictures Release
 Take a look at the following equation.... 
A CHRISTMAS CAROL+GHOSTBUSTERS=SCROOGED 
Yes, SCROOGED is the odd mixture of sentiment,
comedy and horror you would get if you mixed those two
elements toghether. SCROOGED is alternatively sick,
gross, funny, and then sickly soppy. 
Bill Murray plays Frank Cross, a T.V executive with a
horrible personality. He's evil to secretary, actors, crew,
everyone, except the T.V's station's boss, of course
(played by the late Robert Mitchum) However, he is then
visited by a very dead exec, who warns Cross that he will
be visited by three ghosts, past, present and future (who is
called The Ghost of Yet to Come, for some reason) Sure
enough, they arrive, show Cross how much of a S.O.B he
is, and he changes his way.                  
However, throughout this simple plot, we've got to suffer
outlandish special effects, poor comedy, and an very, very
mean performance from Bill Murray. Frank Cross isn't
'funny' mean, he's just mean. He also isn't very good at
emotional scenes, and totally destroys the last ten minutes
of the film, with an utterly desperate speech saying how
great christmas is, and how he has changed. However, the
supporting cast are OK, with good performances from
Mitchum, Allen (who plays his girlfriend) and John Glover
(who plays Cross's 'partner') The ghost of christmas past
isn't that bad either. Sadly, though, the audience has to
suffer 25 minutes of 'Home Alone' style violence from the
ghost of christmas present, played by Carol Kane.
Whoever thought smacking that Kane smacking Murray in
the head with a toaster was funny, should be fired straight
away. And the audience also has to suffer Bobcat
Goldthwait (the guy with the annoying voice in Police
Academy 3, if I remeber correctly....) who, thankfully,
dosen't say much. 
        The script is horrendous. Michael O'Donaghue churns out
terrible, bad taste jokes (which I guess is the whole point
really) then changes direction completely to emotional
scenes. And he must of been on some drug when he wrote
the final ten minutes, which are awful. The special effects
look nice, but do nothing for the film. There's some
impressive make up effects also. The music is also good,
which is scored by Danny Elfman. But great effects and
make up don't make a great film. SCROOGED is an
appaling attempt to inject some christmas spirit into the
audience, seeing as the first 1 hour 20 minutes of the film
are so depressing anyway, and the last ten minutes had to
make up for it with an godawful speech. Why didn't Cross
just look out his exec window, and ask a young boy to buy a
goose for him? 
Overall, then, you'd have a much better christmas if you
avoid this film like something that should be avoided
(perhaps a plague) 

Title
Review for General's Daughter, The (1999)
Starring John Travolta, Madeline Stowe and James Cromwell
Directed By Simon West
Running Time: 1 hour 56 minutes
Every once in a while comes the standard 'run off the mill' movie. It's
purpose is to tell a simple story, put in some action and comedy, a little
romance and drama, and give the star something to do. The Generals Daughter
is 1999's run off the mill movie. Travolta, looking fat and sweaty, plays
Paul Brenner, who is called in to investigate a gruesome rape and murder
case. The victim (Leslie Stefanson) happens to be the daughter of a general
(Cromwell) who is planning to run for presidency. Brenner, and rape
investigator Sara Sunhill (Stowe) try to find out who raped and murdered
her, starting with shifty suspect Robert Moore (James Woods.)
Simon West, who brought us the standard action movie in the form of Con Air,
moves onto standard thriller with this. All the elements are there: a shifty
suspect played a well known character actor, suspenseful music, and
naturally a 'thrilling' twist. Unfortunately, The Generals Daughter performs
these elements a little lazier than most other films. Although there's
action, it's not particularly exciting. The music is way to loud during
scenes that should be played quiet. The twist is largely obvious, and James
Woods doesn't get nearly enough screen time to make much of a villain. The
cliched predictability of it all makes a rather boring time for the
audience, which isn't what a thriller should be doing.
The cast go through the motions, looking forward for the pay cheque at the
end. Travolta is obviously doing this for the money, and it must be
embarrassing to have this film on his C.V along with Get Shorty and Pulp
Fiction (and, er, Michael.) He also puts on one of the most atrocious
southern accents heard in western cinema. Madeline Stowe, who hasn't had
some good work for ages, was obviously getting late for the rent payments,
and again just seems to be in this film for the money. James Cromwell delive
rs a performance so average, it's impossible to believe this is the same guy
from the excellent L.A Confidential. And James Woods is suitably over the
top as the suspect, but just disappears from the story. The actors all have
that pained, distant look that plagues every 'run off the mill' movie.
The script, written by Christopher Bertolini and, bizarrely, William
Goldman, is abysmal, and leads largely to the films downfall. Some of the
lines uttered are absolutely hideous, especially during the scene where the
two leads are searching through the victims house. The plot chunders on in
it's predictable way, pulling off virtually no surprises. The film sometimes
gets surprisingly brutal for no apparent reason. And the denouement is so
disappointing, it almost made me cry due to it's poorness (and I didn't shed
a tear throughout E.T.)
The Generals Daughter is no classic, but it's no Burn Hollywood Burn either.
It's slightly boring, deeply flawed, but it's slickly produced. Although not
really worth paying for, The Generals Daughter is perfect television
entertainment: it fills two hours and won't trouble the brain. But Travolta
really should have aimed higher.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
Here we have another trashy Jerry Bruckheimer film. And to be honest, it's
very dull, and not too exciting. This is not because there are no explosions
and stunts, it's just the fact that we've seen it all before!
The story is nearly exactly the same as Execuitve Decision, and Turbelence.
Cage plays Cameron Poe, who's going back to see his wife and kid after being
in prison for killing a man while defending his wife. So, he gets on a plane
home. However, this plane is also transporting nasty, horrible, cliched
villians, who, NO!, take over the plane. Didn't see that coming, did you?
So, Cage is now fighting for his life against these nasty crimnials. On the
ground, a 'fed' is trying to get him home safely, (played by John Cusack)
while Colm Meaney just wants to blow the plabe out of the sky.
The thing is, we've seen it all before, so it's dull, dull, DULL! If you're
looking for trashy rubbish with no oringinality however, you could do worse
than this. However, I can't really recommended it. It's just another dumb
action film!

Title
Review for Creepshow (1982)
The two masters of horror, George A. Romero and Stephen King, join toghther
to what should be a horror fans dream. However, well not really acheiving a
high level of greatness, this film is still just enough fun to past the time.
The film is done as a comic book (the comic called 'Creepshow') and takes
five of the animated stories and turns them into real life. The first one,
'Fathers Day' is not very good. It involves some dead guy rising from his
grave, searching for a cake which he never got. (Instead, he got the rather
pleasent gift of a marble ash tray smashing into his tray) Of course, the
person who smashed the ash tray into his head meets a sticky end.
The second story stars Stephen King, as an unlucky bumpkin who discovers a
meteror that turns everything into vegetation (including King) Now, although
King can write (so some people say) he most defefently CAN'T act (and
direct, as shown with MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE) And anyway, this segment just isn't
very good.
So, you're just about to switch it off, when you come to the Leslie
Nielson/Ted Danson segment. Nielson plays a jealous man who buries his
ex-wife and her new boyfriend (Danson) into the sand to drown. So he sitting
in his house, looking rather smug, and should raise from the dead, looking
rather wet (and some great makeup from Tom Savini)? Yes, thats right, Danson
and his girlfriend. And of course, they chuck Nielson into the sand to
drown. I found this segment bizzarely watchable, as Romero keeps the tension
up when Danson and friend enter the house. (Nielson has lots of cameras in
his house, and we keep seeing glimpes of the ghosts on the screens, until
they finally pop out.)
However, the last two segments are the best. The fourth segment, 'The Crate'
is great. Under the stairs of a college is a big crate, with a monster
living it. A college professor has an annoying wife, and guess what he does
to her...I found this segment great, and it also has the best comedy.
Then theres the last segment. I can't say much about this one, as it would
give it all away, but it involves A LOT of cockroaches. And theres a really
sick sequence at the end.......
So, basically with Creepshow, the first two segments are pretty awful, but
it picks up from segment three. The actings fine, and so is the direction.
Overall, a good horror movie to watch late at night.

Title
Review for Best Laid Plans (1999)
Starring Josh Brolin, Alessandro Nivola and Reese Witherspoon
Directed By Mike Barker
Running Time: 1 hour 33 minutes
Best Laid Plans is well made, well acted, well directed and a fun ride. The
film opens by introducing us to two friends, Bryce (Brolin) and Nick
(Nivola) talking in a cafe. The sexy Lissa (Witherspoon) walks in, and the
action cuts away from the cafe to Nick's answering an phone call from a
panic stricken Bryce asking Nick to come to his house straight away. When
Nick arrives, we found out that Lissa had accused Bryce of raping her, and
Bryce, in a state of confusion, has tied her up downstairs. Suddenly, the
film cuts away again, and we see how this situation came to arise.
Obviously, not everything is what as it seems.
Full of little twists and turns, Best Laid Plans is a film that can only be
watched once, but is good fun. The script is well written, and most of the
turns you won't see coming. Although the plot is nothing new,  the bulk of
the movie about a failed heist, it's done well enough to provide a lot of
entertainment value. There's also some intense scenes of tension, and the
film is paced well enough to make sure the audience is left waiting for the
next twist, and not falling asleep. This thriller gets off to a get start:
most of it is thrilling and engaging.
The largely unknown cast are also very good. Brolin is excellent as the
panicky, nieve Bryce, and while most actors would completely overdo the role
he's playing, Bryce makes his panic seem believable, not laughable.
Witherspoon, after an great turn in Pleasantville, is charming here,
although her role isn't beefy enough to produce an excellent performance.
She's watchable, however, and looks great as usual. This is an actress to
look out for. Nivola, as the cool Nick, underplays the role to great effect,
and is very watchable. His calm, cool collectiveness is great on-screen, and
he carries the whole movie. He is certainly the star of the show, in a role
that seems to be tailored made for him.
British director Mike Barker handles the film well, producing a stylish
effort. The lighting is moody, and the action is well done. There are some
great moments of direction where the audience is thrown off centre, and he
uses the camera well to heighten the moments of tension, such as the camera
swirling round a room or the characters. Unfortunately, style seems to be
slightly more important than story, and occasionally the story does suffer
due to the director working more on the look of the film. Therefore,
although the story is fun, it is also somewhat slight and shallow, and won't
be remembered for a long time after the film is over.
But, overall, Best Laid Plans is a pleasant surprise. I walked into the
movie 'blind', i.e not knowing what to expect, and I came out pleased. It is
an well made piece of filmmaking, and tells it's simple story in an
entertaining way. There's twists to keep the brain happy, visuals to keep
the eye happy, and some good dialogue to keep the ears happy. With a
talented young cast giving it their all, a great soundtrack, and good
production design, Best Laid Plans is the biggest surprise of the year so
far. If you're looking for a purely enjoyable little thriller, albeit with a
somewhat underdeveloped script,  Best Laid Plans, although no classic, is
recommended.

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Starring Arnold Schwarnegger, George Cloony, Chris O'Donnel, Uma
Thurman and Alicia Silverstone. Also starring Michael Gough as Alfred
Here's another summer blockbuster, which, although being a terrible
film, is bound to make a lot of money.  However, although there have
been many bad reviews about this film, I found it to be quite
enjoyable. Sure, the script is awful, and the one liners cringe worthy,
but I found it quite exciting. The action scenes are directed well by
Joel Schumacher, who seems quite content at pointing the camera at the
action, with the odd swooping camera shots. Clooney does a good Batman
(better than Val Kilmer, although he grins way too much) and Gough
plays the ill Alfred well. I was pleased that the story centered more
on Alfred, as he seemed to be generally ignored in the last three
films, with him just saying 'Good Luck' or helping out a bit.  The film
has it's bad points though. One of the major ones is that the bad guys
just aren't evil enough! They've softened Mr. Freeze (Arnold) so he
dosen't even really seem like a bad guy at the end of the film. Also,
Uma Thurman gives a good performance as Poison Ivy, but again, she's
not terrible evil. Also, the music surrounding her, to tell the
audience that she is 'sexy' is not necessary.  The only evil person in
the film was Ivy's sidekick, Bane, who was brilliant!
Overall then, although not a brilliantly written and acted film, I
found this film enjoyable.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 1 MINUTE
STARRING DAVID DUCHOVNY AND GILLIAN ANDERSON
DIRECTED BY ROB BOWMAN
(Nearly) everyone's favourite Sci-fi program make's it big screen debut.
Surprisingly, the movie is quite good, and can hold itself onscreen. Agents
Mulder and Scully (Duchovny and Anderson) are back in another case of
strange going on's. This time, it's about a strange black liquid that the
government want to use as a biological weapon. And, they find out about a
sinister alien plot involving aliens who want to take over the earth. Can
they stop both these things? The truth is in the movie...
The X-Files is enjoyable sci-fi hokum, with excellent special effects, good
performances and an intriguing plot. Duchovny and Anderson are fine
on-screen, although they don't attempt to do anything different from what
they're doing on television. The same goes for the whole cast, and the
writing, and the directing. In fact, the entire movie is like watching an
didn't need to be made. It could of easily had been a 45 minute or feature
length episode on television. However, what is done is done is the usual
over-indulgent (the movie starts in 35,000 B.C!) the plot is good. Although
there are a few stupid bits, it's generally O.K, and at least makes sense to
people who don't watch t.v show. (I stopped watching about 2 years ago.)
However, it does help if you have some background knowledge of the
characters, because although Mulder and Scully give background of
themselves, the rest of the characters are a bit faceless (and some are
nameless, such as "Cigarette Smoking Man.")
The direction is actually quite good, and the set-pieces are done stylishly,
and some parts are even quite scary, and heavy in tension. The 'look' of the
film is good aswell, and the music (by Mark Snow, who composes for the T.V
series) helps convey the atmosphere. Also, the special effects are
excellent, even with the movie's relatively low budget.
Overall, The X-Files is both entertaining for X-Files fans and novices.
There's enough references to the show to keep buffs happy, while nothing
closely related to the T.V show happens in the movie that would alienate
and it never really ties up all it's lose ends, and it is overlong, and the
ending is too ambiguous (that's all the gripes!) it is fun. The best summer
movie so far.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Star Trek: Insurrection (1998)
Starring Patrick Stewart, Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner and F. Murray
Abraham.
Directed By Jonathan Frakes
Running Time: 1 hour 40 minutes.
The new Star Trek movie has a lot to live up to: it is an odd numbered Star
Trek film. (The ninth to be exact.) It must therefore try to escape the
dreaded 'odd numbered Star Trek film curse,' which is that every odd
numbered Star Trek film is rubbish. (Remember number five? Ouch!)
Thankfully, while not brilliant, it is certainly not a mess by any means.
The rather silly plot centres around a planet with magical properties that
Captain Picard (Stewart) wants to protect from an alien race, led by
Abraham.
The film manages to cram in action, laughs and romance in even amounts.
Although it could be a little more light hearted (like the wonderful Star
Trek IV) the film is entertaining. The plot is alright, but there's a nice
twist in the film when it threatens to drop dead. The lines, though, are
sometimes banal, especially the ones by the inhabitants of the planet.
There's the usual philosophising and grand speeches that come part of the
Star Trek package, but there's nothing to cringe worthy in this film.
There's not as much action in the film until the very end, so the film has
to rely on the characters. They're played with the usual gusto by the Next
Generation cast, and the actors are also given the opportunity to act a
little younger. (The planet enables people to remain young.) There are some
gratuitous love scenes involving a beardless Riker (Frakes) and Troi (Marina
Sirtis), which are even more gratuitous when you consider Frakes directed
the movie. But there's some standout scenes: when LaForge (LeVar Burton)
sees a sunset with real eyes for the first time, and anything involving the
Klingon Worf (Michael Dorn) returning to puberty is also amusing. The
increasing popularity of Data (Spiner) is evident in this movie, as nearly
the entire film centres around him.
Sadly, the film is missing a enemy as menacing as the Borg in the previous
First Contact (1996.) The alien race in this film are somewhat menacing, but
Abraham isn't a strong enough presence to warrant as a 'good' bad guy.
Therefore, the Enterprise is lacking a definite evil to fight against.
Still, the bad guys look good, and they're suitable enough to keep the plot
going.
The special effects are nice, and the Enterprise is looking as fine as ever
(if a bit small.) The effects are done entirely on computer, so some parts
look like the Wing Commander game. Still, they are generally exciting, and
are used well in the action sequences. Talking about action, when it finally
arises, it's well handled, and is a break away from the heavy-handed plot
that is taken far too seriously.
Star Trek: Insurrection is fine for trekkies, and good for non-trekkers as
well. I'm not a Star Trek fan, but I enjoyed this film. It's nothing
special, and Star Wars: Episode 1 will probably whoop it's ass (sorry) but
it's good, solid entertainment. Worth watching.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Die Hard 2 (1990)
After the incredible sucess of Die Hard (1988) it would seem
obvious that a sequel would be on the way. However, this film
breaks the golden rule of sequels, which is that the sequel must be
worse than the oringinal, by actually being better. It's bigger, it's
more fun, and generally this is a much better film.
The films starts with John McClane (Willis) in Dulles Airport
waiting for his wifes (Bedelia) flight. However, the airport is soon
under the grip of the deranged Colonel Stewart, played evilly by
Sadler, who are waiting to pick up a drugs baron who is being
flown into the country (the drugs lord is played by Franco Nero)
Of course, it's up to Willis, and not the police (the cheif of police is
played by Dennis Franz, star of NYPD Blue) to save the day.
The film then follows the Die Hard genre closely, by delivering big
explosions, a few deaths, and the usual Willis one liners. The
director, Renny Harlin, who's only previous film was Nightmare
On Elm Street 4, directs very well, and Willis gives a good
performance. The best performance has to go to Dennis Franz,
who's police is very good. Sadly, William Atherton, who played
the news reporter in Die Hard, is wasted here, and serves no
purpose in the film at all. William Sadler, though, is terrific as the
Colonel. Although nowhere near as outlandish as Alan Rickman in
Die Hard, he plays Colonel Stewart with superb menace.
But, of course, no-one watches an action film for the
performances, they watch it for thrills, spills and destruction. And
here, Die Hard 2 really delivers. The airport setting gives chances
of luggage hold shoot outs, an ambush on a skywalk, and of
course planes blowing up, and Die Hard 2 gives us two planes
exploding, both with massive explosions. Die Hard 2 also features
one of the most incredible scenes in action movie history, by
showing Willis eject out of a plane, while the plane explodes below
him. It really is an incredible sight, one of the best explosions put
on film.
Fun though Die Hard 2 is, the plot is incredibly stupid (much like
any action film) The audience are supposed to believe that the
terrorists can build practically a airport tower in a church, which
could never really happen. There some other things that happen in
the film that are ridiculous aswell, such as the police taking so long
to act on this terrorist threat. The script is just about average (in
action film standards), with some in jokes for Die Hard fans, but
it's not the cleverest script in the world. 
But despite the plot flaws and weak script, Die Hard 2 proves to
be a great popcorn film, and even better than Die Hard, partly due
to the fact that it's got a far more sensible running time (just under
2 hours, unlike Die Hards 2 hours 30 minutes) An excellent action
movie

Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Starring Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore and Anne Heche
Directed By Gus Van Sant
Although this remake of Alfred Hitchcocks classic Psycho (1960) seems to
want to be taken seriously, it comes across as nothing but an oddity made by
an overly ambitious film student. The film, nearly a scene to scene remake,
comes across as pointless to those who have seen the original. The classic
story, about Norman Bates (Vaughn) who has a bloodthirsty mother who kills
Marion Crane (Heche,) who has stolen $400,000, is familiar to many. Which
means the shocks and scares the original had are nearly lost. Also, because
the film is almost exactly the same, it can't be said that this remake is an
attempt to better the original.
Still, it's a pleasant film, with no major flaws. Anne Heche is excellent as
Marion, carrying the entire first half of the film with ease. She's better
than Janet Leigh, delivering a much more rounded and tougher performance,
yet still keeping that daffy, angelic look that the role requires. Julianne
Moore as her sister is also very good, leaving an impact on the audience
even if she isn't the film very long. William H. Macy is as dependable as
ever as the the private investigator who is trying to piece together the
mystery. It's seems that it's impossible for Macy to deliver a poor
performance, and he doesn't disappoint here. But while the supporting cast
is fine, including Viggo Mortensen as Marions husband Sam Loomis, there are
some problems with Vince Vaughns performance as Norman Bates, the jittery
owner of the Bates motel. Rather than coming across as naturally nervous
like Anthony Perkins outstanding performance, Vaughn is quite obviously
faking the jitteriness, including an horribly forced giggle. His performance
is almost campy, it's like he's a bully doing an impression of the wimpy kid
at school. His frame is also too imposing to look like the nice man who is
extreme mothers boy. Considering  the film centres around his character, he
does seem to drag the film down with him. It's a shame, because the rest of
the cast were very good.
Apart from the cast and setting (the film is now set in a bizarre 1998 where
60's clothes still rule supreme) nothing much has changed from the original
shocker. Director Gus Van Sant always intended this to be as faithful as
possible, and from the Saul Bass credits sequence to the infamous shower
scene, nothing much has changed. Van Sant has basically shown what the film
would be like if it was filmed in colour. The bird symbolism still exists,
and there's a clever scene where the audience sees Hitchcocks cameo from the
original film. (A look-a-like is standing outside Marions workplace.) The
direction is fine, the script as good as it ever was, the music still
shrieking and tension inducing (the music now produced by Danny Elfman.) But
even though Psycho is an enjoyable movie, there just this strange feeling
that there's no point to this remake. Nothing has been changed (except from
the inclusion of a few butt shots just for the sake of it) and, in honesty,
Hitchcock seemed to handle the film better than today's Hollywood.
Obviously, after the success of Good Will Hunting (1997) Van Sant was given
the opportunity to direct whatever film he wanted, and it was probably his
'ambition' to recreate Psycho for the nineties. It's a nice idea, and it may
appeal to today's younger audience, but for the rest who have seen and
enjoyed the original, this reworking is somewhat a waste of time. I'd
recommend the film, but only for novelty value.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Naked Gun 33 1/3: The Final Insult (1994)
Starring Leslie Nielson, Priscilla Presley, George Kennedy, O.J Simpson,
Fred Ward and Kathleen Freeman
Leslie Nielson returns as bumbling Lieutenant Frank Drebin, in the most
slapdash Naked Gun film. Although offering some good laughs, the film
suffers from some lulls. The good thing about The Naked Gun and it's sequel
was that if one gag failed, another one would appear in about 0.5 seconds
that made you laugh out loud. Sadly, this film has a a good laugh every
four bad gags, which is not good, considering the time gap between each bad
laugh is.
The 'plot' goes as thus. Drebin has retired from police squad, settled down
with this now-wife Jane (Presley), and is enjoying married life. However,
Drebin's chief, Captain Ed Hocken (Kennedy) wants to call Drebin onto
another case, involving mad bomber Rocco, played by Ward, who is going to
blow up OSCAR night. Drebin agress, Jane finds out, she leaves him, and
Drebin has to carry on the case without her.
What follows is 1 hour 20 minutes of some great gags (the first five
minutes is a brilliant The Untouchabless spoof) some mediocre laughs, and
some downright awful laughs. This film is much more heavily slapstick
orientated than the first two Naked Gun pictures, and relies less on verbal
humour. The film moves along at an incredible pace though, this is
defintely the most fast paced Naked Gun film.
The performances are reasonable. Nielson pulls the usual mugging and
grinning at the camera, Presley is alright, but Kennedys performance seems
much different from the first two films, much more hyper than before, and
wasn't very good. Simpson is alright as Nordberg, Drebins friend, but
nothing speacial, and the same goes for Ward. The best performance, then,
goes to Kathleen Freeman (the old woman in The Goonies), who, even though
she's playing the same character she's done in every other film she's been
in, is still very funny. There is also some 'acting' from Anna Nicole
Smith, but thankfully she gets about seven lines, and didn't feature in
another major film after this one.
For all it's faults, though, Naked Gun 33 1/3 does deliver the occasional
laugh out loud gag. But it's missing something the other two films had,
which is a lot of laughs. It could be because of the new director, Peter
Segal, who never really matches David Zuckers way of directing a good gag.
Jim Abrahams and Jerry Zucker have disappeared from the writers credits
(they wrote The Naked Gun but not the sequel) which could explain again why
there are less laughs. Or, it could just boil down to that there are no
good laughs left anymore in The Naked Gun series. The Naked Gun 2 1/2
petered out a bit, so maybe the Naked Gun films should of ended there. 
In the end, then, although it has some good gags (The Untouchables spoof, a
great seventies spoof) it proves to be ultimately dissapointing. The Naked
Gun films should now be laid to rest, and Lt. Frank Drebin should retire
for good.

Title
Review for Nothing to Lose (1997)
Tim Robbins and Martin Lawernce team up in this road
movie comedy. Robbins plays an exec who discovers his
wife having sex with his boss. He goes into depression, and
drives around his neighbourhood until he arrives inside the
usual 'ghetto' side of every American city. There,
Lawernce attempts to steal his car, but to no avail, and is
dragged along with Robbin's on a trip to Arizona. There,
they hold up a store, are mistaken for two other robbers
(just like in My Cousin Vinny) and are chased by the
police, and the other robbers. Of course, there's gags along
the way, usually from Lawernce. 
Although the film is midly funny, and quite watchable,
there's something so horribly familiar about it all. This
film should really be called Beverly Hills Midnight Run
There's Lawernce with his wisecracking and heavy
profanity, just like Eddie Murphy in Beverly Hills Cop,
and pratically the same idea as Midnight Run. It's full of all
the road movie cliches, and even has a 'comedy' car chase,
which just seemed so eighties. Even the credit sequence
seemed to be out of a Steve Martin, or Chevy Chase,
eighties comedy. 
There also isn't much chemistry between Robbins and
Lawernce. In PLANES, TRAINS AND AUTOMOBILES,
there was real chemistry between Steve Martin and John
Candy. In NOTHING TO LOSE, there is hardly
chemistry at all. Towards the end the chemistry seems to
work, but for the bulk of the film, there is hardly any, 
The director directs the film in a workman like fashion, but
gets the jokes across. And although there is no chemistry
between the two leads, they give good performances on
their own. Lawerence gives a good Eddie Murphy
performance, and Robbin's is alright aswell. However,
Robbin's performance is nowhere near as good as the
characters he played in JACOB'S LADDER, and THE
PLAYER. In fact, if you want to see Robbin's do comedy
much better than in NOTHING TO LOSE, I suggest you
rent out THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, where he is much
funnier. 
NOTHING TO LOSE does have some funny moments in
it, however. The humour isn't particulary sophisticated, but
if you enojyed DUMB & DUMBER, you might enjoy this.
The characters in Arizona are funny, and there's also a
good scene where Robbin's asks a shopkeeper which
'threatening approach' was better, Lawerences (which
consisted of Lawerence threatening to shoot the
shopkeeper's ass, and swearing a lot), or himselfs, (which
was speaking in a deep, scary voice) But the gags are
predictable, the lack of chemistry infurating, and the
ending too far-fetched and 'perfect' 
NOTHING TO LOSE then, is Robbin's first 'bad' movie
(and hopefully his last), and suggests that Odereick should
twice before making another film. He nearly ruined
Carrey's career with ACE VENTURA: WHEN NATURE
CALLS, let's hope he hasn't ruined Robbin's (or even
Lawerence's) with NOTHING TO LOSE. 

Title
Review for Game, The (1997)
Following the dark and disturbing Seven, David Fincher
brings us this dark and disturbing comedy about a man
driven to the edge over a dumb game. The man is Nicolas
Van Orten, (or Gorden Gekko) played by Douglas, who is
invited to play a game by his slightly mad brother, played
by Penn. Douglas, bizzarely, accepts, and his life is turned
upside down. While for Douglas, the game is a scary
experience, for the audience, it's all a bit silly. 
One of the problems with this film is that it inserts far too
many twists into the tale, some of them making no sense at
all. Whenever the film feels like it, it will put a twist in.
This is fine for some movies, but in The Game, it frankly
gets really dumb. Also, the ending can't hold up to explain
why there are all these twists! 
Also, the ending is awful. I've seen this bad endings (like
Halloweens) but this one's is really pathetic. After having
releative fun (I just ignored the twists after a while) the
ending just spoiled the whole thing. Tragic. 
So, what are the high points? Well, the film is reasonably
good fun (if a bit overlong) and it is bound to keep you
entertained until the last ten minutes. Douglas gives us a
fine performance (even though he had already played the
same character in Oliver Stones Wall Street) and Penn is
good as the brother. Douglas's 'girlfriend' during the film is
alright, and the supporting cast are all OK as well. The
direction is adequete, if occasionaly a little dull, but it never
reaches the dizzy heights of Seven. Fincher has given us a
film that is a little better than Alien 3 (although I quite
enjoyed that movie) but nowhere near as good as Seven.
Overall, then, The Game is a silly film, yet's it fun, but
with the worst ending of 1997. Which is a shame. 

Title
Review for Dawn of the Dead (1978)
After NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, the second of the zombie films by Romero is
basically a remake, but in colour, and with A LOT of blood and guts. Like
watching zombies heads explode, people getting ripped apart, and a
screwdriver going through someones brain? You've found your film. But is
not just blood and guts. There is also lots of messages about what the
world is like today.
The film, by the way, isn't that bad. Although i wouldn't recommend this if
you're squemish, there is only one gory zombie death (involving a
screwdriver) All the others basically get their brain separated from their
body by shotgun blasts. This is the main problem with the film. It is
INCREDIBLY repitive. You just know how the zombies are going to die, and
thats with a shotgun blast. 
The zombies themselves do are really quite scary. The extras do convincing
extras, and they even though some funny things, like going up the down
escalator. (The film is set in a shopping mall, where the survivors are
hiding in) Also, we get to like the heroes of the piece quite well, and
their personalitys show well.
There are, of course, some corny lines in it ('When their no more room in
hell, the dead will walk on earth') and the ending seems a bit tacked on,
like they didn't when to end the movie. (The movie is 2hrs 20mins roughly,
which is far too long)
Sadly, then, this movie is not as frightening or as good as NIGHT OF THE
LIVING DEAD, but then again isn't as bad as some Stephen King adaptations
or other tacky horror movies. But after all the things I heard people
saying about it (It's really scary, etc) I was midly disappointed. But if
this film is at a horror season at your cinema, or showing on TV, go along
and see it. Although mindless, you will probably enjoy it.

Title
Review for Liar Liar (1997)
After the lacklustre success of The Cable Guy, you would think that Jim
Carreys career might have been over. But (sadly?) it isn't. Thankfully,
however, he has actually made a funny film. Yes, thats right, funny.
Jim Carrey plays a lawyer, who, naturally, lies. But he also lies to his son
a lot aswell. So, on his birthday
(the sons, not Carreys) he wishes that his dad cannot tell a lie for 24hrs.
And, of course, hilarous
consequences ensure. 
This film is good, mainly becuase of Carreys mugging. Watching his face
screw up when he's desprately
trying to lie is hillarous, and theres also a few good one liners in it. 
Sadly, the film gets a little too bogged down with emotion, (with a sickly
sweet sequence at the end) but
generally this film is enjoyable.
In fact, this is the funniest movie Jim Carrey has done. And its far better
than the terrible The Cable Guy. I
recommended it to anyone who finds Jim Carreys face hillarous, and people
who want to see Jim Carrey for the first time. 

Title
Review for Mad City (1997)
Mad City is a potenially good film which is ruined because Hollywood formula
takes over it. Hoffman plays news reporter Max Brackett, who while doing a
report in a museum, gets caught in a unintentional hostage situation when
former employee Sam Baily (Travolta) bursts in with a shotgun demanding his
job back. Brackett, instead of panicking his head off, calmy turns this
situation into a massive media event. Although Travolta only wanted his job
back, he's now going to become a big American hero thanks to Brackett.
Mad City has the potential to be a great movie, but sadly it never even
seems to try to be a big movie. The easiest way to find the flaws is
comparing this movie to the section 'David Wilcocks 3 points to a OSCAR
winning movie.' Let's take a look....
1) "The Movie Must Have Great Performances" Well, Mad City is 50/50 here.
Dustin Hoffman is brilliant as a news reporter under pressure, he's calm,
collective and deviously manipulating. He's having much more fun here than
other films he made recently, such as Sphere (1998). Travolta, however,
while a good actor in other films, is just O.K here. Some scenes he does
well, and he's generally good fun, but he's overshadowed by Hoffman. Sadly,
Travolta just isn't powerful enough. Alan Alda also makes an appearence as a
rival news reporter, and he adds some life to the performances
2) "The Movie Must Have Great Direction." Costa-Gravas seems to be having
fun, and there's no faults with the directing. In some scenes he directs
well (such as Travoltas heart-warming plea to the nation to get his job
back) and gets emotion out of the audience. Mainly, though, it's suprinsgly
average, and disappointing.
3) "The Movie Must Have an Intelligent Story and Script." So close here. Mad
City's story is good, but the script never does it justice. It's so basic
and flawed, and it never tries to develop the characters. Brackett remains
as the reporter who wants to get the big story, Travolta remains the
confused guy who wants his job back. In short: they're flat, 2-D characters.
The dialogue itself can sound terrible, and it's always aimed at the dumbest
person in the audience. A shame.
In the end, Mad City is too flawed and too mediorce, and throughout the
whole film I just got the feeling this wan oppurtunity missed. Although it
has flashes of brilliance, Mad City falls into the trap of 'average.'
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Starring Will Smith, Tommy Lee Jones and Vincent D'Onforio. 
Directed By Barry Sonnenfield
A Columbia Picture
Mr. Smith and Mr. Jones team up for yet another special
effect laden summer movie. And, like The Lost World,
this one isn't half bad. It centres more on the comedy and
characters than the special effects themselves, which is
damn good, and movies should follow this example! 
The Men in Black (MIB) are a agency which moniter extra
terristial life on Earth. However, these aliens don't LOOK
like aliens, they look like humans. At one point, a board
comes up showing who some of the aliens are, and these
include George Lucas and Sylvestor Stallone. A nice joke
there. Anyway, an evil alien, who steals D'Onforios skin, is
on a plot to take over the world. So, the MIB are called in
to stop this. 
What follows is 90 mins of non stop action and laughs. '90
minutes?' I hear you cry? Yes, thankfully, MIB is a very
short film. Not that it's too short. 90 minutes is the perfect
running time. It's not too much, and it's not too little.  Will
Smith does a good Eddie Murphy impression, and delivers
his jokes in his Fresh Prince style. Jones, however, does
his Leslie Nielson impression, and delivers his jokes in a
perfect deadpan way. These two comedic styles go
toghether prefectly. Rip Torn also gives a good
performance as their boss. One of the best performances is
D'Onforio. Watching him lumber around, in skin which is
too big for him, is hillarous. He dosen't say much, but he's
very, very good. However, Linda Fiorentino (The Last
Seduction, 1994) is dissapointing as a leggy coroner. Her
performance is good, but her part is hopelessly
underwritten. She just seems to be there to help with the
ending. The special effects, and the aliens created by Rick
Baker (The Nutty Professor, 1997) are excellent. 
This film may cause some trouble with easily scared
children. Although nowhere near as intense as The Lost
World, there are some scenes which could be scary, even
though they're not meant to be. So don't take the PG
rating lightly. The ending is probably the worse bit,
although they're little bits throughout which might upset
kids. Like most Spielberg adventure films, there are intense
scenes. If your child went through The Lost World OK,
though, or the Indiana Jones films, then they should get
through this OK. Overall though, I think only a few
children would be scared by this film. MIB, then, is highly
recommended. 

Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
(MIRAMAX)
RUNNING TIME: 122 MINUTES (2 HOURS 2 MINUTES)
STARRING DAVID ARQUETTE, NEVE CAMPBELL, COURTENEY COX AND JAMIE KENNEDY
DIRECTED BY WES CRAVEN
After Scream (1996) managed to pull in an over $100 million gross, it would
seem obvious that a sequel would eventually arrive. And it's arrived quickly
aswell. Wes Craven and screenwriter Kevin Wiliamson saw they were on a good
thing, as just as Scream (1996) is enjoying success on video, the sequel,
the imaginatively titled Scream 2 comes slashing onto our screens. And while
Scream 2 has got a bigger body count, and a fair amount of jump scenes, this
film is never as enjoyable as you would expect it to be.
The film opens with two college kids at the opening night of the new horror
flick that has just opened, 'Stab', based on a book written by Gale Weathers
(Cox) about the happenings in the original Scream. A nice twist is that all
the audience members are wearing the 'Scream' mask which was the killers
trademark in Scream, so when the two college kids are viciously killed in
the cinema, the amount of culprits is overwhelming. The news of the killing
reaches Sidney Prescott (Campbell), one of the survivors from the prequel,
and when Casey 'Cici' Cooper it killed by a guy in a 'Scream' mask, it looks
as though the killings are starting all over again. Prescott, along with
Weathers, Randy Meeks (Kennedy), and Dewey Riley (Arquette) join together to
find out who's performing the killings.
For a spoof, Scream 2 takes itself awfully seriously. The death scenes
aren't funny, if anything that actually quite nasty. Scream 2 seems to poke
fun at all the clichés in horror movies, then pulls off a whole load of
clichés itself. Most of the time, it's pretty obvious what's going to happen
next. Also, because the killer is a normal person, not some supernatural
monster (like Freddy Kruegar) there's only a limit to what the killer can
do, so most of the deaths are pretty boring (and as said above, strangely
nasty.) The characters are also meant to be horror movie fans, and know the
tricks of the horror movie trade, but some of the things they do are
surprisingly stupid. For example, Campbell is stuck in a car with the
unconscious killer. Instead of shooting him with a gun that's close to her,
and then unmasking the killer, she goes out a window, and runs to a deserted
theater, leaving the killer free to escape (when she/he wakes up) and chase
her.
Although the story may be flawed, the performances are fun, and the dialogue
is funny. There's in-jokes about the movies, and there's also a funny scene
where Randy and Dewey are discussing the culprits (although you've probably
already seen this clip in the trailers.) While the scare scenes rely more on
the killer popping out from nowhere and loud music suddenly playing, there's
some suspenseful scenes, such as when Gale is being chased around a sound
studio, and the first five minutes. But you don't feel scared throughout,
and most of the time it's obvious when the killer is going to show itself,
the film is so clinched.
Wes Craven directs well enough, he handles the jump scenes well, and he
isn't too bad with the 'serious' bits either. Kevin Wiliamson script,
although predictable, is fun, and the film zips along like some demonic
roller coaster. Two hours is a bit long for a horror movie though, and the
ending is weak, and stretched out far too long (and, again, is entirely
predictable.) The soundtrack is good, although if you've seen Broken Arrow
(1996), the music will sound very familiar (the film uses the Broken Arrow
soundtrack.)
In Scream 2, there's a scene where a film class is discussing whether
sequels are better than the originals. Randy points out that the prequel is
always better. In the case of Scream and Scream 2, his argument is correct.
OVERALL RATING= *** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
Š1998 David Wilcock
 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Prince of Egypt, The (1998)
Starring The Voices Of: Val Kilmer and Ralph Fiennes
Directed By Brenda Chapman, Steve Hickner and Simon Wells.
Running Time: 1 hour 37 minutes
After the average Mouse Hunt, the silly Small Soldiers and the entertaining
Antz, Dreamworks try again with the children's film market with this
stunning adaptation of the Moses story. As the film warns us at the
beginning, it's not the full story, and some liberties have been taken, but
generally this the Bible story we all know and love, featuring burning
bushes, the plagues and the parting of the red sea. The only thing missing
is Charlton Heston. Instead, we get Val Kilmer voicing Moses, an hebrew who
is placed in a river by his mother and rescued by the Queen of Egypt (Helen
Mirren.) We flash forward several years to see Moses and brother Rameses
(Fiennes) all grown up. Moses soon finds out from brother and sister Miriam
and Aaron (Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum) that he isn't really the son of
the Pharaoh Seti (Patrick Stewart) and that it his destiny to free the
Hebrews from the Egyptians tyrannical rule. He soon sets about this, along
with his wife Tzipporah (Michelle Pfeiffer.) Rameses and his two wizard
friends (voiced by Steve Martin and Martin Short) try to stop Moses
completing his task.
While the plot is familiar and somewhat exciting for adults, for children
reared on Aladdin and Hercules, this film could  be the most godawful thing
they've ever seen. Gone is the quick fire humour and standard, easy to
follow plot. But, spectacularly, and to Dreamworks credit, nearly every
child in the audience was captivated by the story and events happening on
screen. Jeffrey Katzenberg, who produced this film, certainly knows how to
keep a child interested. He's included some songs in the film, plus some
comedy, and a exciting chariot chase, to keep the children interested. And
somehow, himself and the directors still manage to get all the drama and
intensity of the story across, without ever being boring. It's a remarkable
achievement.
Also remarkable is the animation, which puts Hercules, an almost 'slap dash'
effort, to shame. Relying on hand drawn and computer animation, the
backgrounds and characters are amazingly detailed. The film seems a little
caught up with it's amazing visuals by showing a lot of sweeping visuals and
'moving' shots, but they _do_ look incredible. The final 'plague' where God
kills every first born child, and the parting of the red sea have to be seen
to be believed. Kudos to the animators.
The vocal talent is also very good. Val Kilmer does a fine job as Moses
(although he doesn't sing) and Ralph Fiennes is superb as Rameses (and he
_does_ sing.) Sandra Bullock and Jeff Goldblum are great, and Steve Martin
and Martin Short are very good, but not in the film long enough. Finally,
Michelle Pfeiffer does excellent work as Moses wife. Kudos also goes to the
voice of God, who instead of booming and bombastic is quiet and subdued.
Sadly, he is uncredited, and I couldn't quite work out who the voice was.
(But e-mail if you do.)
The songs are good, ranging from the usual love sonnets to the traditional
big production number. They don't disturb the movie, and while not
particularly memorable, they are nice to listen to (they're well sung
aswell.) The musical score is suitably epic, with some beautiful tunes.
Coupled with the superb visuals, The Prince Of Egypt is a visual and aural
treat, backed up with a great story. Entertaining both for kids and adults,
this film is a must see.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Analyze This (1999)
Starring Robert De Niro, Billy Crystal and Lisa Kudrow
Directed By Harold Ramis
Running Time: 1 hour 43 minutes
Although many people have compared this new gangster comedy to the hit HBO
drama 'The Sopranos,' Analyze This is witty and entertaining enough to be a
good movie in it's own right. Billy Crystal plays wiseguy shrink Ben Sobol,
who new 'patient' happens to be gangster boss Paul Vitti (De Niro.) Ben
wants nothing to do with Vitti, as he's about to get married to Laura
MacNamara (Kudrow) and having a gangster as a patient wouldn't really help.
But Ben is soon drawn into Vitti worlds, and reluctantly helps Vitti to sort
his life out. All done in a comic fashion, of course.
Although never brilliant, Analyze This is also never rubbish, which makes
for a fun ride. Billy Crystal, who hasn't had a good role since City
Slickers way back in the early '90's, is given a role that lets him fully
exploit his wiseguy act. He's pretty funny while he does it, and although
his character is a little close to his character in City Slickers, he's
pretty funny. Robert De Niro is hilarious as Vitti, playing it dead straight
but coming off as really funny. He's a serious gangster unaware that he is a
comic gold mine. Lisa Kudrow, barely seen as Crystals' estranged wife to be,
basically reprises her Phoebe role from T.V series Friends, which is getting
rather tiresome, and doesn't come off well on the screen. The supporting
cast is apparently made up of the entire cast of Casino and Goodfellas, and
are all funny caricatures, especially Vitti's bodyguard Jelly (Joe
Viterelli.)
The film genuinely plays like a proper gangster movie, but with laughs
instead of hard ass talking. It sometimes gets a little bloody for a light
hearted film, but it strangely fits in. Spoofs are made of famous gangster
movies, including a nice parody of The Godfather. The Italian tunes playing
throughout the soundtrack contribute to the fun. There's also some odd plot
points: FBI guys appear and suddenly disappear for no apparent reason. It is
true that Analyze This has had a somewhat chequered production history, and
perhaps the plot points were expanded in a earlier version of the script.
Unfortunately, this is Hollywood, so we will never know.
Harold Ramis, best known as Egon from Ghostbusters, has a deft touch with
directing comedy, as shown in the immortal Groundhog Day, and the less
immortal Caddyshack. All the comic potential in a scene is dug out and
presented to the audience. The script, written by Ramis along with Peter
Tolan and Ken Lonergan, starts off funny, remains funny for the most of the
film, but sadly peters out somewhat during the last twenty minutes where it
wrongly enters more serious territory. The film is short, however, and just
before audience interest is waning the film suddenly goes into a rather
rushed and unsatisfying ending and the credits roll.
Analyze This is a good comedy, and is certainly worth watching. Robert De
Niro sobbing is reason enough to watch it, even though it does seem forced,
or like a parody (although I think this was intentional.) Crystal is his
most likeable in years, Kudrow is given as little screen time as possible,
which is a good thing, and De Niro is just awesome. It's no Goodfellas, and
it probably won't be remembered as much as Groundhog Day, but Analyze This
is a well done comedy that won't leave you feel cheated.

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Starring the voices of Dave Foley and Kevin Spacey
Directed By John Lasseter and Andrew Stanton
Running Time: 1 hour 36 minutes.
After the huge success of Toy Story (1995), animation studio Pixar could
probably get away with an animated bouncing cupboard for 96 minutes and
still make a fortune. Fortunately, they've produced a film that almost meets
the quality of the aforementioned toy caper. Dave Foley voices Flik, an
everyday ant who happens to lose all the food picked for the grasshoppers,
led by Hopper (Spacey.) When Hopper demands that the ants pick double the
amount of food for them before the rainy season starts, Flik concocts a plan
to bring back bigger warrior bugs to help defeat the grasshoppers when they
return. However, Flik brings back circus bugs instead of warriors, and the
colony have to think quickly before the grasshoppers return.
Obvious comparisons can be made to Dreamworks Antz here: computer graphics,
insects, the small ant trying to defeat a much bigger enemy, dealing with
being the 'little guy' etc, although to be fair, A Bugs Life was developed
first.  However, this being a Disney film, Flik is not a neurotic New Yorker
who's best friend happens to be Rambo. But still, comparisons will be made.
And in all fairness, A Bugs Life is the better movie, offering more fast
paced action, and a story and characters appealing to both children and
adults, unlike Antz, which wasn't sure where it was going. The easiest way
to watch this movie if you've seen Antz, then, is to remember this a
completely different type of movie.
A Bugs Life is funny, vibrant looking and appealing to all ages. While the
story is slim, and serves as nothing but a thin wire to string together a
series of impressive set pieces, their is plenty of entertainment offered
here. The computer graphics are fantastically realised, and look light years
beyond Toy Story, thanks to the three years advancement in computer
technology. All the characters are well realised and look great, the
backgrounds are nicely detailed, and some of the special effects are very
good. The best thing, however, is that after 10 minutes of being wowed, you
soon forget about the great graphics, and just get on with enjoying the
movie, unlike Antz, that always seemed to remind you were watching an
computer graphic instead of really enjoying the characters and story.
Talking of characters, the ones featured in A Bugs Life are great and very
likeable. Flik is a good hero with a heart of gold, Julia Louis-Dreyfuss is
fine as Princess Atta, and the circus troupe are bubbling with personality,
featuring voices from David Hyde Pierce and Madeline Khan amongst others.
But Kevin Spacey has the most fun as the evil Hopper, although at some
points I thought he might start babbling about Keyser Soze or produce Fliks
girlfriends head in a box.  But that's the effect Spacey has on me. And
thankfully, unlike Antz, A Bugs Life is not hampered by one poor performance
(unlike Sharon Stones 'effort' in Antz.)
The set pieces are exciting and inventive: theirs an exciting chase from a
bird and the 'Flaming Death' sequence in the circus has to be seen to be
believed. Some scenes could be too intense for the very young: a few
children starting bursting into tears every time Hopper came onto the
screen. Perhaps Spacey is a little too intense for the young ones.
There are some faults with the film, however. The script and story is weak,
and never reaches the standard set by the delightful Toy Story. The moral of
the story is drummed in shamelessly on the audience. The cast is also
missing a truly strong leading man: while Dave Foley is fine, he hasn't got
the same presence as Tom Hanks or Tim Allen. And just as things were going
great, the film chucks in a Randy Newman song at the end. Dang. But other
than that, A Bugs Life is truly great, if not ground breaking, entertainment
that can be enjoyed by everyone.
And don't even think about leaving the cinema until you've seen the
'outtakes' from the movie during the credits. Pure Pixar genius.

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Starring Warren Beatty, Halle Berry and Oliver Platt
Directed By Warren Beatty
Running Time: 1 hour 40 minutes.
Warren Beatty returns to the screens in the   funniest, craziest and hard
hitting movie in his career. Based on a story concocted by himself, and also
written by Beatty, Bulworth gives a good insight of what Beatty thinks of
the American government system. Beatty stars as Senator Jay Bulworth, who's
going through a nervous breakdown. After hiring someone to kill him, he
completely changes his campaign strategy and tells the honest truth about
what's _really_ happening in American politics, much to the annoyance of
assistant Dennis Murphy (Platt.)   Instead of everyone hating him, the
American public love him. However, inside his party, more people want to
kill him than just the hired assassin. And he also strikes a relationship
with black girl Nina (Berry.)
It's remarkable that this film was released at all. Much more open than the
rather subdued Primary Colours, Bulworth barely gives the American politic
system a good name. The outrageous remarks Bulworth makes to his potential
voters are very funny, and also somewhat true. It's great that Beatty isn't
afraid to let loose on a subject. Talking of Beatty, he's excellent in the
role of the demented Senator, clearing having fun. And seeing Warren Beatty
have fun is a rare sight indeed. Even in Dick Tracy, he was the most
straighten face actor. (Then again, he was the only characters face we could
completely see.) The film gives an opportunity for the 61 year old Beatty to
indulge in some rapping, which he does with gusto (and also quite well.) And
seeing Beatty as a 'homeboy' has to be seen to be believed. It's nice to see
that Beatty can laugh at himself. Second best is Oliver Platt as the
flustered, coke snorting assistant, who goes over the top when he finally
snaps. Halle Berry is fine, and sexy, as the intellectual Nina, who comes to
like the senator. Also popping up in the supporting cast is Paul Sorvino wit
h a strange accent, Laurie Metcalf as the exact same characters she's also
played, and Christine Baranski of Cybill fame as Bullworths wife, who all
contribute to the fun. And, this being a political film, the ubiquitous
Larry King makes an appearance, as, *shock*, himself.
The writing and directing, both by Beatty, are above par. The direction is
very nearly sitcom like, but suits the film perfectly, and both the politics
are gangland parts are handled well. The script is funny, and the raps are
actually well produced and humorous, and quite clever. They're not cringe
inducing, at least. The script makes many points about society in America
today, and isn't afraid to make any bold statements about what is a flawed
system. Best of all, the film is thought provoking, but directed and written
in such a way that the film feels as light as a feather, and is very
entertaining. There's also a great rap soundtrack with some well chosen
tunes.
Bulworth is a film with many advantages, and few flaws. Perhaps it could be
somewhat embarrassing to see a 61 year old man rapping, but Beatty does it
so well it's irrelevant. In fact, there's very little against Bulworth,
except for the language which is very heavy, but then again it should be
expected. Bulworth, then, is well worth watching.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Receive Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
After Heavenly Creatures, Peter Jackson returns to the genre that
started him off...the over the top horror comedy. Sadly, this is not as
over the top as some of his other films (Dead Alive, Meet the Feebles)
but is still very good fun. Fox plays a ghost exterminator who can
really see ghosts, thanks to an near death experience that he had. He
is running a scam by making the ghosts he knows mess up people houses a
bit, and then he comes and gets 'rid' of them. However, things start to
go weird when people really are being visited by a ghost who gives
their heart a bit of a squeeze. The suspicion falls to Fox, and he must
prove his innocence.
One of the main things about this film is the speacil effects. And they
really are quite speacil. The ghosts faces get ripped off, ceilings
ripple, and the Soul Taker is a very impressive piece of speacil
effects. And, even the plot if quite good. However, don't take this
film as a proper comedy. The main emphasis is on gore etc, and there is
a lot of it.
If there is one bad thing about this film, it will have to be Jeffrey
Combs FBI agent. He is way over the top, and is irritating after a
while. Also, he is not really needed in the picuture, and his charecter
should've been toned down if they wanted an FBI agent that much.
Another bad thing about the film is the gaping plot holes. For example,
when Fox dies, he can walk though the floor, while the other ghosts
can't.  Also, although ghosts can interact with anything, John Astins
character sits down in a chair! They are also many other gaps like
this. But because you're enjoying yourself so much, you never really
think about these things until after the movie.
So, overall, this is a good film, and if you can stand blood and guts
and intense speacil effects, then this is the film for you.

Title
Review for Twilight Zone: The Movie (1983)
STARRING DAN ACKROYD, ALBERT BROOKS, VIC MORROW, SCATMAN CROTHERS, KATHLEEN
QUINLAN AND JOHN LITHGOW.
DIRECTED BY JOHN LANDIS (Prolouge and first sequence), STEVEN SPEILBERG (2nd
segment), JOE DANTE (3rd segment) and GEORGE MILLER(4th segment).
The T.V programme with THAT theme tune hit the big screen with this iffy
movie. This is a film which starts off ok, goes rapidly downhill, then
shoots up again at the end. Let me explain.....
The movie starts quite well. We have a comedy segment with Dan Ackroyd and
Albert Brooks, which gives a nice short thrill to begin with. We then get
the theme music, Burgess Merideths voice whispers we have entered the
'Twilight Zone' and the first segment starts. Ah. Now it goes a bit wrong...
The segment stars Vic Morrow (he was decapitated on the set of this film by
an helicopter) who plays a racist man who gets a taste of his own medicine
when he is flung to Nazi Germany, then to the Ku Klux Klan, and then to
Vietnam (all thanks to the TWILIGHT ZONE!!) However, this segment is more
predictable than a very predictable thing, and gets very boring. So, lets
give the second segment a chance, eh?
The second stories even worse. It's about a few old folks who get young
again, thanks to kicking Scatmans can. This is very slickly done by
Speilberg, but is so slick you just get bored. Again. And, the outcome is
entirely predictable again.
But, just like CREEPSHOW(1982), things get better with the 3rd segment. This
weird story, directed by Dante (Gremlins) is actually quite good. Quinlan
gets invited into the house of a boy that telephaically projects what the
house should be like. His visions are really weird, and the art design makes
this story very watchable. It's certainly much better than the first two.
But then we come to Lithgows story, which is the best thing in the film.
Lithhgow plays a terrified airplane passenger, who thinks he can see a
monster on the wing, ripping it up. But there can't possible be a monster
out there, can there?? Lithgows performance is brilliant, and the direction
good, keeping up the tension.
So, is this worth watching? Well, skip past the first two stories (or you
may for asleep) and just watch the last two. This is the best way to get the
most enjoyment out of this film. But don't forget to watch the prolouge....

Title
Review for Devil's Advocate, The (1997)
Running Time: 145 minutes (2 hours 25 mins)
Starring Keanu Reeves, Al Pacino and Charliz Theron
Directed By Taylor Hackford
You can see straight away why Pacino decided to play the role of
John Milton in this below average shocker. That's because, of
course, he gets to play Satan himself, complete with rantings,
sticking out of tongue and menacing eyes. Sadly, although Pacino
seems to be having a good time with this film (probably because he
is getting paid to shout and scream), there is hardly any
entertainment here for the audience at all.
Reeves plays hotshot Florida lawyer Kevin Lomax, who has never
lost a case. After successfully defending a school teacher accused
of sexually abusing a schoolgirl, he is approached by an employee
of Milton law firm, who offer Lomax a job. Lomax accepts,
unaware that his boss, John Milton, is the Devil, played well, if a
bit over the top, by Pacino. Kevin's wife Mary Ann (Theron)
reliases that Milton is the devil long before Kevin does, but she
slowly goes crazy and then dies. It's then up to Kevin to confront
Milton in a showdown complete with shouting and over the top
special effects. 
The entire film is directed in a slapdash fashion by Hackford, with
many scenes looking messy, and badly planned and directed. The
acting, apart from Pacino, isn't too good either. Reeves is rubbish,
with his Florida accent disappearing and reappearing every so
often. Sometimes, he even seems to be mumbling his lines, with the
audience unable to work out what he is saying. And his face can't
show emotion, so we never really know what he's thinking or
feeling. Finally, all his lines are said in the same tone of voice, much
like David Duchovney of X-Files fame. Theron is marginally
better, but she dosen't really have to do much in the film, apart
from act mad, and cry a little. In fact, she is pretty much wasted in
the film, serving no real purpose whatsoever.
It's up to Pacino, then, to carry the film, and when he's on screen,
the film picks up. He seems to be having such a good time, the
audience starts to enjoy themselves aswell. Sadly, as soon as he's
off the screen, it's back to watching Reeves, who is boring,
unintresting, and totally inferior to Pacino. Also, the supporting cast
are unremarkable, with average performances from Jeffrey Jones
(Beetlejuice, 1988) and Craig T. Nelson (Poltergeist, 1982).
Even the god worshipping, religous character (in this case Kevin's
mother), usually hillarous in horror movies, is dully played by Judith
Ivey. 
Another problem with the film is that it can't make out what genre
it wants to be. The title, The Devils Advocate, immediatly
conjures up images of a horror movie. But the bulk of the film is
based on a court case, so The Devils Advocate is one of the
wierdist mish-mash of genres ever, the courtroom-horror. The
problem, though, is that the courtroom sequences are basic, and
the horror just isn't scary. The film should of made it's mind on
what genre it was going to be, and stuck to it.
Apart from Pacino's performance, there is one other thing that
saves the film from getting a one star rating. And it is, amazingly,
the special effects. Usually, effects make a film worse, but here,
they actually make the film better. They are subtle, actually quite
disturbing, and great fun. Sadly, there is some effect overkill during
the last twenty minutes, but they are used throughout the rest of the
film very well. 
The Devils Advocate, then, is not scary, not exciting, and
generally just not very good. As a vehicle for Pacino, it's perfect.
As an entertaining horror movie, or even courtroom drama, it falls
flat on it's face, due to poor scripting and underwritten, and
underplayed, characters (apart from Milton, of course). The
Devils Advocate, then, is hugely dissapoiting. 

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
(DREAMWORKS SKG)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS
STARRING ROBERT DUVALL, TEA LEONI AND ELIJAH WOOD
DIRECTED BY MIMI LEDER
The first of the two asteroid movies coming out this year (the second is the
macho Armageddon) is actually a dull affair. Elijah Wood plays Leo
Biederman, who during Astronomy class discovers that a large asteroid is
heading for earth. Tea Leoni plays a (rather crap) news reporter, Jenny
Lerner, who soon discovers about this asteroid through a very long winded
and boring way, and Robert Duvall plays the leader of a space crew, Spurgeon
Tanner, who are planning to blow the asteroid out of the path of Earth. Also
featuring is Morgan Freeman as the President, and Maximilian Schell and
Vanessa Redgrave as Jenny's father and mother.
While many people will walk into the film expecting a big special effects
fest with the asteroid blowing everything up (as the trailers seem to
promise), the film is actually more of a character study, if a very poor
one.
The main problem is that there are too many characters in the film, and not
enough time to explore them all. Only the space crew are given any depth,
Jenny Lerner, Leo and the president are surprisingly 2D, and we never get to
know these characters. And because I couldn't care for them, I didn't really
give a crap if the asteroid killed them or not. The script by Bruce Joel
Rubin and Michael Tolkin is horribly simple, and never really makes any
interesting statements.
Mimi Leder, the former ER director and director of the average The
Peacemaker (1996), again directs in a ho-hum style, and never really gets
any emotion out of a scene, which is a shame. The cast are seemingly on
autopilot, although Tea Leoni does gives a rather good performance, even if
she acts a bit too dorky for her own good. She seems uncommonly stupid for a
journalist. Robert Duvall is on autopilot with a underwritten role, he just
seems to be in this film for the money. Elijah Wood, one of the best child
actors working today, is surprisingly average, although his choice of roles
lately haven't exactly been brilliant (i.e. Flipper, 1996). His role is also
vastly underwritten.  Morgan Freeman, again, is utterly wasted with a
ridiculously underwritten role. Like Duvall, he just seems to be in the film
for the money. The supporting cast are all O.K, none making much of an
impression.
OK, so Deep Impact may have messed up character wise, but surely the special
effects are good? Well, yes and no. Although the special effects should be
impressive, with a massive tidal wave destroying New York, the special
effects look like, well, special effects. Sadly, the waves looks like it's
been drawn on computer, and doesn't look too good at all. Surprising really,
when the effects are done by Industrial Light & Magic, who did the effects
for The Lost World and Twister.
In the end, Deep Impact is a wasted opportunity. What could of been a moving
movie with good effects turns out to be a dud in both characters and
effects. The 2 hours the film had could have been used to much greater
effect. Once again, Dreamworks has churned out another average movie. Let's
hope Armageddon is a bit better.
OVERALL RATING= ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
WEB SPACE PROVIDED BY GEOCITIES
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
After the pretty awful Dantes Peak, we get the second of 'unknown volcano
erupts in unaware city' disaster film. However, the place in question isn't
a small town, like in Dantes, but Los Angeles. Dosen't really matter
though. This film is just as awful as Dantes Peak (but is saved a bit by
Jones) 
The 'plot' is about odd things going on in L.A, some scientists trying to
tell people that there is something odd, everyone ignoring them, and then
big s*** happening. No, you haven't clicked on a review for Dantes Peak,
it's because both films are exactly the same Tragic. 
Jones gives a good performance in a character that is impossible to 'act'
It's the most flat, boring action hero ever. However, Jones is always to
ready to save a film, and here he does it quite well. But he can't quite
save it from the pits of rubbish. Like Willem Dafoe in Speed 2, he's the
best thing in the film, but he can't save it due to a poor script. Some of
the speacial effects are quite good, especially the final shots, but some
models are so horrendously fake I had no choice but to laugh manically.
Also, some of the things the characters say are unbeliviable. For example,
at the end of the film, a fireman asks a five year old boy where his mother
is. He lifts the boy onto his shoulder. The boy then looks at everyone
(whos faces are covered in ash) and utters (and I swear he says this) 'Look
at their faces. They all look the same.' The Coca-Cola very nearly shot out
my nose I was laughing so hard. 
  
This film is nonsense really. I suppose if you like these big budget
bonanza's, you'll probably like this. Maybe if it was raining, there was
nothing on TV, and all your friends were on holiday, and you had NOTHING TO
DO, you might want to see this, (after all, Tommy Lee Jones is in it) It's
better than Dante's Peak. But that's not much of an recommendation. 
Overall Rating=** out of ***** (Hollywood nonsense, saved by Jones.
Almost.) 

Title
Review for Return to Paradise (1998)
Starring Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche and Joaquin Phoenix
Directed By Joseph Rubin
Running Time: 1 hour 41 minutes
Return to Paradise is a grim thriller that tries hard to impress, but is
somewhat flawed. Sheriff (Vaughn), Lewis (Phoenix) and Tony (David Conrad)
are three friends who spend time in Malaysia drinking, having sex, and
smoking lots of hash. Tony and Sheriff eventually leave, but Lewis, an
Greenpeace activist, stays to help introduce urangutangs back to the their
habitat. However, he is shortly busted by the police, and his stash o' hash
is found. Back in Brooklyn, Beth (Heche), Lewis's lawyer, appears from
nowhere, telling Sheriff and Tony that if they don't come back to Malaysia
and accept some of the blame, Lewis will be hung. Sheriff and Tony then have
to make the moral decision.
Return to Paradise falls into the dreaded trap: it's an 'okay' movie. That
is, there is nothing particularly special about it, but nothing truly awful
either. The performances are fine, and Anne Heche, after her 2.D characters
featured in Six Days Seven Nights and Psycho, has a potentially better
character to work with, and  the chemistry  with Vaughn works well. Although
the film seems somewhat disinterested with Heche's character on occasion,
she plays the role well enough. Vaughn is great as Sheriff, delivering a
fine performance. His transition from a stubborn 'no, I'm not going' to
seriously thinking about it is well played and delivered, but again the
script just doesn't do enough justice, and Vaughn himself makes the
character work. It's up to Phoenix, as the most underwritten character in
the film, to give the best performance, and nearly all of his scenes have a
harrowing reality about them, especially the unexpected, and scary, ending.
But although the actors are great, the characters themselves act, and talk,
like soap opera stars. The script and story are sometimes surprisingly
amateurish, the sort of thing you'd expect to be on television late night
with the title 'Return To Paradise: The True Story of Lewis.' The ending,
although harrowing, is somewhat unbelievable, and there is a tacky sex scene
thrown in between Heche and Vaughn, which doesn't help the movie at all. And
the final scene, a reunion between Heche and Vaughn, is overplayed and
irritatingly sloppy, almost strangling the audience to emit some kind of
emotion from them. It's a shame, because when the scenes work, they really
work, and the gritty realism of some of the scenes give the idea that this
film could of been much better than it actually is.
The direction is good, although it works far better during the second part
of the film, in Malaysia. The prison scenes are unsettling, and work well.
But there's some problems with the pacing, and the film seems really long
winded at some points, almost as if it were padding. But generally, like
everything else in the movie, the direction is just good,  not brilliant nor
pathetic.
Return to Paradise is a admirable attempt, but something is missing to make
it an truly engaging epic. There is enough entertainment on offer, but
occasionally this largely well made movie just does some things hopelessly
wrong. The film raises some interesting questions, and pulls some surprises,
but overall it seems like it's underachieving. It's worth watching for the
strong performances of the cast, but Return to Paradise is a T.V drama that
tries to be a lot more, but doesn't always succeed.

Title
Review for Gremlins (1984)
Starring Zach Galligan, Phoebe Cates, Hoyt Axton, Scott
Brady and Polly Holliday
This Steven Spielberg produced film became another hit for him,
even if he didn't direct it. The film opens with Ran Peltzer (Axton)
walking around in Chinatown. He walks into an odd shop, run by
a very old chinese man (Keye Luke) An odd creature called
Gizmo, who is a mowlgi. Ran buys the pet, three rules are told to
him (no water on Gizmo, no bright light, and don't feed him after
midnight, classic fairy tale stuff) and Ran gives Gizmo to his son,
Billy (Galligan) Of course, the rules are broken, and a group of evil
creatures start terrorising the quiet town of Kingston Falls (a very
Spielberg place), where Billy lives.
The problem with the film, though, is that Gremlins don't really get
into swing until one hour into the movie, when the Gremlins drive a
snow plough through a house. It's non stop action from there on.
But before that, the story has to be set up, and Chris Columbus
(Home Alone, Mrs Doubtfire) script has to keep the audiences
attention. Sadly, his script does start to lag, but thankfully, the
performances and direction don't. Galligan, Cates (who plays Billy
girlfriend), Judge Reinhold (Ruthless People, Beverly Hills Cop)
and Dick Miller (Twilight Zone The Movie) are all good,and push
the film along. Polly Holliday is reasonable funny in the role of Mrs
Beagle, even if her role is hopelessly underwritten. Joe Dante
directs well, making sure he can get the best out of the
performances.
But the best performances come from Gizmo, voiced by Howie
Mandel, and the Gremlins. Gizmo is sickingly cute, and has got
real character. The Gremlins, designed by Chris Walas (who did
makeup effects for The Fly) are sickingly sick, and are really
funny. Here, Joe Dante really shows what he's good at directing,
which is manic comedy/horor. There are some great deaths, some
silly scenes, and some groan worthy gags, but the film really gets
going when the Gremlins finally start to cause chaos. Here,
thankfully, any hope of a script disappears, and Columbus just gets
on with the mischief.
Stick with the film, then, and it's ultimately rewarding. With some
good music by Jerry Goldsmith (Total Recall, Star Trek: The
Motion Picture) an excellent supporting cast (Dick Miller is very
good) and some good (although nasty) laughs, the last 50 minutes
of Gremlins is some of the best black comedy you are ever going
to see. If only a stronger scriptwriter was hired, then maybe the
first hour would be excellent also. Gremlins 2 is better than this,
because it didn't have to explain much back story, and it was more
enjoyable generally. Gremlins, then, although flawed, is still
recommended.

Title
Review for Peacemaker, The (1997)
Although it's another action flick, this film will be looked at more
closely than others. Why? Because it's the first film from Steven
Spielbergs new production company, Dreamworks SKG. Hopefully, not all
their films will be like this one.  A nuclear missile has been
'stolen' by a terrorist group, and it's up to Clooney and Kidman to
stop the nutty terroists from setting it off in New York. It basically
involves them running around exotic locations, tracking down the
terrorists. There's some good action sequences in there, but this film
is decidely average.
The film is directed OK, and there are a few good scenes (including
one with a car hanging over a cliff) But there's nothing startingly
orinigal about it. The plot is hardly orinignal or exciting, which is
not a good start for a new studio. It's also hard to see why this film
cost $50 million to produce, as the special effects are nothing
special.
The performances are OK, with Clooney giving us the Clooney grin
throughout, and Kidman looking lovely, but not being able to work with
a strong character. The bad guy, however, is excellent. He's not an
outright nutter, such as Daefoe in Speed 2, but a normal, calm, and
disturbed nutter, who believes what he is doing is right. He's very
good. The direction (from a director previously from T.V's ER) is
fine, and there are some striking scenes (but not much)
Dosen't look too good, then, for Dreamworks so far. What they've
delivered is a sub-standard film, which will be forgotten as soon as
it's finished it's video release.  It's a shame really, this could of
been an potential Raiders of the Lost Ark. But with a dull plot,
standard acting, and average action scenes, and a rather large budget,
it's all a bit of a letdown for Spielbergs new studio. Maybe if he had
some creative input into it, it would of been better. Overall, then,
disappointing.

Title
Review for Jackie Brown (1997)
(MIRAMAX)
RUNNING TIME: 154 MINUTES (2 HOURS 34 MINUTES)
STARRING PAM GRIER, SAMUEL L. JACKSON, ROBERT FORSTER, BRIDGET FONDA AND
ROBERT DE NIRO.
DIRECTED BY QUENTIN TARANTINO
Before starting, I'll get the obvious out of the way first. Jackie Brown is
not as good as Reservoir Dogs or Pulp Fiction. Right, now I'll get to
reviewing the film on it's own (without comparing to Tarantinos previous
films) Jackie Brown, based on the novel Rum Punch by Elmore Leonard, is the
story of an air stewardess, called Jackie Brown (Grier) who has the chance
to sneak off with $1 million dollars. To do this, she must enlist the help
of bondsman Max Cherry (Forster), and try to fool Ordell (Jackson), an arms
dealer who kills anyone he thinks will blab to the police (including Grier)
and dopeheads Melanie and Louis (Fonda and De Niro) who plan to steal Griers
money. Along the way, she must also use the help of cop Ray Nicloet (Keaton)
who wants to take Ordell down.
Throughout the plot is Tarantino typically good dialogue, and some good
performances from Grier, Fonda and Forster. Tarantino has written another
good script, but it seems more restrained because he is working from a
novel. Somehow, the script never reaches the dizzy heights of Pulp Fiction
(1994), which is a shame. Tarantino is a great scriptwriter, but not such a
great adapter. He needs more creative freedom. Hopefully, he won't adapt
another book after this movie. I have not read the novel Rum Punch, so I
don't know how close the characters are to to the book, but the performances
were all pretty good. Grier, a former blaxploitation star and seen recently
in Mars Attacks! (1996) is good as Jackie Brown, delivering a suitably 'hard
ass' image (although it's difficult to believe she could be an air
stewardess.) Jackson is practically repeating his role as Jules in Pulp
Fiction, which is a shame. His character isn't very interesting, but he is
funny, and he has some of the best one liners in the movie. Fonda is superb,
and very sexy, as dopehead Melanie, but she hardly features in the film. De
Niro, like in Copland (1997), is seemingly on auto pilot. Forster is
excellent as the burnt out Max, with a suitably gravely voice, and some good
acting. The audience relates to his character the most.
However, the audience just doesn't really relate (with the possible
exception of Jackson and Grier) to the other characters. Most of them are
flat and two dimensional. This is a shame, and all the characters have
potential which is never fully developed. Considering the running time, a
little bit more effort could have been based on reinforcing the characters.
Also, Tarantino seems to be directing on autopilot. Apart from some split
screen and a generally good final 30 minutes, the direction is plodding, and
nowhere near as good as (sigh) Reservoir Dogs (1992) and Pulp Fiction.
There's a good soundtrack, however, and the dialogue can get good.
Jackie Brown, overall, is good, entertaining, and never really gets boring.
However, I guess I just came into the cinema expecting more, and the film
never really delivers. Although disappointing compared to Reservoir Dogs and
Pulp Fiction, on it's own, Jackie Brown is an above average crime thriller.
OVERALL RATING= *** OUT OF *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
DR DOLITTLE
(20TH CENTURY FOX)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 25 MINUTES
STARRING EDDIE MURPHY
DIRECTED BY BETTY THOMAS
Riding high on the success of The Nutty Professor (1996), Murphy returns in
this abysmal comedy. He plays Doctor John Dolittle, who as a child had the
ability to understand animals. However, after being 'exorcised' he loses
this ability, and we fast forward to see Dolittle in a crummy job
surrounding by crummy people (most notably Dr Mark Weller, played by Oliver
Platt.) However, with a bonk on the head his ability to understand animals
returns, and 'comedy' is ready and waiting to happen.
Except comedy never does happen. Doctor Dolittle, even with the excellent
premise, rarely manages to raise a laugh. Poor old Murphy looks bored stiff
throughout the whole movie, and his performance suffers. The manic Murphy we
saw in the 80's is gone, his more mature (and more boring) twin appears to
be getting all the work in the 90's. The voices of the animals, which
include Albert Brooks, Chris Rock (the 'new' Eddie Murphy) and Norm McDonald
as 'Lucky' the dog are marginally better, and at least they put enthusiasm
in the movie. Sadly, most of their lines are pretty dumb. And they're not
'funny' dumb, like Dumb & Dumber (1994), but just boring dumb. The film even
succumbs to fart jokes halfway through, in a desperate attempt to raise some
laughs. There are a few good jokes in the script, but they are few and far
between. If I had to choose a favourite performance, it would probably be
Albert Brooks tiger, who has a certain charm about him. Sadly, he's barely
in the movie, and Rock's really annoying Hamster is given far too much
screen time.  Joke wise, we are thankfully, spared the mocking and insulting
type of jokes that featured heavily in The Nutty Professor.
The director, Betty Thomas, has, well, done better films. She bought us
Private Parts (1997) and The Brady Bunch Movie (1995) which were, sadly,
much better than this. The scenes lack any charm, she just gets the job
done. The animals themselves, are reasonable realistic, although most of
them are obviously puppets. There's an impressive looking tiger, however,
and the lip sync is pretty good. You'd have no problem guessing that most of
the close up's are puppets, however, with their jilted movement. I was
hoping Jim Hensons workshop, who created the furry friends, would have done
a better job.
Doctor Dolittle, in the end, is a disappointment for everyone involved.
Murphy has done much better movies (i.e Trading Places) the director has
seen better days, and even the creatures aren't that good. The target
audience, aged between 7-13, who are undemanding, will probably like it
however, thanks to it's dumbed down humour. Everyone else, however, should
give Doctor Dolittle a miss.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Planes, Trains & Automobiles (1987)
A comedy starring John Candy and Steve Martin
This film must feature one of the greatest comedy pairings of all
time.  Frankly, the pairing of John Candy and Steve Martin was a stroke
of genius. Candy, with his lovable 'fat guy with heart' character,
shows some real emotion, and Steve Martin, 'the cold hearted cynic' who
we gradually start to like too.  Thankfully, however, the film they
have been put in toghether has got some hillarous moments in it, and is
mostly funny all the way through.
Hughes has already shown that he has a good hand at teen comedy (see
FERRIS BUELLERS DAY OFF for an example) and now he is working with
adults. And he has now shown that he can do great films with adults
aswell. The plot goes like this. Steve Martin is on his way to see his
family for Thanksgiving, but naturally things horribly wrong. First of
all, his cab is stolen by John Candy (after Martin paid $75 to bribe
the person who called the cab to take it off him). Then, at the
airport, he discovers that he will now how to be sitting next to Candy.
Then the plane gets diverted, and Martin has to share a hotel room with
Candy (which features one of the funniest lines involving pillows) Also
in the hotel sequence, we get to see Candys first real show of emotion,
and this comes off quite well without being to soppy or mushy. I won't
go into the other events when Martin has to pair up with Candy, but
they do involve trains and automobiles, and some good jokes.
The best thing about this film, overall, is that it is consistenly
funny.  Many films now have some good jokes, but also some very 'dead'
moments when nothing happens. But any film with Martin and Candy has to
be funny. If Hughes had carried on making films like this, and not
trash like Home Alone and Beethoven, then he would be a millionare.
Overall, this is good fun, and I would recommended to anyone who's
looking for a film full of laughs, but also with a bit of character and
heart in there aswell.

Title
Review for Return of the Jedi (1983)
STARRING MARK HAMILL, CARRIE FISHER, HARRISON FORD, JAMES EARL JONES,
FRANK OZ, BILLY DEE WILLIAMS
DIRECTED BY RICHARD MARQUAND
A LUCASFILM PICTURE
And so we come to the final part of the Star Wars trilogy. Many people
consider this to be the least of the trilogy, but I find this one just
as entertaining as the other two. The start of the film, in Jabbas
palace, is good, and right through to the end, the film is highly
enjoyable. The film seems to centre more on action scenes than actual
plot and character relationships, but this dosen't affect it one bit.
The director handles the action and plot revelations very well, John
Williams booming score goes with the film very well, and the special
effects are excellent. OK, so Marquand may spend a bit more time than
needed than the Ewoks, but he makes up with the storming of the shield
generator by the Empire, and the battle that follows in space.
So, I find this film to be entertaining, hugely enjoyable fun, and a
fitting end to the trilogy. If there was a bit less Ewoks, and maybe
some Empire scenes (the bad guys hardly feature in this film except at
the end) this would be perfect. However, it is great as it is! Highly
recommended.

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
(TOUCHSTONE PICTURES)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 24 MINUTES.
STARRING BRUCE WILLIS, BILLY BOB THORNTON, LIV TYLER AND BEN AFFLECK.
DIRECTED BY MICHAEL BAY.
The second meteorite movie after the dire Deep Impact (1998) is brought by
the team who produced the dire action movie The Rock (1996). Luckily,
however, Armageddon is better than both of these films, and provides
entertaining summer fare. The 'plot' is that an asteroid is about to hit
Earth, and a group of normal people (Bruce Willis being the ringleader) are
sent into space to nuke the asteroid from the inside, bouncing it off
course. Naturally, there's lot of death, destruction, and impressive special
effects along the way.
Jerry Bruckheimer has produced another big action movie, but this one tries
to be a little different by trying to develop the characters a bit more.
Unfortunately, it spends too long trying to develop decidedly dull
characters, and the audience starts to long for the action sequences.
Amongst the characters, NASA guy Dan Truman (Thornton) Bruce Willis, and a
whacked out Steve Buscemi provide any interest,  while the rest of the
characters are boring, 2-D stereotypes, the kind of characters Bruckheimers
films specialize in. The script dosen't fare much better, with the usual
boring statements, although Buscemi does deliver the odd funny line. Liv
Tylers and Ben Afflecks love scenes, however, are so terribly messed up they
shouldn't have been included at all. The lines they say are banal, and out
of place in this movie.
When the film does finally gets to business with the action, it's directed
well, with some tense sequences and some great action. The destruction on
Earth looks much better than Deep Impact's, and the outer space sequences
are great also. All of this will be lost on home video, of course, so try to
see this film in the movie theatre. The special effects are truly special,
and none of it looks too cheesy (like parts of Godzilla)
Armageddon, although suffering from a few flaws, is entertaining, and most
of the time has the right balance of drama, action and comedy. Although the
movie could be a bit shorter, and perhaps a bit more effort (rather than
time) spent on developing the characters, this could of been a better movie.
Generally, however, Armageddon is good summer entertainment, and certainly
worth seeing.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams and Josh Mostel
Directed By Dennis Dugan
Running Time: 1 hour 33 minutes
Adam Sandler vehicles are never anything special, but continue to make a
load of money. Which really goes to show the sad state of cinema today.
While good comedies like Rushmore, to choose a recent example, gets limited
release and doesn't make a lot of money, Big Daddy got a huge release and
has made a lot of cash. It's also nothing special and doesn't deserve the
money it's making. But I digress.
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a unemployed New Yorker with a seemingly low
mental age. His girlfriend makes a ultimatum to him: either wise up and get
responsible, or she's leaving him. By a strange set of events, Koufax ends
up with Julian (played by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) a five year old kid.
After a failed attempt to impress his girlfriend with the child, Koufax
decides he wants to keep the child. However, social worker Mr Brooks
(Mostel) finds out that Koufax isn't the real father and wants to take
Julian back. Koufax along with his new girlfriend Layla (Lauren Adams) fight
to keep the child.
Big Daddy really isn't that good. Many of the jokes revolve around toilet
humour, and supposedly we are meant to find Julian and Sonny peeing against
a wall to be funny. There's the occasional good one liner, but these are
usually strangely delivered wrong and lose most of the humour. The film,
after all these silly gags, then suddenly turns sentimental, and this is
where Big Daddy really goes from bad to hideous. The court scene at the end
of the film is useless and unbelievable, and not helped by the soppy
overacting. It's a poor attempt to win over the audience.
Adam Sandler basically plays the same role he has in his last few films
(except The Wedding Singer.) Joey Lauren Adams is much, much better, and
deserves a far better film than this trash. Steve Buscemi pops up in a funny
cameo, and his scenes are pretty funny. Rob Schneider is also funny as a
crazy delivery man. The two twins who play Julian are O.K, they start out
rather well, but then becoming annoying and brattish halfway through and
finally turn 'All American' wholesome goodness at the end of the film, where
the tear juice is turned up high.
Big Daddy is really nothing special, and is not even worth it for a few
chuckles. Although it is actually well put together, with nice direction,
good production design and even some montages, this professionalism can't
help the fact that the script and characters are trash. Big Daddy is for die
hard fans of Sandler, and that's about it.

Title
Review for Holy Man (1998)
Eddie Murphys success continues to baffle. The vulgar and crass The Nutty
Professor (1996) managed to pull in a fortune. The vulgar and desperately
unfunny Doctor Dolittle (1998) again pulled in a huge gross. But Holy Man is
a departure from these films, containing an actual plot and not one fart
joke in sight. Sadly, though, it's not a complete success. Jeff Goldblum is
Ricky Hayman, who tries to sell products through the Good Buy shopping
network, and is failing miserably. Teamed up with Kate Newall (Kelly
Preston) he has to get 8% rise in sales otherwise he's out of the job. At
this time of woe, 'G'  (Murphy) enters his life a religious man who slowly
gets more and more into Ricky's life. Ricky eventually decides that G should
host his own show on the network, and G's religious rantings make an impact
on America saving both the network and Ricky. However, Ricky soon has to
make some moral decisions later on in the film.
I very much doubt writer Tom Schulman was intending an laugh out loud
comedy, but I hope he was going for a below average meandering tale. While
Holy Man has an interesting plot idea, it's badly executed and far too wrung
out. The films ideas run out long before the film itself does. Although
there are some light jabs at existing home shopping networks, and Eddie gets
some good lines, there's something missing to make this amusing. Stephen
Herek is almost lazy with the direction, which doesn't really help. And I
found it difficult to believe that G's talks would get the American public
to buy goods. Their was just no logical explanation for any of it, the
audience is expected to believe that this religious nut would become an
American hero. Still, that's the Wacky WorldŽ of Hollywood.
Eddie Murphy delivers a nice performance as G, and it's nice to see a calmer
side to Axel Foley. Sadly, he's a bit too calm, and is almost significant in
the movie. Kelly Preston seems to exist as eye candy, with a hopelessly
underwritten role which she gives a far too good performance for. Robert
Loggia turns up as the flustered network boss, and is quite good fun.
There's also celebrity cameos from James Brown and Morgan Fairchild, amongst
others.
But there's one redeeming feature of the whole film, a feature that makes it
impossible to give this movie less than a 2 1/2 star rating. And that
feature is....
Jeff delivers an incredible performance in this movie, heartfelt and very
human. He's natural, witty and just really, really good. Every line he says
has perfect delivery, and his comical face is great. He really deserves the
starring credit in this feature, as he carries the whole film along. In
fact, while my seat was being kicked by impatient 12 year olds who were
expecting another Eddie Murphy fart fest and talking about boys who 'fancy
them' very loudly, I began thinking of films Jeff should of starred in. Just
imagine...
Jeff in The Truman Show (1998): "And, er...if...if..I don't _see_ you, good
afternoon, good..er..evening, and...er..uh-huh.....good...._night._"
Jeff in Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981): "Chewy...there's...there's a _snake_
in here. I..er..I hate..snakes."
Holy Man is only really worth watching if (a) you're hopelessly bored or (b)
you're a BIG Eddie Murphy or Jeff Goldblum fan. Other than that, there's
little to recommend about this film, which misses the mark.

Title
Review for Amistad (1997)
Running Time: 155 minutes (2 hours 35 minutes)
Starring Morgan Freeman, Matthew McConaughey, Antony Hopkins and Djimon 
Hounsou
Directed By Steven Spielberg
After Jurassic Park (1993), Spielberg went to drama with Schindlers
List (1995) a harrowing tale of the Holocaust, a subject very close to
Spielberg. So, after The Lost World: Jurassic Park (1997), he follows
it up with Amistad, a harrowing tale of slavery, mutiny, freedom, and
hope. Although nowhere near as personal, or as good, as Schindlers
List, Amistad is a fine film, with good acting, an interesting story,
and some outstanding scenes.
The films starts spectacularly (and violently) with a mutiny by black
slaves (led by Cinque, played by Hounsou) on the ship 'La Amistad.'
They demand that the ship is taken back towards Africa, but they are
tricked, and end up on the shores of Connecticut. They are imprisoned,
and have to go to court to decide who's 'property' they are, either
the ships captains, or the Queen of Spain (played by Anne Paquin,
previously seen in The Piano) Slave abolitionist Theodore Joadson
(Freeman) first takes their cause, and also attorney Roger Baldwin
(McConaughey.)
After the great opening sequence, the film dies down a bit, and goes
into standard historic fare, with sweeping music by John Williams, and
some words of wisdom by Cinque, plus ex-president John Quincy Adams
(Hopkins.) The two standout performances are Hounsou and
Hopkins. Hounsou is superb, because he only says one line of
English. The audience has to rely on his facial expressions to see
what he is feeling, and he conveys them very well. Hopkins performance
is the complete opposite, with the audience enjoying his superb
speeches rather than his facial expressions. Both are excellent,
though, although Hopkins hardly has any screen time, and only really
comes in at the end of the film. Of course, the other performances are
good, especially McConaughey. Sadly, Freeman is given a relatively
small role, and never really gets to do much acting. It's a shame, as
Freeman is a superb actor, but this role is not meaty enough for
him. In fact, he hardly says anything in the film, and a fine actor is
wasted.
The bad guys are good fun, with David Paymer fun as the slimy John
Forsyth, and Pete Postlethwaite good as the district attorney. As
usual, it turns out that the bad guys are more fun than the good guys,
although as said above, Cinque and Adams are both well played, and
interesting characters. Paquin is fun as the eleven year old Queen of
Spain, stamping her feet and complaining to get her 'property' back.
The script, although based on a true story, is clinched. You can tell
what the characters are going to say before they even say it.  Advice
we have heard a hundred times before is heard in this film. Sure, it
may be in Mende (the slaves native language) but it is still the same
words of wisdom. The costumes, set design and cinematography are
impressive, however, and the music is pretty decent, and nowhere near
as intrusive as in Empire of the Sun (1987) Spielbergs direction,
apart from the start and the end, is surprisingly average. It isn't as
powerful as Schindlers List direction, and there are no scenes that
are as good as the 'shootings from the roof' or the woman showers
parts in Schindlers. It's a shame, as this film could easily be as
powerful as Schindlers, but it never quiet's achieve it.
The film has other flaws. The length is horrendous. This is a very
long film, and the film can slow down to a crawl. In fact, halfway
through the movie, it threatened to drop dead. Thankfully, there was a
superb flashback sequence to save it, but then it went back to dull,
then another saving sequence. It's like this through the
whole. There's a superb scene that holds your attention, and then a
dull one. It never quite reaches 'boring' as such, luckily, because
there's always a good scene just before it becomes too dull.
Amistad, overall, is a interesting story, with two stand-out
performances, and even a bit of humour, but never really a very high
level of entertainment. It's a shame, because this film has a lot of
promise. It's not bad, but it's not spectacular either. However,
despite it's flaws and it's very long length, Amistad is interesting,
and quite entertaining. Sadly, though, it's no classic.
*BEWARE: The film contains a lot of strobe lighting at the start and 
during the flashback.

Title
Review for Young Frankenstein (1974)
Starring Gene Wilder, Marty Feldman, Madeline Kahn, Peter
Boyle and Teri Garr
Directed and Co-Written by Mel Brooks
OSCAR Nominations: Best Script, Sound
An affectionate parody of the classic movies Frankenstein
(1931) and Bride of Frankenstein (1935). Wilder plays Dr.
Victor Frankenstein's grandson, Frederick Frankenstein, a teacher
of brain surgery, who calls his grandfathers work 'doo-doo' and
insists that his second name is pronouced as 'Fronk-en-steen.'
However, Frederick recieves his grandfathers will, which states
that Fredrick should recieve his castle in Translyvania. Frederick
moves there, discovers a book called 'How I Did It' by Victor
Frankenstein (which includes dialogue from the oringinal film) and
soon Fredrick is obssessed with creating another monster, played
by Peter Boyle.
Mel Brooks and Gene Wilder, who wrote the script, deliver a
good selection of gags, and a large dose of nostalgia. Much of the
lab equipment seen in the film, was donated by Kenneth
Strickfaden, the creator of the lab equipment in the oringinal
Frankenstein. The film is filmed in black and white, and uses
many old time linking devices. Even the frame ratio was done in
old style, of 1:85. And when Frederick, his butler Igor (Feldman)
and his assistant Inga (played by Garr) first enter the lab, Colin
Clive (the professor in Frankenstein) can be heard shouting out
the instructions to bring the monster to life. All of these elements
combined, plus superb shadow and lighting effects, bring a spot-on
representation of the classic Universal Studio's monster movies of
the 1930's.
So, Brooks may have managed to get the atmosphere and feel
right, but has he got enough gags in the picture to carry it along?
The answer, luckily, is 'Yes' The picture has far more laughs than
Brook's Blazing Saddles (1972) and The Producers (1968),
mainly due to the cast. Gene Wilder, Marty Feldman (particulary
good, especially with his eyes), Teri Garr and Peter Boyle
(hillarous as the monster, especially when he does a routine of
'Putting on the Ritz') are all excellent, and the minor characters are
great aswell. Kenneth Mars is fun as a police cheif, and Gene
Hackman is superb as a blind hermit (spoofing the famed blind
man sequence from Bride of Frankenstein) Of course, it's not
just the actors that are great, the writing is usually excellent also,
with some great references to the oringinal films, and some funny
asides to the camera by the fish eyed Marty Feldman.
With some great old style horror music composed by John Morris,
superb black & white cinematography by Gerald Hirschfield, and
the above mentioned acting, writing and atmosphere, Young
Frankenstein is probably the best Mel Brooks film. Sadly,
Brooks seem to lose his way after this excellent comedy, churning
out dismal fare such as Spaceballs (1987), Life Stinks (1991),
and the awful Dracula: Dead and Loving It (1995). Young
Frankenstein, then, comes highly recommended, as a reminder of
how great Mel Brooks (and Gene Wilder) were.

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Starring Heather Donahue, Michael Williams and Joshua Leonard.
Directed By Daniel Myrick and Ed Sanchez
Running Time: 1 hour 20 minutes
Arriving in a barrage of hype, The Blair Witch Project is one of the biggest
box office success of the year. However, like The Golden Child, although
Blair Witch has made a lot of money, it's not very good. Donahue, Williams
and Leonard play themselves as three students who set out to make a
documentary about the Blair Witch myth. The film is made up of the camcorder
footage they recorded, which means grainy footage and woozy camera angles.
Although events start of normal, they get weird pretty quickly, while the
threesome argue more and more as the journey goes on.
Although an interesting premise, The Blair Witch Project amounts to nothing
more than a missed opportunity. The biggest mistake the film makes is to let
three mediocre actors the chance to improvise. Most of the dialogue is
ad-libbed, and still manages to sound like a poor B-movie. The 'script'
eventually degenerates into shouting matches, with the F-word included a lot
to sound like students. There are breaks in these arguments where some
creepy events occur, but then it's back to the shouting and swearing, which
gets very tiresome very quickly. If I wanted to see three people get lost in
the woods, shout a lot and swear, I'd go on scout camp. But no, the audience
is meant to  get some entertainment factor out of this, but I'm not quite
sure how.
The supernatural parts of the film are actually interesting, especially if
close attention is paid to the story developing first twenty minutes. With
no music and no budget to work with, the film has to depend on natural,
psychological scares, which are sometimes well delivered, sometimes not. I
never really felt truly scared during any part of the film, although there
is a small sense of fear underlying throughout the film. However, because
the actors are so irritating, the scares are lost when it eventually reverts
back to Heather saying 'What the f*ck is that?' a lot, and Mike giggling
like a loony.
There's also the niggling fact that these student filmmakers do some really
stupid things. The main problem is the fact that even though these hapless
bunch could be killed at any moment, and are hopelessly lost, Heather still
insists on filming it all. The film gives a half hearted reason why she
should want to do this, but it isn't very convincing. Also, the students
have no idea how to survive in the woods, such as following a large river
flowing through the woods to civilisation. There are also some parts where
the 'amateur' camcorder footage is obviously staged, Heather's apology being
a major one.
The Blair Witch Project, in the end, just fails to deliver. I suppose if
you've been lost camping before, the film may deliver some chills, but this
is no use for the other 99% of the paying audience who haven't been lost in
the woods. Apart from the final minutes, the film is mind boggingly unscary,
and the shouting matches get hideously dull. The spook scenes are short and
far between, and any other horror movie could probably achieve the same
amount of fear that these scenes provide. Although a good idea, it's not
executed well enough to be a fun, scary cinema experience. It's a worrying
fact when the website (http://www.blairwitch.com) is better than the film.

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 35 MINUTES
STARRING KURT RUSSELL, J.T WALSH AND KATHLEEN QUINLAN
DIRECTED BY JONATHAN MOSTOW
Breakdown is an moderately entertaining, if underwhelming, thriller. Kurt
Russell and Kathleen Quinlan play couple Jeff and Amy Taylor, taking the
scenic route to California through redneck country. However, while in the
middle of nowhere, their jeep decides to break down, leaving them stranded.
A friendly truck driver, Warren (Walsh), offers to give them a lift to town.
Although Jeff rejects the offer (he wants to stay with his car), Amy agrees,
hops into Warren's lorry, and promptly disappears. Jeff wonders where the
hell she is, and when he later catches up with Warren and Warren says he has
never seen Amy in his life, the plot thickens and Jeff goes on a chase to
find his wife.
Although comparisons can be made with this film to Deliverance (1972) and
The Vanishing (1993) plot wise, the latter two are far superior character
and script wise. Kurt Russell is O.K as Jeff, although he can seemingly only
pull of one expression, which is angry. Throughout the whole film, he looks
angry (or just pissed off.) Quinlan is O.K again, but again she can only
pull off one expression, which is looking dorky. Throughout the whole film,
she looks dorky. J.T Walsh (who, sadly, recently passed away) is fine as
Warren (who we soon find out is a kidnapper) although his actual character
is pretty weak, and not really menacing enough. The supporting cast do their
best aswell, with Rex Linn as a doubting sheriff, and the other kidnappers.
The story, written by first-timer Jonathan Mostow (who also directs) is O.K,
if surprisingly familiar and sometimes extraordinarily stupid. Some of the
things the characters do in this movie is beyond the bounds of idiocy. There
are some flaws with the plot also, as the characters do the complete
opposite to logical (presumably to keep the story 'exciting') and also the
fact that the story just isn't strong enough to sustain the audience's
attention. The picture moves along very slowly also. It almost threatens to
drop dead. The picture does pick up towards the end, but by then it's too
late. Mostow directs the action sequences well enough, however. The film
doesn't really come to a satisfying conclusion, either. The ending tries to
be bleak, but just comes off annoying.
Breakdown could of been a far more enjoyable picture had it had a stronger
cast and director. Instead, it just turns out to be merely average. A missed
opportunity.
OVERALL RATING= ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for American Pie (1999)
Following in the grand tradition of comedy classics such as Porkys and
Revenge of the Nerds, American Pie arrives in cinemas to relieve the heyday
of the smutty college sex comedy. Even though narrowly avoiding a NC-17
rating with a few cuts, American Pie is still not really raunchy enough to
make it really funny. The story centres around four boys, all virgins, who
make a pact to get laid by prom night. It's proves to be quite a challenge
though, and breasts, laxative and erotic dancing, plus the inevitable apple
pie, all make an appearance.
American Pie has it's fair share of gross out gags: early on there's a scene
involving a glass of beer that may have a few gagging. But in-between these
gross out highlights, the film gets very shaky trying to develop some kind
of plot. The script, by Adam Herz, just isn't strong enough to make these
scenes. Boredom sets in, then, while the audience has to sit through badly
written mushy romantic scenes while waiting for the next set of tits to
appear. Still, the characters are a likeable bunch, if hideously
stereotypical, and there's an hilarious performance by Alyson Hannigan as a
band member with a more sinister agenda. The four leading lads aren't bad,
although one of them is stuck with a girlfriend meaning he can't be as
outrageous as the others. The girls are O.K, although the mechanics of the
script push them to the sidelines and don't make them as exciting or funny
as they should be. One highlight of the cast, however, is 80's comedy God
Eugene Levy turning in a funny performance as Jim's dad. He provides some of
the biggest laughs in the film.
American Pie is also startlingly predictable. Many of the jokes can be
anticipated well before they lumber on the screen. There are also some jokes
that fall flat, and the last twenty minutes occasionally turn very flat.
Although the belly laughs really are belly laughs, the film really needs
more work as a whole, to make the running time go by a bit quicker.
As per standard in college sex flicks, the soundtrack isn't bad, and there's
a good selection of music. The direction is pretty much straightforward, and
doesn't detract from the film. It looks as though censorship has affected
the film, because some of the scenes look a little jumpy, making the cuts
obvious.
American Pie is a odd affair to watch. I knew the gag was funny, but it just
wasn't funny enough. This combined with the fact that the jokes are entirely
predictable make American Pie somewhat of a disappointment. But the cast and
the big set pieces are really rather good, dragging it out of mediocre
territory. American Pie is worth a look.

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
Before the remake of Psycho appears, we've got to suffer through this remake
of an earlier Hitchcock film, Dial M For Murder. As usual, Hollywood has
filled it with glitz and big name stars, and it all amounts to a loud
sounding nothing. The film opens with Emily  (Paltrow) and David (Viggo
Mortensen) 'having fun' in an loft apartment. The problem is, Paltrow is
married to Stephen (Douglas), who is not too happy when he discovers this
affair. If I was Paltrow, though, I'd definitely go with Mortensen. Less
wrinkles. Anyhow, Stephen approaches David with an interesting proposition:
he'll pay him to kill his lovely wife. Mortensen agrees, but the murder goes
awry, and the twists keep on coming as the film progresses.
Unfortunately, the film dosen't progress very fast. In fact, it moves like a
tortoise with arthritis (read: very, very s-l-o-w.) The plot moves nowhere
fast, and only becomes exciting in very short bursts. Not too good for a
'thriller.' Also, the performances, apart from Douglas, are below par.
Paltrow, showing immense talent in Se7en (1995) and Sliding Doors (1997) is
strangely stilted, even unconvincing, in this movie. Mortensen is a little
bit better, coming across as a younger Douglas, but his role isn't meaty
enough to show all his talent. Which leaves Douglas to waltz away with the
film, which is does. However, I doubt Douglas finds it very hard to play a
stogie smoking, drinking womanizer with a creepy underside. Also popping up
in the film is David Suchet, playing a shifty looking detective. Again, it's
not a character we're seeing on the screen, it's David Suchet.
The director, who bought us The Fugitive, piles on all the flash techniques,
such as zoom-in's, quick cuts, etc. The lighting is also interesting.
However, looks can't save this film from the depths of mediocre, and the
film seemed to work better in a single set anyway. The screenplay is O.K,
but there's some hackneyed sub-plot about Douglas being a ruthless player on
Wall Street (again) and the ending is surprisingly stupid and cliched. The
characters also make incredibly dumb moves, especially Paltrow, and Stephen
appears to lose all intelligence in the last reel.
With a combination of no tension, drama, or decent characters, A Perfect
Murder is a failure all round, and an incredible disappointment. There are a
few bright moments, but they are far and few between. The last thing a
thriller should be is boring, and although the film just barely manages to
keep your interest thanks to Michael Douglas, you wouldn't be missing
anything if you decided not to watch A Perfect Murder.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Starship Troopers (1997)
Starring Casper Van Dien, Dina Meyer, Denise Richards, Jake
Busey and Michael Ironside
Paul Verhoeven's American movie career has certainly had its ups
and downs. Starting off with the excellent Robocop (1987) and
Total Recall (1990), he then started to give us terrible 'sex' films,
such as the stylish yet mediocre Basic Instinct (1992) and the
downright awful Showgirls (1995). So, he is obviously better at
directing action films, and Starship Troopers sees him return to
the action genre. Whether it is actually any good or not is
debatable.
The films opens well, with a twenty second newsreel telling us
about an attack from giant bugs (much like the classic B-movie
Them!), and showing us an entire squadron of soilders getting
mained, ripped apart, and generally dying in nasty ways. The film
then cuts to 'One year later', and this is where the problems begin.
The first problem is that the first thirty minutes of this film is more
like an episode of Beverly Hills 90210. We are introduced to the
characters, and the whole 30 minutes is like watching a very dodgy
afternoon soap. Anyway, Casper Van Dien plays Johnny Rico,
who wants to join the Starship Troopers so he can stay with his
girlfriend Carman, played by Denise Richards. Dina Meyer plays
Rico secret admirer, Dizzy, who also joins the Troopers, and
basically we see Rico and Carman being gooey with each other,
and Dizzy trying to get into bed with Rico.
The audience has to suffer this until the bugs destroy the whole of
Buenos Ares. War is declared, and Rico, Carman and Dizzy all go
and kick some alien butt. The plot is forgotten, the film forgets the
meaning of dialogue (e.g the dialogue is crap) and it just gets on
with the death, violence, and sex. 
The action scenes are good, with the bug special effects looking
very professional. However, after the 3rd bug attack, it all gets a
bit repetative. The main problems is that there is not enough
species of bugs. There are about five in this film, and only two do
anything intresting (the brain and tank bug) The rest are sadly dull.
However, the deaths in this film are suitably gory, with arms, heads
and legs getting ripped off, and even one unlucky person getting his
brains sucked out. The film isn't as violent as Total Recall, and
swearing is pratically non existent. This seems odd, as the first
thing I would say when a giant bug is heading towards me wanting
to rip me apart would defintely be "Oh f***!"
The cast (mainly a bunch of newcomers) are average, but this film
dosen't really require great performances. If I had to choose a best
performance, it would go to Michael Ironside (Scanners, Total
Recall) who is suitably hard-ass as Lt. Jean Rasczak. The special
effects, especially the larger bugs, are great, and the many
companies who contributed to the effects (including Industrial Light
& Magic) have done a great job. Sadly, though, the model heads
and hands look appaling fake, much like Total Recall. Why they
didn't use CGI is beyond me, as it would of looked much better
than the models the film uses.
Paul Verhoeven directs well, especially with the "Federal Interlink"
sequences, a series of televison 'adverts', something he pioneered
with in Robocop. The action is well directed, but the first 30
minutes are horribly done, almost directed like a television
programme. The screenplay, based on a book by Robert A.
Heinlein, is pretty bad, mainly because it set's up all these
characters, and then forgets about their backgrounds when the war
against the bugs actually begin.
Starship Troopers, then, although mostly fun, has some major
flaws that affect it. Perhaps if the first half hour had been cut, it
would of been more enjoyable. If you can get past this, and some
other dull parts during the war, you'll probably enjoy this film,
especially if you were looking for an outragesouly violent action
movie. Just don't expect a good script, a strong plot and
excitement straight from the start. Just about recommended.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
Good Will Hunting, written by friends Matt Damon and Ben Affleck, is
an absolutely stunning debut film.  Damon plays Will Hunting, a
janitor at Harvard who also happens to be a genius. He can solve
problems mathematicians took years to solve in minutes. However,
despite is genius and huge potential, his life is mainly getting into
fights with rival gangs in the area, along with his friend Chuckie
(the superb Affleck) and other friends. One day he is caught by the
police, and sentenced to jail.  However, math's professor Lambeau
(Skarsgard) knows about his potential, and offers to free him if (a)he
goes to math lessons and (b)he has therapy. Damon agrees, his
therapist turns out to be Sean Maguire (a bearded and superb
Williams), and he also falls in love with english student Skylar,
played well by Driver.
Although the story is cliched, with everything being resolved
perfectly at the end (Williams get over the death of his wife, Damon
finally realizes that Driver is his 'soul mate', Affleck is the best
friend with heart) the dialogue, acting and direction is so brilliant,
the film is just really good fun.  Unlike Titanic (1997), which
suffered from a poor script, and underwritten characters, Good Will
Hunting is smart, witty, and has superbly written characters, and
never falls into extreme schmaltz, which inferior movies would
probably do. Damon and Affleck have written a superb script, with all
the characters 'just right.' The gang speak exactly how you would
expect them to speak, because this film is written by teenagers, not
by some 40 year old who are trying to be like kids.  But even Williams
speeches are superbly adult, they don't seem 'childish' at all. So,
having proved themselves as great writers, Damon and Affleck are also
superb actors as well.  Damon is excellent as the wasted genius.  He
can show unhappiness, anger, laughter and sadness with ease, it never
seems fake. Affleck, although with a smaller role, is superb as the
best friend, he really does act like how a 20 year old friend
would. Robin Williams is also fantastic. This is his best dramatic
role to date, far better than his good performances in Dead Poets
Society (1988) and Awakenings (1990) And Skarsgard, is great as the
arrogant math's professor. Driver delivers a great performance,
although her character seems to be the most underwritten. Sadly, she
hardly features in the film, her role could have been a bit more
meatier. None the less, she is still outstanding.
The director, Gus Van Sant (To Die For, 1995) is also very good. He
uses slow motion well, and makes sure the gets the maximum emotion out
of any scene. The audience cries and laughs with the characters on
screen.  He really lets the audience feel with the characters. The
music, by Danny Elfman (Beetlejuice, 1988) is also very good,
highlighting the emotion even more. In fact, everything about this
film is masterful. There is hardly a major flaw in the film
aswell. Even it's length doesn't seem too long.  And although there is
a lot of swearing in the film, it all seems justified, and never out
of place. Good Will Hunting is damn near perfection, and considering
this is a debut script, that is a huge achievement.
Overall, Good Will Hunting deserves to win every OSCAR it has been
nominated for. Far superior to Titanic in terms of script and
characters, it will hopefully beat James Cameron epic. Good Will
Hunting is a film that can be enjoyed by everyone, as it has it fair
share of laughs, sadness, and anger. The film never outstays it's
welcome, it never forces it's message onto the audience, it never toys
with the audiences emotion (e.g. forcing the audience to cry or
laugh.) It will take a very heartless person to not enjoy Good Will
Hunting. Far better than any other 'movie with a message' you'll ever
see, Good Will Hunting comes highly recommended, thanks to superb
acting, writing, directing and even music. Like Boogie Nights (1997),
do not miss out on Good Will Hunting.

Title
Review for Thin Red Line, The (1998)
Wow, this is a toughie to review. A return to directing from Badlands
director Malick, The Thin Red Line is a movie that will delight some, and
bore the hell out of others. Myself, I was certainly leaning towards the
'delight' side. The plot, even though the film doesn't really have one,
centres around a group of American soldiers and their thoughts and feelings
fighting against the Japanese. The screenplay is mainly carried along by
voice overs of the various cast members, and suitable imagery is inserted
through to emphasise the symbolism.
The Thin Red Line is certainly an intriguing affair, much more intellectual
and provoking than the ridiculous trailers promise. While Fox are trying to
market this film as competition to Saving Private Ryan, by showing mainly
clips of the action sequences, The Thin Red Line is nothing like Spielbergs
effort. Although it sometimes tries a little too hard to be profound, the
makings of a truly great movie are contained inside The Thin Red Line,
unlike the typical 'Hollywoodness' that featured throughout Ryan.
Having never seen Malick's previous films, I was not quite sure what to
expect from a Malick movie. Thankfully, I was not disappointed. While
missing some of the interesting camera techniques Spielberg exploited well
in Ryan, Malick takes things at a much slower pace. He also likes to get his
message across, using heavy symbolism throughout to show the develop and
growth of the few principal characters. The style may be annoying to same:
you may feel patronised after the 10th close up shot of wildlife. But it's
there, and it largely works. Sometimes Malick likes to go into excess, the
first five minutes drags out a very simple point. And the incessant use of
voice overs to progress the plot may eventually grate.
Another criticism may be that the characters never get enough time to
develop. We _do_ get to know a few characters well, principally Ben
Chaplins, Nick Noltes and Sean Penns. All three actors are great, by the
way, with Nolte's hard assed colonel being the most enjoyable performance,
and Sean Penn and Chaplin delivering very intense performances. Considering
the minimal script they have, and the huge reliance on voice overs, the cast
have to show their emotions and feelings through their actions, and they all
do this admirable. Even the bit actors leave an impact: John Cusack and
Woody Harrelson amongst others aren't bad at all. But again the film seems
to go into excess. John Travolta and George Clooney turn up in split second
roles, and neither performance is that good. They could of been cut out, but
what would be the point in a film that seems to cherish every characters
that features?
Despite the overlength, the sometimes unnesscary cameos, and the rampant
symbolism, The Thin Red Line is a demanding movie that can be enjoyed.
Although the entertainment factor can't reach that of Saving Private Ryan,
the film has a huge amount to offer for the patient.

Title
Review for Wild Wild West (1999)
Starring Will Smith, Kevin Kline and Kenneth Branagh
Directed by Barry Sonnenfeld
Running Time: 1 hour 47 minutes
Summer movies are, by nature, dumb affairs that are usually made for some
quick enjoyment and to make money. Wild Wild West, the latest Will Smith
affair, follows much the same formula, except that it is dumber and less
enjoying than most summer movies. Will Smith plays Jim West, a black sheriff
with a nice line in sunglasses. He is called by President Grant (Kline) to
go on a mission to find out why top government scientists are disappearing.
West is paired up with scientist Artemus Gordon (Kline again) and the two
track the missing scientists to a legless mastermind, named Dr.Loveless
(Branagh, with a zany moustache.)
Before I pile on with the many negatives in this sorry affair, I'll give it
a chance with the positives. There's a nice credit sequence, the production
design by Bo Welch is pleasing to the eye, and the special effects are
decent enough. There's also a pleasant soundtrack. Buried deep in the dross
are one or two amusing jokes. And Salma Hayek pops up as the female
interest, which is always nice to see. Apart from these factors, though,
nothing else in Wild Wild West works.
Firstly, there's little chemistry between Smith and Kline, who appears to be
in it purely for the money. One would expect zingers passing between the
two: none arise. Both of them plod through the below standard plot, knowing
that there is a pay cheque waiting at the end. Not even Kenneth Branagh
provides much entertainment: although he is over the top, the material
doesn't present much opportunity for Branagh to be truly crazy. Therefore,
he just comes across as loud as obnoxious. The only enjoyable performance
comes from the sexy Salma Hayek, who is given so little screen time it's
embarrassing. She appears to be in the film to merely show off her body, and
be ogled at by Kline and Smith. Her character also changes at a whim to fit
the mechanics of the script, and there is no sense of realism about the
character.
The 'humour' in the film is also very off. Will Smith put a little spin to
his daft lines in Men In Black, here, not even Smith could save the humour
on display. The script largely boils down to insults that aren't very funny,
and one-liners that barely raise a smirk. It's also somewhat racist,
although it doesn't intend to be, with one scene with Jim West trying to
wisecrack his way out of a lynching, and actually says slavery is good to
save himself. It's not a funny scene, and the whole thing comes off rather
uncomfortably. The film also makes the tragic mistake that a man (in this
case Kline) in a dress is automatically unfunny, it isn't, but the Wild Wild
West makes this joke even more painful to watch through pure ineptness.
There's also problems with the plot. Jim West and Artemus Gordon get caught
up in all kinds of sticky situations, but the way they get out of them are
always unsatisfying, and rely purely on luck, rather than audience pleasing
skill. Plot elements are introduced into the film, and then thrown away just
as quickly. The main piece of the story, a 80 foot mechanical, steam driven
spider devised by Loveless looks rather impressive, but there's no
particular reason why it should be built. Why not Loveless build a great big
tank, instead of an ungainly, fragile piece of machinery that's just begging
to be blown up?
Director Barry Sonnenfeld always has a breezy look to them, with some nice
camera tricks, but even this is missing from this stilted affair. Wild Wild
West could have benefited from Sonnenfelds whacked out style of directing,
but not much of it is evident, making this film drag out even more. It's a
sad thing when _four_ (credited) screenwriters, a talented director and a
willing star can't make a film work, and eventually Wild Wild West collapses
under it's sexist, mildly racist, unfunny weight.

Title
Review for Plunkett & Macleane (1999)
Starring Robert Carlyle, Johnny Lee Miller and Liv Tyler
Directed By Jake Scott
Running Time: 1 hour 40 minutes.
Plunkett & MaCleane marks the directing debut of Jake Scott, brother of
Ridley and Tony. Naturally, this got me worried. Would Jake's talent be
inherited from Ridley or Tony? If it was from Ridley, than the movie would
be a thoughtful suspensor with action thrown in. If it was from Tony, it
would be wham bang drivel. Unfortunately, the latter is true for this
worthless picture with little charm. Carlyle and Miller are the titular
highwaymen, Plunkett (Carlyle) who is poor and unruly, and Captain James
MaCleane (Miller) a clean cut gentleman. As the tagline clearly wants to
make known, they rob the rich and nothing else. The film basically follows
the rowdy hold ups the two stage, along with romantic interludes with Lady
Rebecca (Tyler.) Hot on both their tails is Mr Chance (Ken Stott) who wants
to see them both dead.
Plunkett & MaCleane is an annoying little film that serves little purpose.
Although undoubtedly slick and fast paced, there's very little merit
contained in the film. Carlyle and Miller are fun enough as the foul mouthed
pair, although their characters are criminally undeveloped. It appears that
much of the money has been spent on the expensive looking sets and costumes,
but not on the script. The five(!) screenwriters (three credited) have
produced an still born movie: there's very little development in the story.
Also, major events, such as Mr. Cash finding out who Plunkett and MaCleane
really are, are so rushed that they barely happened. The story is a bit of a
mess, frankly.
The performances aren't bad: Carlyle and Miller are typical lads, but Liv
Tyler is a huge disappointment as the love interest. Her irritable, stilted
performance sticks out like a sore thumb, and I was quite unsure on what
accent she was trying to put on. She looks nice, though. More interesting is
Alan Cummings as the campy Lord Rochester, and although his character
amounts to nothing more than a two dimensional comedy gay character, he hams
it up well. Ken Stott is suitably evil as Chance, but again he is nothing
but a flat character. I didn't particularly care when the predictable death
sequence arrived.
Although a disappointment in writing, and a minor success in acting, the
film certainly look lavish, with good costumes, and wonderful sets. But
production design alone can't save a movie, especially a movie as bad as
this mess. Jake Scott would be more suited to directing a music video rather
than this failed update of a period drama: the only update seems to be the
fact that everyone must talk dirty, with 'f*ck this' and 'stand and f*cking
deliver' splattered all over the place. The MTV editing and direction are
flash enough, but in the end decidedly empty.
Plunkett & MaCleane is a massive disappointment. Although somewhat enjoyable
during parts, it's so light it could float off the screen if it wasn't just
images on a reel. There's no thought, no development, no plot, just a series
of manic edits and quirky camera angles to make this film appeal to
Gen-Xers. Although it's a great idea: update a period drama to the MTV
generation: it's execution is awful, and would more likely bore than excite.
Sloppy and occasionally off puttingly tasteless, it's hard to recommend
Plunkett & MaCleane as a movie, but easy to recommend it as a overlong music
video. Give it a miss.

Title
Review for Without Limits (1998)
Released with little fanfare, Without Limits is a pleasant diversion. The
film documents the life of athlete Steve Prefontaine (played by Crudup),
whos name probably means little to British audiences. An idolised long
distance runner, this film charters his life from his training in the
University of Oregon with coach Bill Bowerman (Sutherland), through to the
1972 Munich Olympic games, and ends with the tragic car crash he was in at
the young age of 24. There's also thrills, suspense and romance in the form
of Mary Marckx (Monica Potter) along the way.
Appearing from accomplished writer Robert Towne, Without Limits is a well
made documentary. The performance, writing and acting are above average, and
all account to a good time. New actor on the block Billy Crudup is good as
Prefontaine, and the audience can relate easily to him. He gets an
unfortunate moustache later on in the film, but this doesn't stop him
delivering an good performance. Monica Potter has great charm as the love
interest, although she isn't given much to do. She looks nice, and acts
well. The ubiquitous Matthew Lillard makes an appearance as one of
Prefontaine's team mates, but the acting award goes to a magical performance
by the ever reliable Donald Sutherland. Every film he's done, whether Animal
House (1979) or Outbreak (1995) he delivers a good performance, but here
he's got a meaty part, and gives it his all. It really is a superb
performance, playing the 'father figure' in a good way.
The script, by Towne and Kenny Moore, is good enough, even though all the
source material is written out for them in history. The dialogue isn't too
bad, though, although occasionally it can get a bit sappy with the romantic
scene between Pre and Mary (a common problem in today's movies.) It doesn't
detract, however. The direction is also very good. Towne makes the actors in
the movie look like the real persons at the time, and uses stock footage of
the actual events, and mixes them well with the filmed footage. Largely
seamless. There's also some good use of montage throughout the film, and a
well selected period soundtrack with some good tunes.
It's a shame this film won't be seen by many people (it only made around $1
million in the U.S during it's cinema run) as this is good entertainment.
Never overdoing it, the audience doesn't feel manipulated throughout with
the movie, even with a typical Hollywood funeral scene. Charming
performances, good direction and decent writing make Without Limits one of
the most pleasant surprises of the year, and is worth watching.

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
The sequel to The Fugitive (1993), U.S Marshals is an average thriller using
it's association with The Fugitive just so it can make a few extra bucks.
Tommy Lee Jones returns to his role as Chief Deputy Samuel Gerard, the
grizzly cop who was after Harrison Ford in The Fugitive. This time, he's
after fugitive Mark Sheridan (Snipes) who the police think killed two FBI
agents, but of course he's been set up, and when the police  plane escort he
(and Gerard) are riding crashes, he makes a run for it, Gerard not so hot on
his tail. What follows is about 2 hours of action, brought to us by the
director of Executive Decision (1995), another film curiously involving a
plane.
When comparing  this movie to The Fugitive, the prequel is far superior. But
even on it's own, U.S Marshals is a pretty lousy movie. While the original
was reasonably intelligent, and had a fugitive to root for, the audience
feels strangely distanced from Snipes fugitive, mainly because we know so
little about him until way into the film's overlong running time. While The
Fugitive gave a little time to develop Harrison Fords character, U.S
Marshals is straight in there, pulling it's trump card (the place crash)
almost immediately. To be honest, I couldn't care less if Snipe's character
got captured or not. Snipes performance is average, and his character gets
surprisingly little screen time (considering he is the fugitive) for reasons
I'll explain later. Tommy Lee Jones is as fine as ever, although his role is
hardly a challenge. The sense of deja vu was overwhelming. I know it's the
same role from The Fugitive, but there is seemingly no attempt to develop
his character from the last film. There's a few 'nudge nudge' references
from the first film, but apart from that, nothing. Nobody even mentions
Harrison Ford in this movie. Downey Jnr is OK as FBI agent John Royce who's
roped into the chase, and sexy french actress Irene Jacob wanders in and out
of the movie as Snipes wife. Nobody looks as if their having a good time,
and all the performers are on autopilot. The supporting cast are O.K, but
when it comes to performances, U.S Marshals falls flat on it's face.
It doesn't fare any better plot-wise, either. The film starts off with
Gerard trying to capture Snipes, but then veers off into terrorists
territory. As said above, the film is an normal, average terrorist thriller,
seen a million times before, but is using The Fugitive reputation to make it
sound more professional. If this film wasn't the 'sequel' to The Fugitive,
this would probably go straight to video, or not even been made at all,
because it's so average. And because of the film's plot changing it's
course, Snipes is almost forgotten apart, and hardly features in the movie.
Stuart Baird, the director, is all right, but there's no particular scene
that stands out. It's director is the usual action movie style. Even the
plane crash is sorely lacking in tension. The special effects are nice,
especially the plane crash, and there's a good (if very loud) soundtrack by
veteran composer Jerry Goldsmith.
But in the end, U.S Marshals suffers from an overwhelmingly lack of
excitement. Sure, it's loud and dumb, but in the end U.S Marshals just ain't
fun. Bored performers and a lackluster plot and script, do not make a good
action movie.
OVERALL RATING=  ** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
WEB SPACE PROVIDED BY GEOCITIES
 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via your E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Star Wars (1977)
A sci-fi/adventure starring Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher, Peter
Cushing,Harrison Ford and Alec Guiness
Well, what can I say about this film? It's, Star Wars, isn't it? And
everyone knows that Star Wars. But, in this speacil edition, the sound
has been beefed up (the ships really do swoop around you, and the
atmosphere in the Death Star is now much better) Also, there has been
added extra footage, including a conversation between Han Solo (Ford)
and Jabba the Hut (which looks really good)
Everyone knows the plot by now. Hamill, Guiness, Fisher and Ford (plus
his wookie friend Chewbacca, and the droids C3PO and R2D2) all help the
rebels the destroy the empires (led by Cushing, and Darth Vadar who is
voiced by James Earl Jones and David Prowse) evil plan, which is
blowing the rebels up with the Death Star. This has to be one of the
simplest plots ever, and thats what makes the film fun, the fact that
you don't think about whats going on, you just enjoy yourself.
Basically, this has to be one of the best space adventures out there.
The bad guys are really bad, the good guys do really good guy things
(all stick for each other, etc) and C3PO and R2D2 have to be one of the
greatest comedy pairings ever. And with the new THX and digital sound,
and the added footage, it is even better.
So, overall then, I would recommended this film to anyone over the age of 3.
See it!

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
L.A CONFIDENTIAL
(WARNER BROTHERS)
RUNNING TIME: 136 MINUTES (2 HOURS 16 MINUTES)
STARRING KEVIN SPACEY, RUSSEL CROWE, GUY PEARCE AND DANNY DeVITO
DIRECTED BY CURTIS HANSON
L.A Confidential is a very good detective crime thriller. The film opens
with Sid Hudgeons (DeVito) writing an article about a drugs dealer named
Mickey Cohen (Paul Guilfoyle) in his magazine 'Hush Hush', which exposes all
the latest celebrity goings on in 50's Los Angeles. Most of them are set up
by DeVito and cop friend Jack Vincennes (Spacey.) While on duty, Vincennes
usually works with Bud White (Crowe) a violent man who can't stand wife
beaters. Finally, Spacey meets new kid on the force Ed Exley (Pearce), who
wants to become a detective, but is warned by police chief Dudley Smith
(Cromwell) that he hasn't got the balls for it. All these characters are
introduced quickly and smoothly in the first 10 minutes of the picture. The
film gets going when a mass homicide occurs at the Nite Owl cafe (where a
fellow cop is killed), and all the main characters get drawn into a case
that is more interesting than what first appears.
The film has captured the look of 50's L.A very well. The costumes, cars and
music are all there, and there is also some good set design. In fact, it's
hard to fault L.A Confidential on the look of the film. It's also very hard
to fault the acting. Kevin Spacey is excellent (as usual) as the grinning
Detective Vincennes, and the audience easily goes along with his character.
Crowe is scary as violent cop Bud, he plays the tough guy role very well.
Bud also falls for girl Lynn Bracken (Kim Basinger), a hooker who works for
a firm where the boss makes his girls look like movie stars. Crowe manages
to pull off the emotion needed for these scenes, he doesn't go through the
whole film like some big thug. He shows he has feelings aswell. Guy Pearce
is also excellent as 'by the book' cop Exley, his transition from being
'goody goody' to a intense, threatening cop (a non-violent Bud, basically)
is good, and believable. DeVito is his usual smart-ass self, a role he will
always be type-cast with. His performance is good, but it damn well should
be, because he's been playing the same character for the last 15-20 years
now. Basinger is also good, she's acting much better than the crap she has
been in recently. She's greatly improved from Nine 1/2 Weeks also.
Director Curtis Hanson, who also adapted the book and wrote the screenplay,
does some neat directional tricks. Every time one of the cops remembers
something important, we get a little flashback in the corner of the screen.
The gunfights are all well directed, the 'talky' scenes are well done and
never get boring. There are no faults with the directing and writing at all.
The 'twist in the tale', when it finally arrives, seems strangely familiar,
and has been done many times before. It is generally good, though there
could of been a stronger twist, however.
Overall, L.A Confidential is a very well made thriller, with a let down with
the twist in the tale, but excellent performances, excellent directing and
writing, and excellent set design. One of the best film noirs in a long
time, and well worth seeing.
OVERALL RATING=OUT OF
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
WEB SPACE PROVIDED BY GEOCITIES
Š1998 David Wilcock

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
The two thickest, rudest and sex desperate teenagers on MTV
finally made there way to the movies with this uneven, but usually
funny road movie. The film opens with Beavis and Butthead (both
voiced by Mike Judge) waking up to find that they television has
been stolen. While searching for it, they stumble into Muddy's
(voiced by Bruce Willis) motel room. Muddy mistakes Beavis and
Butthead for two murderers he hired to 'do' (i.e kill) his wife
(voiced by Willis' real life wife, Demi Moore) Naturally, the boys
mistake 'do' for 'have sex with' his wife, and go to 'do' his wife.
When they finally reach the wife, she tells them to kill Muddy, and
also hides a deadly virus into Beavis's pants, which the F.B.I are
after. Soon, our heroes have Muddy, the wife, and the F.B.I all
trying to kill them. 
Beavis and Butthead prove to be their normal irritating, yet
strangely likeable selves. There are some good movie references,
such as King Kong (1933) and every single blaxploitation film
ever made (such as the classic Shaft (1971)) The voices are
good, with Bruce Willis and Demi Moore delivering fine
performances, and an resonable funny Robert Stack (1941
(1979), Airplane! (1980)) as a cavity searching obsessed F.B.I
officer. 
But although the performances are good, the jokes are hit and
miss. I have never watched Beavis and Butthead on MTV, so this
was the first time I was introduced to their world. Some of the
gags are great (such as an hippy teacher singing 'Lesbian Seagull,'
before being flattened by a door) yet some are pretty awful (such
as Cornholio, which, although funny at first, started to grow on my
nerves.) Thankfully, though, the film is not particulary long (about 1
hour 20 minutes) so when the gags do start running out, the film is
about to end anyway.
Fans of the television show will probably enjoy this far more than I
did, but I would still recommend this film to people who are
unfamiliar with Beavis and Butthead. There are some good jokes
in there, and the film is resonably good fun. Overall, then, this a
enjoyable, if not particulary smart, comedy.

Title
Review for Fierce Creatures (1997)
A comedy starring John Cleese, Michael Palin, Kevin Kline and
Jamie Lee Curtis
First, let me say (or rather John Cleese say) that this is not a sequel
to the hit comedy A FISH CALLED WANDA. It is in fact an 'equal.'
However, if he means that it has an equal amount of good jokes, then he
is sadly mistaken. This film is nowhere near as funny as WANDA.
The 'plot' centres around a zoo in London. It has been taken over by an
american company (the boss is played by Kevin Kline.) However, the
company don't want fluffy animals, because these don't pull in the
punters. Instead, he wants fierce creatures. He (the boss) also sends
Jamie Lee Curtis and his son (Kevin Kline again) to monitor the
progress of the zoo. What follows is a series of jokes centered around
John Cleese (who plays the owner of the zoo) and the situations that
arise when he is near animals. By the way, the plot about the fierce
creatures disappears after 20 minutes.
Because this film had the same cast, with them playing virtually the
same roles as in WANDA, I couldn't help comparing it with WANDA. And,
compared to WANDA its nowhere near as funny, but even on its on, its
not the comic epic I was expecting.
So, overall then, although there are a few laughs to be had, the film
is dissappointing, and I can really only recommended it if you're a big
fan of Cleese. Otherwise, wait for it on video.

Title
Review for Six Days Seven Nights (1998)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 40 MINUTES.
STARRING HARRISON FORD, ANNE HECHE AND DAVID SCHWIMMER
DIRECTED BY IVAN REITMAN
    Director Ivan Reitman, who brought us the brilliant Ghostbusters (1984),
and the not so brilliant Fathers Day (1996), seems to back on good form with
this entertaining comedy. Anne Heche and David Schwimmer play happy couple
Robin and Frank, who take a holiday to a island of Tahiti. Robin works for a
magazine in New York, and when she is called back from the island for an
important photo shoot for the magazine, she has to use the services of Quinn
Harris's (Harrison Ford) airline. The two, obviously, don't get along, and
when Quinns plane crashes on a remote island, Quinn and Robin must learn to
get along for a few days. Comedy and mayhem, plus romance, occur, all in
true Hollywood fashion.
    Six Days, Seven Nights is light, breezy entertainment, which places no
demands on the viewer. Harrison Ford is surprisingly able at comedy, and is
pretty funny. His character is a cross between Indiana Jones and Bill
Murray, and comes off well. Anne Heche, Ellen DeGeneres girlfriend at the
moment, also proves to be fun, and luckily never starts to annoy.
Thankfully, there's also chemistry between them, making them a fun couple to
watch. David Schwimmer is good as Robin worrying boyfriend, and he tries
(and generally succeeds) to not be Ross from T.V's Friends. He also has the
funniest scene towards the end. So, Six Days, Seven Nights gets off to a
good start with funny actors. Director Ivan Reitman is also good, proving
competent with both the comedy/romance, and the action scenes. The comedy is
funny, and the action can get exciting.
    Writer Michael Riva may be cutting it a bit close with the Romancing The
Stone (1981) references, but generally the film breezes along. Sadly, the
script never reaches the high point the audience expects. Although it has
many opportunities, it never reaches quite the fever pitch the film should
achieve. Still, there's some good one liners, some tense action, and the
romance is never overly sentimental (mainly due to Ford's ruggedness.) Six
Days, Seven Nights also looks good, with the island looking pretty
impressive, and some nice special effects, especially during the storm which
causes Quinns plane to crash. There's also a good soundtrack, with a toe
tapping tropical feel, composed by veteran Randy Edelman.
    Six Days, Seven Nights, in the end, turns out to be a non demanding,
slightly cliched, yet always entertaining film, something Hollywood (and
especially Ivan Reitman) specialize in. In fact, the film is completely
crowd friendly, with a major star, undemanding jokes, romance and adventure.
Six Days, Seven Nights main aim appears to be to please everyone, and in the
end it does that. Although it's no classic, and 20 minutes after the film
you probably would have forgotten about it, while watching the film Six
Days, Seven Nights is loud, dumb and fun. Definitely worth watching. (Try to
watch it with a large crowd, it adds to the entertainment.)
OVERALL RATING=***1/2 OUT OF *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Arlington Road (1999)
Starring Tim Robbins, Jeff Bridges and Joan Cusack
Directed By Mark Pellington
An annoying little movie that has immense promise but then doesn't seem to
know how to lead up to it's admirably excellent final twist. Jeff Bridges
plays Michael Faraday, a widower who starts getting suspicions about the
neighbours, Oliver and Cheryl Lang (Robbins and Cusack.) Faradays girlfriend
(Hope Davis) gets more and more annoyed with Michael, but his suspicions
become more and more stronger as he discovers darker and darker secrets
about the friendly guy next door.
The 'neighbour who looks nice but isn't' plotline is nothing new, and the
same clichés pop up in this movie, featuring stereotypes like the cop who
wants to believe the paranoid neighbour but doesn't (Robert Gossett) and the
aforementioned non believing girlfriend. However, Arlington Road delivers
with these elements with more style, rather than more brains, than other
movies than deal with this plotline. Mark Pellington's direction is assured,
with every scene smacking of style, and being very, very dark. There appears
to be little illumination in both the Faradays and the Langs households,
which upsets the cinematography. There's some well handled jump scenes as
well, and the tension reaches astronomically levels in some scenes, such as
where Michael is searching through Oliver's study. But occasionally the
movie seems to plod, the character building scenes aren't developed enough
by screenwriter Ehren Kruger to be of any interest. These scenes really bog
down the film, and I was almost nodding off during some parts of the movie.
There is, however, one outstanding scene at the start which sets up the
characters rather well. Other than that (and the flashback showing the death
of Michaels wife) it's best to ignore any attempts the film makes to develop
the characters, and just sit back and enjoy the showman thriller sequences.
The cast also play their part in creating an believable environment for an
almost unbelievable revelation when it finally appears. Tim Robbins seems to
relish playing the bad guy for once, carrying out scenes with an evil glee.
Unfortunately, he's been plagued with the worst haircut in his career. Jeff
Bridges isn't bad as the paranoid Michael, carrying out the drama and action
pretty well. Hope Davis delivers an acceptable performance, but appears to
be in the movie for eye candy rather than acting prowess. But it takes Joan
Cusack to take the acting honours, as the off centre wife of Oliver. Her
kooky, scary performance is a delight, and rather unsettling. She lights up
the screen every time she appears. And, she looks exactly like her brother
John Cusack, which was certainly very scary.
There's a great soundtrack which certainly helps build up the tension, and
the cinematography is well done. But there's no denying the fact that
Arlington Road, while sporadically _truly_ enjoyable, is a case of style
over substance. Not a total failure, but it didn't live up to what should
have been an easy premise to follow. Although it hasn't got enough plot to
support itself, Arlington Road is certainly an interesting failure, but it
needs strengthening in certain parts.

Title
Review for Simple Plan, A (1998)
Starring Bill Paxton, Billy Bob Thornton and Bridget Fonda
Directed By Sam Raimi
Running Time: 2 hours 1 minute
What would you do if you find $4 million in unmarked dollars in a crashed
plane, and no-one was around to see you take it? This dilemma faces
Minnesota residents Hank (Paxton) and his brother Jacob (Thornton) along
with best friend Lou (Brent Biscoe) in this mostly enjoyable, tense thriller
from Evil Dead director Raimi. The film follows the increasing craziness
that occurs as the three friends, plus Hanks wife Sarah (Fonda) try to hang
on to the money without being caught. Naturally, it all starts falling
apart, often with violent results.
A Simple Plan seems a step back in direction for the talented Raimi. The
inventiveness seen in the Evil Dead trilogy and The Quick and the Dead is
nowhere to be seen here. Raimi has directed the serious material a little
bit too seriously: the direction occasionally plods. A shame really, this
film could of used some of Raimi witty directing to help speed up the films
rather overlong running time. The film looks far from amateurish, it just
looks like any normal, average, thriller, which is disappointing seeing as
this is the same man who brought us a disco dancing headless corpse in the
funny Evil Dead II.
A Simple Plan also raised that reoccurring question for me: how the hell did
Bill Paxton get a career in acting? His monotonous, deeply irritating tone
does no favours, and he isn't exactly a domineering force on screen. I
assume the filmmakers were looking for a typical nice guy, instead they got
dull. There's no denying that Paxton tries, he just (as usual) fails. He's
just not versatile enough to make the transition from everyday good guy to
evil guy, he forever remains dull throughout the whole movie.
Anyway, that's the flaws dealt with. Thankfully, A Simple Plans good points
outweigh the bad ones. Firstly, the films major saving grace is an excellent
performance by the excellent Billy Bob Thornton. If Billy Bob can get a good
performance out of Armageddon, he can get one here, and a good performance
he does. His nervous, none-too-bright Jacob is down to earth and human, and
is very watchable. The audience will certainly be able to side with him, and
will lose interest in Paxton well before they do with Thornton. He's just a
great actor. Fonda, looking frumpy and plain, is great as the scheming wife.
She's the real brains behind the plan, playing loving mother and mischievous
bitch very well. She has a real presence in the movie. The supporting cast
aren't bad: Brent Briscoe is fun as the loudmouth friend, and the other
minor roles help the film go along.
Secondly, A Simple Plan also has a good story and script. Sadly, it has been
unfairly compared to Fargo, and despite the fact that's it snowy and
involves money, the films are largely different. The script is a character
study of interesting characters, which helps, and the tense scenes are well
done. There's some great edge of the seat moments, especially after the
(many) brutal murders that occur throughout the film. Unfortunately, the
film occasionally gets a bit too bogged down in dull dialogue, which doesn't
help the running time go by any faster. These moments are few and far
between, luckily.
But there's one final flaw which makes A Simple Plan quite as enjoyable as
it should be: it leaves a slight bad taste in the mouth. Some of the murders
are just plain mean, if relevant to the plot, and the ending is a bit, well
'off'. But, in all honesty, I've seen nastier films, so overall, A Simple
Plan gets a thumbs up from me, and is a well crafted thriller that is worth
watching.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
Please note, there are *SPOILERS* here. If you have not seen the film,
please do not read on, unless you want to spoil it.
Many people consider the The Lost World to be 'disappointing', and 'not as
good as Jurassic Park' However, The Lost World (to be known as TLW from now
on) is far, far superior to Jurassic Park. Let me explain.
1) The action sequences. In JP, there just wasn't enough. There were only
two good scenes that had any amount of suspense. The T-REX scene, of
course, and the kitchen scene. I was very, very disappointed by any other
action scenes that they were. However, TLW, not just had better action
sequences, but more of them. JP seemed to think it was a drama, but the
characters weren't strong enough for that. TLW, however, gave up completly
on plot and characters. It just wanted to give the audience a good time.
The action scenes in TLW were among Spielberg's best. The trailer scene,
although streched out, was fantastic fun. There was a lot of tension. It
was far more exciting than the T-Rex escaping scene in JP, because a) It
was a much bigger drop, and b) We didn't have a clue when the T-Rex would
come back, which just added to the danger.
2) The tone overall was much darker than JP. JP seemed too light for what
was quite a horrific movie. At least TLW was dark and horrific
3) There were much more 'rollercoaster ride' elements in it. The scene
where the hunters first arrive, and they duck between the dinosaurs legs
were awesome fun. This scene was far more adventurous than anything really
in JP
4) The ending. Call it silly, but I thought a T-Rex wandering around San
Diego like something out of Godzilla was hillarous. And Steven knew it too.
The whole thing was tongue in cheek, mocking the film but making people
(and dogs!) getting eaten, and causing mass destruction. Call it a time
filler, but I loved it.
5) The bad guys died at the END of the film. JP really annoyed me in this
respect. In just about every Spielberg film, the bad guys always die in a
horrific way at the END of the film. The Indiana Jones Trilogy shows this.
But not in JP. The only remotely bad guy, Gennearo, died in the middle.
Great. If there's one thing I love doing, it's guessing in what totally
horrible way the bad guy will die. TLW didn't disappoint. The guy with the
specs, getting eaten by the baby T-Rex (after being nudged by it's Mom,
which was a cute touch) was a great demise. I loved it.
6) It was much, much scarier than JP. The beginning with the little girl
was really scary. The way the guy from Fargo was killed was scary, yet
funny at the same time. Also, the way the camera pans down to show the
severed hand, gave the audience a rush of fright. Didn't experience that
once in JP. Nothing really scared me at all like the scenes above.
7) Pete Postheiwate (sp?) and Jeff Goldblum. Both were excellent. Even the
kid wasn't that bad. (Thankfully, she didn't really say much. More on her
in a mo)
Of course, TLW had its bad points. The girl only appeared to be in the
film at all to kick the raptor off the ledge. The music, by the great John
Williams, was awful, tuneless rubbish. And the much discussed boat scene
was poorly explained. But overall, the film was far better than Jurassic
Park. So there!

Title
Review for Mickey Blue Eyes (1999)
Starring Hugh Grant, James Caan and Jeanne Tripplehorn
Directed by Kelly Makin
Running Time: 1 hour 42 minutes
After the astounding success of Notting Hill, Hugh Grant returns to the
screens again in this humorous comedy. Hugh Grant 'plays' (although he
always just acts as himself) Michael Felgate, an auctioneer. He proposes to
his girlfriend Gina (Tripplehorn) who refuses. Michael tries to find out why
she won't marry him, and it turns out the problem is her dad, Frank (Caan)
who is a member of the mob. Grant tries to sort the situation out so they
can get married, but soon gets himself tangled up in all sorts of trouble
with the mob, passing himself off as 'Little Big Mickey Blue Eyes from
Kansas City.'
Although nothing particularly special, with an almost television movie feel
about it, Mickey Blue Eyes has a good sense of humour and enough charm to
get itself through. The film relies heavily on Hugh Grants shtick as the
stuttering Englishman, and thankfully the film survives because of this.
Although Grant tries nothing new, apart from an hideous Italian accent, he
charming enough to hold the audiences attention, and gets us through the
film. The same can't be said for Tripplehorn, however, who gives an uneven
performance. There's little chemistry between Grant and herself, and I
couldn't care less if Grant would get back with her. She comes off as a
little irritating, and not very watchable at all. James Caan, despite his
limited screen time, is fun as the mobster father, and a large supporting
cast of Italian stereotypes are fun enough to make sure the plot keeps
going.
The plot itself is nothing special, and the script is also uneven to make
this film truly funny. Mixed in with some funny lines are some obvious,
horrible gags that raise a groan rather than a laugh from true predictably.
The screenwriters, Adam Scheinman and Robert Kuhn, could of thrown in a few
more gangster film references, and apart from the Godfather theme playing in
the background during some scenes, there's a distinct lack of parody. The
writers also seem to have a problem with the non Italian supporting
characters, with James Fox's character being a stumbling British plot
element that serves little purpose but to power a few gags and get the silly
ending to work. He's nothing more than a plot device, which is a shame. In
fact, only Grant, Tripplehorn and Caan get any meat in the roles, the other
Italians look like they could provide many laughs, but the writers push them
to the side.
The direction, from Kids in the Hall: Brain Candy director Kelly Makin, in
bouncy enough, and keeps the plot moving. Most of the gags provide a smirk
and a smile, but none are laugh out loud funny. Although Mickey Blue Eyes is
good fun, there's an odd air about the film that it could of tried a little
harder, rather than relying heavily on the cast, Grant in particular, to get
the laughs.
Still, with it's fun performances, some good jokes and a nice soundtrack
with the usual Italian tunes mixed in, Mickey Blue Eyes is a good vehicle
for Hugh Grant, and provides 100 minutes of amusement. Well intentioned fun.

Title
Review for High School High (1996)
So, here's another spoof from the creator of The Naked Gun films (David
Zucker, although he didn't direct this) Dangerous Minds should be one of the
most easiest films to spoof, yet this film still manages to mess up. The
film just hasn't got enough laughs in it. I suspect this is not because the
writers aren't funny, but because they were trying to hard to stick to the
plot of the film! Imagine, a spoof with a plot!
And that's the films downfall. You can't really make quick fire gags around
a plot, and near the end of the movie, the film runs out of jokes altoghether.
So, this film is majorly dissapointing. Although Lovitz and Louise Fletcher
(who played the nurse in One Flew Over the Cuckoos Nest) are funny, they
can't save the film. This film isn't as bad as the dire Spy Hard, but it
could have been much funnier.
EMAIL:david.wilcock@btinternet.com
WILCOCK MOVIE PAGE: http://www.geocities.com/hollywood/9061

Title
Review for Cruel Intentions (1999)
Starring Sarah Michelle Gellar, Ryan Phillippe and Reese Witherspoon.
Directed By Roger Kumble
Running Time: 1 hour 35 minutes.
The new brat packers continue to hit the screens with his updating of
Dangerous Liasons, which was last seen on the screen starring Jeremy Irons
and Glenn Close. Now we get Geller and Phillippe in the starring roles,
which is certainly 'different,' and not entirely successful. Geller plays
Kathryn, who makes a bet with her Sebastian (Phillippe) that he won't be
able to bed virgin Annette (Witherspoon,) who wishes to wait until marriage.
If Kathryn wins, she gets Phillippe's car, if not, Phillippe gets Kathryn.
Unfortunately for Sebastian, he starts getting feelings for Annette, and
isn't sure he can carry on with the bet. And Kathryn has another agenda of
her own, involving Cecile (Selma Blair) and her mother, played by Christine
Baranski.
Cruel Intentions is a well executed experiment that provides plenty of
entertainment for your money. Gellar is on the ball as the bitchy Kathryn,
she's acts like all the bitchy girls you knew at school, only worse. The way
she goes from her false, happy outlook to the disgust inside is nothing
original, but well played by Gellar. It is sometimes difficult to believe
this is the same character who plays the sweeter than sweet Buffy on the
popular television series, and is a rewarding performance. Witherspoon has a
low key role, but gives a nice performance, if a little underwhelming. She
gets the job done, though, and the audience feels for her as she gets played
as a stooge by Gellar and Phillippe. Phillippe, sadly, is less successful,
his acting a little stiff. He is rather evil, but his performance could have
been stronger. The real surprise in this film is the outstanding Selma Blair
as a little girl discovering sex, her performance is very well performed,
and all of her scenes work.
Apart from the above average acting, there's little else in Cruel Intentions
that distinguishes it from other brat pack movies. There's the usual
selection of rock music making up the soundtrack, and some 'hip' incidental
music. The film goes at a cracking pace to make sure no attention is lost
from the largely teenage audience, and the film is over blidingly fast. This
is a shame, because with a little more time the characters could have been
more rounded. Instead, we're just expected to believe that Gellar is a bitch
and nothing else. Phillippe, near the end of the film, gets some development
to his character, but by then it's too late. Again, only Selma Blair gets
any character development during the film.
The direction by Kumble is largely straight forward, but the pace is quick
and interest is maintained. Kumble also adapted the script, and the Gen-Xer
script isn't nearly as embarrassing as it could have been, and is
surprisingly adult and sensible, if a little two dimensional. Unfortunately,
a Dawsons Creek cast member pops up as Sebastians gay friend, but thankfully
he's not in the film for long.
Overall, Cruel Intentions is a nice film with some good laughs and fun
twists. There's nothing original here, and the story has been done many
times before. And when leaving the cinema, the film will probably leave your
mind after a couple of minutes. But while it's lasting, Cruel Intentions is
a fun ride.

Title
Review for Swingers (1996)
Running Time: 90 minutes (1 hour 30 minutes)
Starring Jon Favreau, Vince Vaughn and Heather Graham
 Directed By Doug Liman
Another 'independent film', this comedy, which was brought by Miramax
for $5 million, is good fun. Favreau and Vaughn (The Lost World:
Jurassic Park, 1997) play Mike and Trent, two everyday 20somethings on
the lookout for women. The film just basically follows their plight on
the lookout for lurve, and along the way we get to meet some of their
friends, see their attempts at chatting up girls, and just basically
get a insight into their lives. And all of this is great fun.
Swingers doesn't rely on huge special effects, or big name stars to
provide entertainment. No, it just has a great script and superb
little known actors. The script, by Favreau, is great. Mike is always
missing is girlfriend, who hasn't called him for six months, and every
time he meets a girl, he always end up telling her about the ex. The
audience feels for this pathetic little man, thanks to the great
script. Vaughn is 'the money' (Swingers speak for 'the best') as the
womanizing Trent, always on the lookout for a new girl. Some of his
chat-up lines are awful, but he always seems to get the girl thanks to
his 'hard man' nature.  Vaughns character also gets the best laugh in
the film, towards the end in a diner. The conversations that go on
between Mike and Trent are great, but it never quite reaches Tarantino
standards (which I suspect the film was trying to reach.) There are
some excellent, laugh out loud jokes in the film, and some superbly
funny set pieces (such as Favreau cringe-worhy battle with a answer
machine that always cut him off before he finishes his
sentence. Embarrassing to him, hilarious to the audience.)
Mike & Trents friends are also good, although there characters seem a
bit underwritten, and we never really learn as much as we would like
about them. Although this is primarily Mike and Trents film, it would
of been nice to learn a bit more about their friends. They just seem
to wander aimlessly in the background. But again, the lines they say
are usually pretty good, and they do have some funny parts. It's just
a shame that they didn't have more meatier roles.
The acting is superb. As said above, Vaughn is superb as Trent, he's
definitely the best thing in the film. Favreau is also good, acting as
'the little man' very well, and the way he always feels sorry for
himself is very funny. Graham (Boogie Nights, 1997) has a small but
good role as Lorraine, a girl Mike finally falls in love with. She
hardly features in the film at all, but she still manages to make an
impact on the audience.
Swingers, then, is funny, but it does have some flaws. Firstly, the
running time is a bit too short. The film comes to an abrupt halt, and
I actually wanted the film to carry on longer. It never really comes
to a satisfying conclusion, which is a shame, as most films are too
long! Also, this type of film has been done too many times, such as
Sleep with Me (1994). But these small flaws don't really spoil what is
a funny, entertaining comedy.

Title
Review for Entrapment (1999)
Fox's first summer blockbuster before 'that' film is a entertaining enough
thriller which more twists than a very twisty thing. Sean Connery plays
master thief Robert MacDougal, who's still hanging off buildings and
prancing around at the age of sixty. Jones plays FBI agent Gin Baxter, who
thinks she'll be able to catch Connery if she goes undercover with him,
pretending to be a 'thief' herself. The plot is not as simple as it sounds,
however, and the film pulls off a number of twists that keep the tension
running.
Entrapment amounts nothing more than a pleasant diversion. There's nothing
heavy in this movie, it's as linear as hell and doesn't really suffer from
that. Sean Connery is charismatic enough as the thief, although it's a
little implausible that this granddad can survive some of the situations
he's thrown into. Zeta-Jones, who's starting to get a movie career going
thanks to The Mask of Zorro, looks pretty on-screen, although her acting is
a little flat. Unfortunately, her character must have been described in the
script as 'show off her butt,' because the character doesn't amount to
anything else. But that's what the popcorn popping public expect, the studio
obviously thinks. It won't hurt the box office, anyway. Comic relief comes
from the ever excellent Ving Rhames as Connery's sidekick, although he is
woefully underused. He gives the film a comic lift that is missing from the
rest of this somewhat droll affair.
Jon Amiel, whose previous film include the ho-hum Sommersby, is again rather
ho-hum here. There's only one true scene that has a lot of tension, where
Zeta-Jones is skilfully twisting and turning to avoid lasers. Other than
that, the direction is somewhat flat, and the first 30 minutes are almost
hideously slow, and not promising at all. The last 30 minutes are hideously
loud, and while full of bam bam action, are missing a spark that makes the a
ction exciting. It's all rather dead. Still, some nail biting stunts are
included, but it won't keep you on the edge of your seat during the entire
movie, which is what a action suspensener should do.
Finally, a large amount of suspension of disbelief is needed to make this
film work. It's seem impossible that Zeta-Jones would fall for Connery, not
due to the age difference, but due to the fact that the script gives them
little reason to. It's also hard to believe that Connery's character could
still be running and jumping around at his age, especially during the high
octane department. I wouldn't be surprised if Connerys stuntman earned more
than Connery himself. The twists are executed well, however, and not to
predictable.
Entrapment, although fun, has a air of disappointment about it. The film
really could have tried a little harder, and there's only small patches of
excitement rather than a continuing stream. It's no waste of celluloid, and
Connery and Jones are both watchable, but Entrapment hasn't set the
benchmark for summer movies.

Title
Review for Muppets From Space (1999)
Starring the voices of Dave Goelz, Steve Whitmire and Frank Oz.
Directed By Tim Hill
Running Time: 1 hour 28 minutes
Once again, the Muppets feel the need to invade cinema screens once more.
After the mediocre Muppet Christmas Carol (I have yet to see Muppet Treasure
Island) the Muppet formula seemed to be getting a little stale. I was
therefore hoping that Muppets from Space, their latest outing, would be a
refreshed Muppet's for the millennium. Unfortunately, it's the same old
Muppet's we've known from the seventies. Granted, the routing is very funny
for thirty minute shows, but for the big screen the Muppet's should really
broaden their horizons.
The plot centres on the Great Gonzo (voiced by Goelz) who has always wanted
to know what species he is. Through a bizarre series of events, Gonzo learns
that he is in fact an alien. Unfortunately, an evil government agency led by
Edgar Singer (Jeffrey Tambor) also learns of the fact, and wishes to bring
in Gonzo for the inevitable painful probing. It's up to Kermit and the gang
to save the day.
Despite some bright moments, Muppets in Space is largely a failure. The
Muppets are more subdued than usual, and not all the Muppet's are given are
chance to light up the screen. Mainly Gonzo, Rizzo the Rat and Pepe the
Prawn are given much screen time, and although they are likeable enough, it
would be nice to see some more Kermit, Miss Piggy and Fozzie Bear. Beaker
and Bunsen get most of the funny lines, while Kermit and Miss Piggy just
exist to push forward the plot.
Alongside the Muppet's are the usual human cameos, looking more embarrassed
than ever. Andie MacDowell has some fun with her role as a slimy news
reporter (perfectly suited to her) but the other cameos are decidedly
useless. Ray Liotta pops us a security guard and barely gets a laugh,
'Hollywood' Hogan has a funny but pointless few seconds on screen, and for
no apparent reason two Dawsons Creek cast members pop up for precious
seconds. I am sure that this has nothing to do with the fact that Sony (who
distributed this movie) produce Dawsons Creek.
There's also some movie parodies, including Independence Day and Close
Encounters of the Third Kind, but these are so obvious they are largely
pointless. Thankfully, the film largely resists Star Trek take-offs until
the final minutes of the film.
Despite the gloom, there are some good points. It's always nice to see the
Muppets on screen, and occasionally some genuine Muppet humour comes
through. There's a rather funky soundtrack featuring some disco hits. The
special effects are surprisingly decent. But there's just something missing
from this jumbled mess, and the film is never very funny or gels as a whole.
Maybe Jim Henson Studios are wandering since the death of Jim himself, but
something has to be done with the Muppet formula before it becomes so stale
that it dies.

Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Starring Roberto Benigni and Nicoletta Braschi
Directed By Roberto Benigni
Running Time: 1 hour 54 minutes.
Only the Italians could create a love story set against the holocaust, and
make it as wonderful and enjoyable as this. Benigni plays Guido, a Jewish
bookstore owner who falls in love with Dora (Braschi.) However, this is
during the period of Nazi Germany, and Guido, Dora, their son Giosue
(Giorgio Cantarini) and Uncle (Giustino Durano) end up at a concentration
camp. We follow their adventures there, as Benigni turns the camp into a
'game' to Giosue, an he tries to reunite himself with his wife.
This film is truly great. Benigni gives a performance with a childlike spark
that is so perfect and uplifting it puts a big smile on your face. From the
jaunty comedy start to the heart breaking end, Benigni is full of warmth,
charm and appeal. Having also written the screenplay himself, I imagine he
performed the character just the way he wanted it, and it is perfect.
Braschi isn't quite as strong as his wife, but she is still memorable, even
if she does pale to the complete charm and energy of Benigni. Cantarini is
an absolute delight, a wonderfully talented young actor who deserves to go
on to much better things. He also gets an hugely up lifting scene at the end
which has to be to be believed and cherished.
The screenplay is great, if a little underwhelming at first. This is mainly
because the first hour or so is a big set up for the main plot. Consisting
of little romantic vignettes, it's still a comic delight, and the change of
tone from whimsical romance to the horrors of the holocaust is so well
handled by Benigni, it's seamless. In fact, you could almost forget it's set
against the holocaust, if the film was not to remind you of all the horrors,
such as the gas chamber. But the film has a bubbly charm that nearly offsets
this. It may feel strange laughing through the holocaust, but Benigni sure
makes it feel good.
It's impossible to describe how enjoyable this film is. I could write
paragraphs about how the energetic writing, directing, acting and even minor
details such as the music and production design make this film a delight,
but it wouldn't do the film justice. Benigni knows exactly what makes the
audience tick, and exploits us completely. It's never too schmaltzy, it's
never too depressing, it's just the right mix of whimsy and horror. The
greatest achievement is that Benigni has created such as uplifting film
about one of the scariest atrocities of the decade. Witty, surprising, fast
paced and a triumph, Life is Beautiful is an instant classic. Do not miss
out.

Title
Review for Tomorrow Never Dies (1997)
Stars Pierce Brosnan, Jonathan Pryce, Teri Hatcher and Michelle Yeoh.
So we come to Bonds 18th Adventure, the rather stupidly titled Tomorrow
Never Dies' Sadly, the plot of the film is as stupid as the title,
involving a media tycoon and China.
Pryce plays the tycoon, who plans to start a war between China and Britain
so he can have broadcast rights in China (The plot is explained better in
the film.) As you can, it's a terrible idea for a story. Maybe
it's the scriptwriter, who was fired from the production and then brought
back again, exacting his revenge.
Anyway, James Bond (Brosnan) is called in to stop the tycoon, and a few
explosions occur, Bond sleeps around with two women (Pryce's wife, played
by Hatcher, and some language instructor at the start) and the tycoons plan
is thwarted, and the tycoon got rid of. There is also the usual one liners,
to make all the
deaths seem funny. It's just a typical action film, but with Bond instead
of Stallone, or Bruce Willis. Andthat's the problem with the film. It's all
been seen before. Like Con Air, everything in the film is just rehashed
from a million other action films and Bond films. There's the usual
helicopter chase, loads of car
chases, but nothing really different. After a while, it just gets tedious.
In it's defence, some of the action scenes are mildly exciting, but nothing
majorly different occurs. This isn't a major flaw really, but it just makes
the film a bit boring. 
Add the lack of originality and some silly continuity errors, plus a rather
weak performance from Pryce,and this is a disappointing Bond adventure.
After the entertaining and silly Goldeneye, Brosnan second film is silly.
and that's all. Overall, then, this film is disappointing. If Bond films
are going to carry on
like this, perhaps the Bond franchise should be laid to rest.

Title
Review for Pleasantville (1998)
Starring Tobey Maguire, Reese Witherspoon, Jeff Daniels and Joan Allen.
Directed By Gary Ross
Running Time: 2 hours.
Gary Ross delivers a pleasing directing debut in the form of this
entertaining movie. 'Pleasantville' is a T.V program set in the 50's where
everything is perfect and in black and white. David (Maguire) is the show's
biggest fan, who can name events that happen in every episode. Through a
series of events, David and hip sister Jennifer (Witherspoon) somehow end up
in the T.V program itself, as Bud and Mary Sue, characters from the show.
Their actions in the world start to change the Pleasantville world, and as
people start to discover their true 'colours', they leave their black and
white world and become technicolour themselves.
Gary Ross is no stranger to gentle sentimental comedies, having previously
written Big and Dave, both entertaining films. And Pleasantville is no
exception. Although it stumbles across the 'sentiment' line occasionally,
every scene is a delight. With a concept this high, the film may have gone
in over itself, but it keeps a firm head and remains all the more
pleasurably for it. In fact, I was sitting through the whole movie with a
big grin, due to the immense charm the film possessed. The cast contribute a
great deal to the film. Although Maguire is occasionally grating, he's
suited to the main role. He occasionally puts the moral of the story across
a little too strongly, especially at the end of the movie, but he's a
competent leading man. Witherspoon is good fun as the sister, although the
writers seem to forget about her near the end. She's certainly Gen-X enough,
and performs her role well. Her absolute horror when she discovers she's
'pasty' is great. Jeff Daniels delivers a somewhat awkward performance as
friendly burger bar owner Mr Johnson, who appears to be in a daze throughout
the whole movie. He tries a little too hard to be sentimental, and it
doesn't quite work. But it takes Joan Allen and William H. Macy to steal the
movie as Bud and Mary Lou's parents. Joan Allen gives a powerful performance
(as always) as the mum, and her pyrotechnic masturbation scene is
interesting to say the least. Although she's sadly given little to do other
than look sad for half of the film, but she does it so well it's irrelevant.
Macy gives another great performance, and the audience does feel genuinely
sorry for him when he returns home as usual and discovers that his dinner
isn't on the table. His three words, 'Where's my dinner?' will make the
strongest heart turn to something soft and squidgy. J.T Walsh also makes an
memorable appearance as the Mayor of Pleasantville, who's shocked at what's
going on with his town.
The special effects are also incredible. The colour mixes in seamlessly with
the black and white, and the effect is rather impressive. There's a lovely
scene with coloured blossom falling around the black and white David and his
girlfriend, and also the way the burger bar turns to colour is well handled.
The music is also great, consisting of lovely whimsical tune.s
But there's one problem with Pleasantville, and that's the fact that the
film doesn't have a clear direction.  Halfway through the movie, with all
the whimsy of the characters turning into colour, it suddenly veers
direction and turns into an 'anti racism' movie. Some of the scenes are
reminiscent of Nazi Germany, including a scene where the citizens burn all
the coloured books in Pleasantville. Then it veers again, turning into a
'don't be afraid to be yourself' moral, which is put across blatantly and
rather embarrassingly to the audience in an uncomfortable scene with David
and his mum. And the films conclusion is rather obvious, and although done
well, William H. Macy seems to get more of a bum rap than he deserves.
In the end, however, Pleasantville is a treat, a enjoyable film from
beginning to end. But with a little bit of work, Gary Ross's next work could
be _true_ brilliance.

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
(POLYGRAM FILMED ENTERTAINMENT)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 57 MINUTES
STARRING JEFF BRIDGES, JOHN GOODMAN AND JULIANNE MOORE
DIRECTED BY JOEL COEN
After the success of Fargo (1996), the Coens are back again with this not
quite madcap, yet not slow paced comedy/thriller. Jeff Bridges is Jeff
Lebowski, a laid back bowler who prefers to be called The Dude. However, his
name is shared with the local millionaire, and when thugs come round to The
Dude believing him to be the millionaire Lebowski, and then urinate on his
rug, The Dude goes round to the 'big' Lebowski to complain. From here-on,
the Dude is drawn into a plot of kidnapping, deceit and violence. All
presented, of course, in the typical Coen way.
A mixture between Raising Arizona (1987), Blood Simple (1981) and Fargo
(1996), The Big Lebowski is fine entertainment. The cast is excellent, and
features a wide range of slightly mad characters. Jeff Bridges is superb as
the incredibly laid back The Dude. He takes on the character completely and
believable. John Goodman is fun as Walter Sobchak, The Dude's slightly
psychotic friend. A former Vietnam vet, the movie offers a good opportunity
for Goodman to act crazy, and he takes the offer up. He's definitely the
craziest character in this rather crazy movie. Julianne Moore, in a slightly
underwritten part as Maude Lebowski, is good, although her role never really
amounts to anything. Sadly, her character is not developed enough. Coen
regular Steve Buscemi pops up as one of The Dude's bowling pals, and John
Turturro (another Coen regular) makes a very short appearance as one of the
funniest, most madcap, most 'on the edge' bowler walking the earth. Although
his character promises much, it delivers little, and is not in the film long
enough.
The plot is pretty straightforward, and is easy enough to follow. Despite
the large amount of main and supporting characters, it's pretty easy to know
what's going on. This is probably the Coen's most commercial film to date,
although that doesn't mean it isn't filled with pure surreal touches. The
Dude's dreams are great fun to watch, and Joel Coen's direction at the
bowling alley gives the bowlers an almost angelic look. The script is funny,
and although it recycles many gags over and over throughout the film, they
always deliver a laugh when they're repeated. The plot can lag occasionally,
but it pretty much zips along.
The film may be a bit too long for it's own good, but I couldn't care less
because I was enjoying myself so much. And that's the great thing about The
Big Lebowski. It's superb entertainment. Blessed with a great
writing/directing team, and a superb cast, what could of been a pretty
average kidnapping thriller turns out to be an enjoyable comedy. Once again,
the Coen's have delivered a fine, if familiar, film. Just a small note to
the Coen Brothers, though: let's move away from the kidnapping theme, eh?
Nearly every Coen film has been centered around a kidnapping. This is a
small gripe, however, and doesn't deter from the film at all. The Big
Lebowski comes highly recommended.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Very Bad Things (1998)
Starring Jon Favreau, Cameron Diaz and Christian Slater.
Directed By Peter Berg
Running Time: 1 hour 40 minutes.
Oh, the puns available for this one! "This is a very bad film." "The title
is right, this film is a very bad thing." "The only very bad things are the
actors." But sadly none will apply. While Very Bad Things is far from
perfect, it does offer some entertainment value. The story centres around a
motley crew of five guys who accidentally kill a prostitute during a stag
night. After burying her in the desert, they slowly start to go crazy, and
Robert Boyd (Slater) starts getting rid of all the people who might know
anything about the murder.
Very Bad Things is an admirable attempt to bring gruesome horror and humour
to a movie, but something went wrong along the way. Perhaps it's the actors.
Jon Favreau, Slater, Daniel Stern, and Diaz have all proven to be good
comedic actors, but here their talents are reduced to nothing but shouting.
A lot. Nearly every line in this movie is said very, very loudly. Somewhat
amusing at first, it soon becomes boring watching five men (and a woman)
yell at each other. Also, many of the actors are below par, with only Slater
providing any real interest as 'the homicidal one.' I guess the film was
trying to make these guys unlikeable, but sadly they come across as
seriously irritating. And there's quite a big difference between unliveable
and irritating.
Perhaps the director is at fault. Peter Berg directs the film in a slapstick
fashion, but the two genres (horror and comedy) still very uneasily with
each other. The gore borders on gross, the humour is somewhat funny, but
doesn't fit within the film. It's like Cary Grant and Katherine Hepburn
suddenly got thrown into Natural Born Killers. A very odd mix, to be sure.
Berg also wrote the script, so I as hoping he would handle his own script
somewhat better. Sadly, he's not a competent enough director to direct this
kind of movie. While Wes Craven easily meshed horror and comedy in Scream
(1996) Berg likes the talent to pull this off.
The script itself is okay, but the plot promises a lot but delivers little.
There's a few funny lines, but not much is laugh out loud funny. The farce,
when it works, is actually quite amusing, but it's lacking sophistication
that this film really could do with. Also, the violence before the comedy
always makes the audience a little embarrassed to laugh.
Very Bad Things is ultimately disappointing, but there's some odd charm
about the movie that makes it watchable. If you have the stomach and want to
kill time, Very Bad Things is a mildly amusing 100 minutes. Just don't
expect anything special.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
8mm, written by Seven scribe Andrew Kevin Walker, has an interesting idea
which is ruined by Hollywood formula to become a bog standard murder
mystery. Nicolas Cage plays family man detective Tom Welles, who is asked by
upper class toff Mrs. Christian (Myra Carter) to investigate an movie found
in her recently deceased husbands safe. The movie happens to be an mythical
'snuff movie', where the girl featured in the film appears to get brutally
slashed. All Mrs. Christian wants to know if the girl in the film was killed
or not. Welles agrees, and soon gets pulled into the seedy underworld of
porn movies, with video clerk Max California (Phoenix) as his guide.
Although the 'snuff' industry hasn't really been examined in mainstream
cinema, 8mm still makes a rather plodding thriller which just seems to be a
bit sicker than most. The snuff movie within the movie is certainly
disturbing, although the jerky camera angles and grainy image takes some of
the shock away. 8mm has the problem of not wanting to shock too much, and
apart from a few moments, most of the action in the film is nothing you
haven't seen from another standard thriller.
The cast help towards the entertainment, apart from an hideous performance
by the increasingly lazy Nicolas Cage. While he was fun and breezy in
earlier films such as Raising Arizona (1987), ever since Leaving Las Vegas
(1995), Cage has lost much of his acting talent and appears to be on
autopilot, such as in the terrible Snake Eyes (1998.) Here, in 8mm, he's
boring, uninteresting and has a dull monotonous voice. And in this overlong
thriller, these virtues do not help keep the suspense up. Only when Cage is
onscreen with the excellent Phoenix does the film start moving, as Phoenix
is a true talent. His performance is a great break away from the gloom, and
he's just purely enjoyable to watch. Catherine Keener is completely wasted
as Cage's wife, although she delivers a far better performance than her
character deserves. Her character, though, is hugely underwritten, one of
the most wasted characters of the year. Also fun is Fargo's Peter Stormare
as the wildly over the top snuff film director.
As this film is written by the person behind Seven, 8mm is filled with doom
and gloom, and no-one appears to know how to use an light switch. Unlike
Seven, 8mm isn't too clever, and the twist is pathetic and startlingly
obvious when it arrives. Lacking the strong characters Seven featured, 8mm
ultimately becomes uninvolving plot wise, and relies on the graphic scenes
to provide any entertainment. But director Joel Schumacher, the completely
wrong guy for the job, puts style over content, and while the direction and
look are good, it's just not very disturbing. Schumacher also has no idea
how to shock and audience, and though we are meant to be looking at the
'dark belly' of the porn industry, it doesn't exactly leave an haunting
impression on the viewers mind, which misses the point. Also, the last 20
minutes are so hackneyed, so cliched, it's amazing to think it's the same
film you're watching.
8mm is far from an success, a 'snuffed' opportunity. With a boring lead
character, 'controversial' scenes that manage not to be controversial, and a
director obsessed with looks, what could have been one of the most shocking
films of the year is a dumb thriller. Ultimately, 8mm is probably worth
renting on home video, unless your desperate to see what the snuff film
within the film looks like. And trust me, the rest of the 2 hours are not
worth it.

Title
Review for As Good As It Gets (1997)
James L. Brooks, one of the developers of The Simpsons and director of
Broadcast News, returns to the big screen with this entertaining, if
slightly flawed comedy. Nicholson plays Melvin Udall, probably the
most horrible person ever on the screen. He's racist, homophobic, and
never has a good word to say to anyone. So, nobody talks to him,
except waitress Carol Conelly (T.V sitcom star Hunt, who was last seen
in Twister, 1996).  Naturally, Udall, Conelly and gay neighbor Simon
Bishop (Kinnear) who Nicholson hates, all hit it off in the end.
Like Good Will Hunting (1997) and Titanic (1997), even though the
outcome is completely obvious, As Good As It Gets is an enjoyable,
funny and warm comedy. Nicholson is hilarious as Melvin, churning out
insults with superb relish. Only Nicholson could get away with the
lines that Melvin delivers. Hunt is also good as waitress Carol, and
easily rises to the challenge of Nicholson. There's also (thankfully)
a bit of chemistry between them.  Kinnear, as the gay neighbor, seems
to have a slightly underwritten role, he's more of a plot convience
than a character. Although his performance is good, his character just
seems to exist to help Melvin and Carol come together. In fact, the
scene stealer is Simon's dog, who is funnier than Nicholson. But then
again, pets are always cute on screen.
Providing solid support is Cuba Gooding, Jnr (Jerry Maguire, 1996) and
Yeardly Smith (who is the voice of Lisa Simpsons in The Simpsons)
Although Gooding isn't as good as is character in Maguire, he is still
fun. He overacts a little, but not so much as to be annoying. Smith is
also good, although she has a fairly small role.  Even director
Lawrence Kasdan (Body Heat, 1981) makes an appearance as a doctor.
But this is primarily Nicholsons film, and every scene he's in, he's
steals it. He's character is so hateful, though, it's amazing that
anyone talks to him at all, especially Carol. And this is the films
main problem. It's totally unbelievable that Carol would ever consider
liking Melvin. She doesn't fall in love with him naturally, the film
forces her to fall in love with him. Also, Melvins character seems to
go too nice, too quickly. I would doubt anyone with a character like
Melvins would be able to turn back to a nice, loving person. It would
take a helluva long time, much longer than this film would like to
make out. Brooks direction is good, though, if a bit average, but he
usually manages to get an emotion out of the audience. He handles the
comedy scenes better than the sentimental ones (he tends to pile on to
much schmaltz) but generally he's good. There's also a nice soundtrack
by veteran composer Hans Zimmer.
But, generally, As Good As It Gets achieves what it sets out to do,
which is to make the audience feel good by the end of the movie. The
movie is a bit overlong, but Nicholson is such good fun that the
running time passes by pretty quickly. Overall, As Good As It Gets is
a fun movie, even though it may be unbelivable, and certainly worth
seeing (if just for Jack Nicholsons performance.) Not quite As Good As
It Gets (pardon the bad joke), but still good fun.

Title
Review for Snake Eyes (1998)
Brian De Palma, the director who bought us Carrie, Dressed To Kill and
Mission:Impossible is back, and has bought all his technical expertise with
him. Sadly, he forget to bring a good story and believable characters. Nic
Cage plays Rick Santaro, a fast talking cop who is watching a boxing match
with his friend Commander Kevin Dunne (Sinise.) An assassination takes
place, and Santaro tries to peace together how it took place, trying to work
out the roles of the people involved in this conspiracy. The film uses
flashbacks and video cameras to bring the mystery together.
However, the film doesn't keep the mystery for long, and once the big
'secret' is out concerning Kevin Dunne, the film is at a dead end. Although
there are some fantastic shots by De Palma, including a 15 minute Steadicam
shot at the start of the film, halfway through the film drops dead. The
problem is that De Palma doesn't have a strong story or characters to work
with. He tries to offshoot this with flashy camera techniques, but pretty
soon this has no effect on the audience, and I quickly got bored. Nic Cage
and Gary Sinise try to inject some life into some poorly realised
characters, but it's no use. They are boring, faceless, and completely
unlikeable. Yes, another problem with the film is that there's no-one to
root for. We're supposed to be on Cage's side, because his character becomes
nicer throughout the film. However, his change is sadly unbelievable. Poor
Gary Sinise's character is terrible, who completely changes throughout the
start, the middle and the end, in an appalling way.
The film's use of flashback quickly gets boring. While clever and
interesting the first few times, it quickly becomes apparent that flashbacks
are being used because the film has nowhere to go. They certainly don't
increase the tension or suspense of the movie. There is small thread of
suspense running through the film, but it certainly doesn't make this film a
powerhouse thriller, rather just a slightly below average one. The script is
lousy and contrived, the characters flat and two dimensional. Certainly not
good factors for a film passing itself off for a thriller.
The most depressing aspect of the film is that it had potential. There's a
good story buried in Snake Eyes, it's just bogged down in razzle dazzle and
flashbacks. It also gives itself away far too quickly, rather than leaving
the big twist for the end. While the performances are intriguing, especially
by newcomer Carla Gugino as a sexy 'number cruncher' wrapped up in the case,
there's no way of altering the fact that Snake Eyes is a terminal case of
style of substance, and unless you're a big fan of either Cage or flash
directing, should be avoided.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
(COLUMBIA PICTURES)
RUNNING TIME: 1 HOUR 51 MINUTES
STARRING KEVIN BACON, MATT DILLON, NEVE CAMPBELL AND DENISE RICHARDS
DIRECTED BY JOHN MCNAUGHTON
Wild Things is so outrageously bad, it actually turns out to be a wildly
enjoyable movie. Matt Dillon plays Sam Lombardo, a hunky teacher who Kelly
Van Ryan (Richards) is desperately in love with. She flirts with him like
crazy, and manages to get inside his house (with a soaking, see through
T-shirt, obviously.) However, the s*** hit's the fan for Sam when Kelly runs
out of the house claiming that Sam raped her. And when a second student,
Suzie Toller (Campbell) also claims that Sam raped her, Sam hires lawyer Ken
Bowden (A totally out of place and completely hillarous Bill Murray) to
defend him. Hot on Sam's tail all this time is police officer Ray Dequette
(Kevin Bacon, who is also executive producer) who suspects that not all is
what it seems. And when the court case finishes nearly halfway through the
film, the audience starts to begin something fishy is happening as well. And
they have every right to expect something strange, because the film really
starts piling on the twists halfway through.
Wild Things is poorly acted, badly written, clumsily directed and great fun.
Matt Dillon looks confused throughout the whole movie. Denise Richards
(Starship Troopers, 1997) cannot act at all. If she was suddenly replaced
with a urangutang halfway through the movie, no-one would notice (until the
nude scenes, of course.) Kevin Bacon has set the switch on the back of his
neck to 'autopilot' and dosen't even attempt any acting throughout the whole
movie. Bill Murray was probably wondering what the hell he was doing in the
movie. His 'wise guy' image is completely out of place, yet somehow his
performance just clicks in. Neve Campbell, in a much better role than the
one she had in Scream 2 (1997) has great fun throughout the whole movie. Oh,
if you're just going to see Wild Things to have a look at Campbell nude,
forget it. Thanks to her 'no nudity' clause in her contract, all you can see
is her bare back. Murray and Campbell are the best things in the film
because they now this film is absolute crap. Unfortunately, Dillon, Bacon
and Richards take on their roles far too seriously. But instead of being
boring, all three are so bad, they're fun. Theresea Randell also provides
some unexpected hilarity as Kelly's sex crazed mother.
The director, John McNaughton, has no idea what to do with the film. So he
does nothing with it. He just points the camera at the actors. There are
some nice shots of the Everglade swamps, and the sex scenes are well done
(even if you see none of Campbells 'jucier' parts.) The writer, Stephen
Peters, seemed to have become so obssessed with twists that he forgot to
write good dialogue. The twists are fun, though, and some of them are pretty
good. By the end, though, the amount of twists is so overwhelming you'll
just be shouting at the film to just 'stop pulling all these goddamn
twists!' (well, maybe you won't, but I certainly did.)
But despite Wild Things being the absolutely pits in terms of acting,
writing and directing, there's something memerizing and throughly enjoyable
about Wild Things. It's so bad, it's actually good. Far more enjoyable then
the recently released Deep Impact and Scream 2, Wild Things is actually well
worth watching. In the end, Wild Things is nothing but pure, commercial
entertainment, and if you're looking for a brainless good time, Wild Things
fit's the bill.
 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut.
Starring the voices of Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Mary Kay Bergman
Directed by Trey Parker
Running Time: 1 hour 21 minutes
It's been a rather abysmal summer so far, with The Phantom Menace and Wild
Wild West being drab disappointments, and Austin Powers 2 only offering a
few true laughs. However, this new movie based on the hit television series
is good fun, and although lags in some parts, is outrageous enough to make
the 80 minutes running time fly by.
The film centres on four kids of South Park: Kyle, Stan, Cartman and Kenny.
They go see the new Terrence and Phillipe movie, Asses of Fire, which
happens to be full of swearing (and the entertaining song 'Uncle F*cka.) The
kids cotton on to the vulgarity, and their parents and teachers are shocked
by the words that come out of their mouths. The parents blame Canada, where
Asses of Fire was filmed, as to the cause of warping the kids, and America
declare war on the Canadians. They also demand that Terrence and Phillippe
are executed. In another subplot, if Terrence and Phillippe are killed,
Satan and his lover Saddam Hussein will rise again to walk the earth.
The plot is obviously a jab at the MPAA and parts of American society, who
believe that kids hearing stuff on the screen will automatically copy what
they hear. The irony is, of course, that many kids will sneak into this
film, and parents will be worried that they will copy the contents. But
while the film at first makes a satirical comment on society today, (e.g
violence is O.K but swearing is bad) it soon loses it way and becomes bought
up in a silly rescue plot that lacks all the bite featured before. The
satire is also a little broad and lazy, and never makes any biting comment.
But satire isn't the reason audiences are going to see this film: they are
going to see it for vulgarity and filth.
And South Park delivers in spades. While the television series has to be
toned down to be able to be broadcast, the film gets away with a lot more.
There's swearing every few seconds, and while rather funny at first, it soon
becomes a bit irritable. The film realises this, and incorporates some more
less swear based jokes, which is good and keeps the film going. There's
stabs at all types of groups: Christians, gays and the army. Even Bill Gates
gets a mention, and there's a funny stab at the new Star Wars movie.
A new addition to the standard South Park formula is the songs. Written by
Stone and Parker, there are largely catchy, but not particularly humorous.
Some of them are a little unnecessary, and the film seems a little unsure on
how to finish them off (it just cuts to the next scene.) The voices are
actually rather good though, and can keep a good tune.
The standard South Park animation remains (the film makes a joke about this)
although there's some interesting animation in the Hell sequences. The
animation being sub standard doesn't detract from the film in any way. And
although South Park is out to shock, it never seems forced or desperate to
make the audience shocked. It's never truly tasteless either.
With the various spoofs scattered here and there, the constant stream of
decent (if smutty) jokes, and listenable songs, the South Park movie is
actually very watchable, if undemanding. Far better than the second series
of the television show, South Park is a funny movie with a suitably short
running time so the attention doesn't wane. It's not perfect, and the
'satire' is a little heavy handed, but I recommend South Park to anyone
looking for a filthy good time.

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
Kevin Kline (I Love You To Death, 1990) stars in this amiable,
yet not entirely funny, comedy. He play Howard Brackett, an
English teacher in the peaceful, almost perfect town of
Greenwood. He is about to marry Emily Montgomery (Cusack),
and everything is perfect. However, one of his former pupils,
Cameron Drake (Dillon), now an actor, wins an OSCAR. And at
the end of his speech, he says that Howard is gay. Soon, the
whole town wonders if he is, Howard insists he isn't, and the
media start to invade his life, including gay reporter Peter Malloy
(Selleck). The small town of Greenwood is thrown into chaos. 
Even with this good setup, the film doesn't deliver enough good
gags. The screenwriter, Paul Rudnick (Jeffrey, 1995), who is gay
himself, has written every single obvious gay joke there is. There
are no really original gags present. He also relies too much on
scenes with many people being still and looking shocked. Although
funny the first few times, the joke gradually wears out, and just
stops being funny. The cast, however, are excellent. Kevin Kline is
funny as Howard, getting increasingly panicked throughout the film.
Selleck (Three Men and a Baby, 1988) is also good as the gay
reporter, although he could of had a more meatier role. Dillon is
also good, although he hardly features in the film at all. The acting
honours, though, go to Joan Cusack, delivering a brilliant
performance of Howard's wife-to-be, and the way she goes
psycho is hilarious. Again, her role is underwritten (like every
character in this film), but she is fun. 
However, Frank Oz's direction is pretty poor. He always seems to
mess up a good joke. Like What About Bob?(1990) and Little
Shop of Horrors(1986), every time a good joke seems on the
horizon, it  never appears. There are so many missed opportunities
in this film, it hurts. The jokes that do work, though, are usually
funny, and there are some laugh-out-loud jokes in there. But the
jokes are very hit and miss, with more misses than hits. 
In & Out, then, is never quite as funny as it should be. In fact, the
only really funny scene in the film are the clips from Dillons
OSCAR winning film, "To Serve and Protect", about a gay solider.
Perhaps if that film had been made full length, it would of been
funnier than this. Although watchable, overall In & Out is never as
funny as it could be. Disappointing. 
OVERALL RATING=3D** 1/2 OUT OF ***** (2 1/2 out of 5)

Title
Review for Groundhog Day (1993)
Running Time: 103 minutes (1 hour 43 minutes)
Starring Bill Murray, Andie MacDowell and Chris Elliot
Directed By Harold Ramis
In this good natured, pleasent and easy going comedy, Bill Murray
(Ghostbusters, 1984) plays grumpy weatherman Phil Conners,
who, every year, is sent to Punxsutawney, P.A, to report on
Groundhog Day. The Groundhog Day ceremony involves a
groundhog being lifted out of a box, and if he dosen't see a
shadow, it will be an early spring. Phil really hates the ceremony,
and not even his producer Rita (MacDowell) can change his mind.
However, fate has a cruel trick for Phil, and he starts re-living
Groundhog day over, and over, and over, until he gradually likes it,
and Rita falls in love with him.
Groundhog Day is a well written, totatly unoffensive and funny
comedy. The screenwriters, director Ramis and Danny Rubin,
have written a funny, warm, but never overly senitmental comedy.
Although the idea of a day repeating over and over may sound
tedious, there are enough good jokes to hold the audiences
attention throughout the whole film. Ramis's direction also helps,
and although he dosen't try any flash director tricks, the film is
directed well enough, and the jokes are set up well. And the
editing is also good, especially when it shows one part of the day
over, and over again, such as when Phil tries to have the perfect
night with Rita. 
The performances are also excellent. Bill Murray is great fun, and
his transistion from cynical to happy is smooth, and delivers his
lines in his usual smary style. Andie MacDowell is good as Rita,
although sometimes she is just a little bit too sweet in some parts of
the film. There is chemistry between the two leads, thankfully,
otherwise the whole film would probably fall part. Chris Elliot, as
the cameraman Larry, is also funny, although you have to like his
goofy style, otherwise you are really going to hate him throughout
this film, and it will lower your enjoyment of the film overall. The
supporting cast aren't bad either, with Stephen Tobolowsky
hillarous as Phils old school mate Ned Ryanson, and even director
Ramis popping up as a neurologist. In fact, there is not one dud
performance in this film, and even the Groundhog gets a funny
scene involving a car chase.
Overall, there is really nothing wrong with Groundhog Day at all.
It almost seems perfect. However, the film can get a bit soppy
sometimes, and some people may get irritated by the day repeating
over, and over, and over, and over. Also, there's not much of an
music score, and the music there is is pretty bad. But these
criticisms hardly affect the audiences enjoyment at all. Overall,
then, Groundhog Day is a funny, smart, and also has some room
in there for some heart. An excellent comedy.
OVERALL RATING= **** out of ***** (4 out of 5)

Title
Review for Empire Strikes Back, The (1980)
A sci-fi/adventure starring Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher, Peter
Cushing,Harrison Ford, James Earl Jones and Frank Oz
The second in the Star Wars trilogy is quite different to the first.
While the first one was full of action and adventure, it was also very
happy. However, the second one is not. The film itself is very dark,
and has a totally different atmosphere to the first.
The film starts off happy enough. An excellent walker scene sets off
the pace, with the walkers being destroyed (of course) and Luke going
off to visit Yoda, and Hans, Leia, Chewbacca and C3P0 trying to escape
from TIE Fighters in an asteroid. (With the princess giving hints of
her love to Solo) However, it is when Luke arrives at Yodas planet that
the atmosphere changes. The planet is very dark, and misty, filled with
strange noises. Also, after being taught a bit by Yoda about how to use
the force, Luke must confront his worst nightmare, which involves
facing Lord Vader, and chopping off his head. I found these scenes
really depressing compared to the oringal, and just not very
enjoyable.
Things pick up when Hans and Co arrive at Landos shipdock, although
even this gets dark when Han actually loses to the Empire, gets frozen,
and sent to the Empire. To add even more depression, Lukes arm gets
chopped off by the Vader. However, the film is very enjoyable, but I
just don't like the way that while the first was happy, this one gets
annoyingly depressing.
Overall, I rate this not as good as Star Wars, but must a bit better
than Jedi. Depressing bits aside, the film is well shot and made, and
there are some good set pieces (and some clever suprises) And, of
course, its Star Wars, which makes it great anyway.

Title
Review for Mask, The (1994)
Jim Carrey stars in this violent, cartoonish comedy. He plays timid bank
clerk Stanley Ipkiss, who, after finding a mask in a river and placing it
on his face (ugh! Who knows where that mask has been?) he turns into a
wild, cartoon like person with a green face. Cameron Diaz falls in love
with him, and The Mask also gets into trouble with a gang of gangsters,
after accidentally killing one of their men. 
What follows is a fast paced, sometimes violent, and usually funny, comedy.
The special effects are fantastic, with the mask testing computer graphics
to the limit with eyes popping out, getting flattened, and turning into
different characters in the blink of an eye. Also, Ipkiss dog puts the mask
on as well, and a whole load of new special effects kick in. Jim Carrey
plays a cartoon very well, with silly voices, and some great catchphrases.
There's also some very moments, such as when The Mask does a production
number with the police force, and his death sequence in the Coca Bongo is
great as well. 
The film has some flaws though. Firstly, the bad guys are far too intense
in a family comedy like this, and are too violent. The violence should be
expected though, as the director usually directs film like Eraser. 
Also, if you hate Carrey (and some people do) you're going to really,
really hate this movie. But I guess you already knew that. Also, Diaz is
wasted, and the ending is pretty weak.
But despite its flaws, there enough in here to make it watchable, and it's
actually quite enjoyable. Overall then, this is a good Carrey vehicle, but
it's a little too violent for younger kids.

Title
Review for Go (1999)
Starring Desmond Askew, Katie Holmes, and Sarah Polley.
Directed by Doug Liman
Running Time: 1 hour 41 minutes
Taking a few tips from the Pulp Fiction school of filmmaking, Go is the new
feature from the director of the cult hit Swingers. The story centres around
a group of people, who include Brit Simon (Askew), and checkout girls Claire
(Holmes) and Ronna (Polley) and the misadventures that they get into, split
into three chapters. Everything from sex to drugs to violence is covered in
a film with a much blacker edge in comedy than Swingers.
Although QT's touch is evident in nearly every frame, Go is entertaining
enough to forget about the similarities and just enjoy the rollercoaster
ride. Liman, who also photographed the film, has a deft touch with the
camera, and the film looks good. The film also seems to have benefited from
a budget, with the night-club scenes in particular looking pretty good.
There's a twisted sense of humour running throughout which ensures that even
the darkest scenes get a smirk.
The young cast are talented and help bring the story to life. Holmes, one of
the Dawson's Creek cast (a show I'm not particularly fond of) displays much
talent here, and despite her largely limited screen time manages to make a
three dimensional character and never becomes a caricature. Askew is
slightly successful, being rather obnoxious. No doubt the filmmakers
intended this to make the audience cheer when what happens to him, but
instead of 'funny annoying' he's just annoying. He drags down slightly one
of the funniest chapters, but the talent around him in that particular tale
more than makes up for it. The real standout is Sarah Polley as the drug
dealing checkout girl: her refreshing and deeply enjoyable performance makes
the heavy going stories she is involved in much more entertaining. Also
entertaining Timothy Olyphant as the rather sinister drug dealer, who gives
an nice evil performance.
The script, written John August, is sharp and witty, with good dialogue and
some funny jokes. It starts off rather slow however, but in about twenty
minutes the script has found it's footing and just keeps getting better. The
stories are largely satisfying, although occasionally there's too much
attention on one detail but not on another. Also, some of the endings seem a
little forced and lucky. Still, the cast have a meaty script to get into and
obviously enjoy it. It could of tried a little harder in some parts however,
and these parts lag.
Because this is a Gen-Xer movie, the obligatory rave soundtrack must
accompany, and Go's one is pretty decent. Unlike other Gen-Xers movies, Go
never allows the music to substitute for plot or dialogue, which is a plus.
Go is a very easy movie to absorb into, and the audience really starts
feeling for these characters. Thankfully, they never become two dimensional
characters who are bent and twisted throughout the movie to fit into the
stories mechanics (like the heroine in 10 Things I Hate About You.) They are
who they are and they stay that way.
Go is great fun, and a worthy follow up from the director of Swingers.
Ignore the fact that it steals from Pulp Fiction and Very Bad Things, and
just sit back and enjoy the rollercoaster ride. Erm, go to Go, I guess.

Title
Review for Halloween (1978)
Starring Jamie Lee Curtis and Donald Pleasence
Directed By John Carpenter (The Thing, Escape from New York)
A Compass Films Production.
In this likeable slasher movie, a seriously disturbed boy (who, although
he's called Michael Myers, has nothing to do with the Mike Myers of Waynes
World's fame!) kills his sister, gets locked up in a mental home, and,
thirty years later, escapes, ready to terrorise his neighbourhood again.
Pleasence knows about him and tries to stop him, Curtis soon  learns about
him and tries to stop it. It basically amounts to a load of jump scenes put
together very slickly.
The film is standard jumpy fare. It's the sort of film where the lead
character would see something rustling behind the bushes, would walk up to
the bush slowly, would look round the bush slowly...and.....there's nothing
there! S/he, of course would then turn around, and bump into the local
sheriff/old guy/kid, giving the hero, and the audience, a short scare. The
film does this well. The audience gets nervous because they don't know if
something will jump out the bushes/cupboard/door. Of course, the film has
it's fair amount of gore, there's lots of silly supporting characters who
do silly things, and the usual sex scene. In theory this should be very
tacky, but Carpenter directs it in such a way, and the music plays scarily
throughout, you can't help but feel a little nervous and scared.
Sadly, however, the ending can't hold up. It's silly, and not very scary.
In fact, I thought the ending took an easy route out, and left itself open
for a sequel (which, of course, they have been loads of). In fact, like The
Game, the ending let down the film a bit. However, I still recommended
this, especially if you get a big group of friends, turns the lights out,
and make silly noises throughout. 

Title
Review for Mummy, The (1999)
Starring Brendan Fraiser, Rachel Weisz, John Hannah and Arnold Vosloo.
Directed By Stephen Sommers
Running Time: 2 hours 4 minutes
Picture the scene. Three Universal studios executives are sitting around a
large table deciding what their big summer blockbuster should be for 1999...
EXEC ONE: Aw man, after Babe 2, we *need* a hit man, or we're history!
EXEC TWO: Hell, I know. What the heck are we going to do?
EXEC THREE: Hey, I heard about this great movie, right, called 'The Mummy.'
It had Doris Karloff in it, or someone. You guys seen this movie?
EXEC THREE: That's okay, neither have I. So how about we just take the Mummy
character and put it in another film, and call it a remake or something.
Frickin' excellent idea, eh?
EXEC ONE: Holy mother of Jesus H. Christ, you're right! We don't have to
relate it to the original movie, none of the kids would have seen it. We'll
just fill it with impressive special effects by Industrial Light and Magic
and watch the money flood in!
EXEC TWO: Yeah! YEAH! And let's get a corny script, you know, one where the
hero says things like 'I gamble with my life, not cards.' And the rest of
the script contains words like 'gasp,' 'swoon,' and 'run.'
EXEC THREE: Yeah, you guys are getting the idea! Now, we'll need to hire
some cheap actors. We can't afford Harrison Ford, so let's get Brendan
Fraiser from George of the Jungle to play the lead character! I'm sure he
can do a great impression of Harry! And brit chick is in, but we can't
afford Kate Winslet after the special effect budget of Babe 2, so let's get
Rachel Weisz in instead! She has a English accent, right? And we'll have
John Hannah who serves no other purpose but to be annoying. We'll need
someone passive and non to domineering as the mummy, as most of the mummy
will be special effects, so lets get Arnold Vosloo to do this. Total cast
price: $10,000.
EXEC ONE: O.K, director. I think Mummy, I think suspense, danger, jump
scenes and action. Now we can't get Spielberg, Wes Craven or anyone good
really. I know...how about...that hack who did Deep Rising, you
know...Stephen Sommers! He can put together some knockabout fun and reduce
some of the tension from the film.
EXEC TWO: I'm loving this every minute! And let's introduce the Mummy one
hour into the film, so just as everyone is about to walk out or die from the
lame script, they'll come back for the second half of the film, which is
actually just Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom.
EXEC THREE:  Bonza! I'll go tell the
boss!
Well, there you have it, the complete story of the The Mummy was placed into
production. The Mummy is, no doubt, a hideous movie with poor acting and bad
direction. But the film is good humoured and natured, and should be taken
not so seriously. If you turn your brain off, lower your expectations and
expect good humour than The Mummy is the sort of knockabout entertainment
that's missing from the glut of 'serious' fare that's dominating the cinema,
and worth a look.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN
(DREAMWORKS)
RUNNING TIME: 2 HOURS 48 MINUTES.
STARRING TOM HANKS, EDWARD BURNS, TOM SIZEMORE AND MATT DAMON
DIRECTED BY STEVEN SPIELBERG
Already being hailed as the 'Greatest War Movie Ever Made,'  Saving Private
Ryan is an harrowing, saddening and riveting movie. It may not be the
greatest war movie in my opinion, but it's certainly one of the best war
movies made, and one of the best of 1998. Tom Hanks stars as a Captain
who's troop has to find Private Ryan (Damon) who has a ticket home because
his three brothers have been killed in action. Action, drama and even some
humour occur as the troop journeys through wartime France to find him.
After the disappointing Amistad (1997) Spielberg has returned to form with
this excellent movie. I'm not the war movie genre biggest fan, but I found
this film to be gripping, and very scary, thanks to the excellent cast,
direction and terrifying battle scenes. Tom Hanks is superb, straying away
from his usually soppy dramatic roles, such as in Forrest Gump (1994). This
time, he plays the role with gritty realism, and is much better for it.
Occasionally he overacts the sentimentally, but he generally delivers a fine
performance. Edward Burns, looking a lot like Armageddon's Ben Affleck, also
delivers a top notch performance, moving away from his roles in films such
as She's The One (1996) Tom Sizemore makes less of an impact, but is still
watchable, and Matt Damon reinforcing his position as one of the finest
young actors working today.
Spielberg directs very well, putting the audience right in the heart of the
action of the battle scenes. And what battle scenes they are! They're truly
terrifying, yet the audience cannot drag their eyes away from the screen.
The battle scenes are filmed with a jerky hand-held camera, and the panic
and confusion felt by the soldiers is emphasized by this technique. The gore
and violence isn't spared either, which body parts flying, and blood
spurting. This film is certainly not for kids and sensitive adults.
Other factors help Saving Private Ryan be a masterpiece of 90's film making.
The cinematography is excellent, and the music score by John William's is
also superb. It is never intrusive, and adds to the drama on-screen.
But while they are thousands of good things great about Private Ryan,
there's one major flaw that detracts the genius of the film: the writing. It
is unusually flat, with many of the speeches strangely weak. The film never
really makes any profound statements. This is not a major gripe, as Private
Ryan is a film of action, not words. Still, the script could of been a lot
better. Thankfully, the actors help partly to rectify the situation with
their great delivery of their lines.
Saving Private Ryan, in the end, is an excellent film, but not the 'greatest
war movie' due to it's weak acting. This film should be viewed by everyone
who has the stomach for it, as it's rewarding and extremely worthwhile. It
really shouldn't be missed, and Dreamworks SKG has finally found it's first
hit movie.
Š1998 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Title
Review for Titanic (1997)
Running Time: 195 minutes (3 hours 15 minutes!)
Starring Leonardo DiCaprio, Kate Winslet and Billy Zane
Written & Directed By James Cameron
Titanic is so close to being the perfect movie it's upsetting that it
isn't. The film, which cost $200 million+ to make and could of put
20th Century Fox into a lot of finicial trouble if it 'sunk' (pun
intended) is a labour of love for Cameron, who wrote and directed
the film. We all know that big budget dosen't mean great film (see
Waterworld (1995)) but Titanic is far superior to Kevin
Costners waterlogged epic. But sadly, Titanic just misses the
mark of masterpiece (although it is one of Cameron's best films)
The film starts with present day explorers searching the runied
Titanic. They find a safe, and inside a picture of a woman. The
woman in the picture (an old Winslet) tells the explorers that the
picture is of her. The explorers invite her over, and she then tells
her story of Titanic. In the flashback, DiCaprio plays poor boy
Jack Dawson, who, after winning a poker game, wins two tickets
to board the grand ship Titanic, leaving Liverpool to go to
America. Also boarding the ship is rich woman Rose DeWitt
Bukater (Winslet) who is being forced into a marriage with a man
she dosen't love at all, Cal Hockley (Zane) so her family can
remain rich. She nearly commits suicide on the ship, but Jack
comes to the rescue, saves Rose, they fall in love, and Cal gets
jealous and eventually tries to kill them. Oh yeah, and the ship
sinks.
And that is the main problem with the film, and which stops it from
being a work of genius. The story and script (both by Cameron)
are both weak. The story is full of cliched characters, (the creepy
man who the nice girl has to marry, the poor boy with heart, the
stuck-up mother) and poor dialogue (the script consists of lots of
in-jokes of how the boat won't sink, and most of the dialogue is
pretty basic) It's a shame really, as the audience does have to sit
through 3 hours of this film. Without good dialogue, a film could
become a very long, very boring film (like Camerons own
Terminator 2, 1992) But, luckily, there are some redeeming
features that make the story and dialogue problems just disappear.
Firstly, there's Cameron's direction. There are some great
sweeping shots of the Titanic, and some clever fades between the
flashback Titanic and the ruined Titanic. But the scenes Cameron
directs especially well are the disaster scenes at the end. There is a
lot of mayhem and panic, all done very well by Cameron. It's a
scary sight, watching bodies fall from great heights into the watery
depths below. Thanks to Cameron's direction, then, the audiences
attention is held for the full 3 hours 15 minutes.
To support the directing are the excellent cast, working very well
with their underwritten characters. DiCaprio is good, although he
only looks 16-17 years old. His performance of a over excitiable,
yet also well mannered boy is excellent, and he also has some
funny lines. Winslet is great also, and her transistion from a well
mannered rich girl to a rebelous young adult is pretty smooth. Zane
is deliciously evil as Cal, saying every line with a sneer and a flicker
of the eye lash. The audience really does come to hate him. He
may be playing the same character he plays in every film he's in
(like Dead Calm, 1988) but he does it really, really well. Also
worthy of note is Kathy Bates (Edward Scissorhands, 1990) as
a loud mouthed American. 
Finally, the icing on the 'great things' cake are the special effects.
Cameron is a whiz with effects (just watch Aliens (1988),
Terminator 2 and True Lies, 1994) and they are used very well
throughout. The sweeps of the ships are awesome, although Digital
Domain, who did the effects, cannot animate human movement too
well. The humans seem to move to 'smoothly', there's just
something odd about them. You can tell that they have been
animated on a computer. Of course, the ship sinking scenes are
awesome, with bodies flying all over the place, and the scene
where the ship splits in half has to be seen to be believed. Titanic
is one of the only films where effects have reinforced the film. 
Titanic, then, is a wonder of directing, acting and CGI, but not
writing and story. Again, like most of Camerons films, the editing is
loose (Cameron edits himself), and the film could of come in under
three hours with a few more cuts. Titanic, then, although not the
Godfather of movies it could of been, is a wonderful attempt at
creating a work of genius. Enjoyable, scary, and even sad, Titanic
is a film cinema was invented for, filling the screen with incredible
images, and assaulting the ears with awesome sound. A superb
film, but sadly not perfect.
OVERALL RATING= ****1/2 out of ***** (4 1/2 out of 5)

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
A disaster movie starring Pierce Brosnan and Linda Hamilton
A UNIVERSAL PICTURE
Now, this may sound like a bad joke, but I'll say it anyway. This film
is a "disaster." Ha ha, etc. As with any disaster movie, the plot is
frankly pitiful, the acting is terrible, the script is naff, and theres
no charecter development at all. But the worse thing is, not even the
speacil effects are terribly exciting.
The 'plot' centres around a town called, of course, 'Dantes Peak' And
Dantes Peak has a nice big volcano in the background just waiting to
erupt. Pierce Brosnan knows this of course, but when the tells the
council...guess what!...no one believes him except the (female) mayor.
But, of course, the volcano erupts, and Brosnan must go around rescuing
the mayor, her child, and the aunt who refuses to budge from the
volcano because it 'isn't going to erupt!'
Of course, before the volcano erupts, the movie tries to build
charecter, and a bit of story, but as soon as it does erupt, this is
thrown down the drain.
Quite frankly, this has to be one of the worse movies I've seen for a
long time. My advice...AVOID IT LIKE THE PLAGUE!!!!

Title
Review for Eyes Wide Shut (1999)
Starring Tom Cruise, Nicole Kidman and Sydney Pollack
Directed by Stanley Kubrick
Running Time: 2 hours 39 minutes
Stanley Kubricks last film, Eyes Wide Shut is a odd drama which could turn
into a unlikely money maker due to the presence of Tom Cruise and Nicole
Kidman. The two play married couple Bill and Alice Harford. During a pot
induced argument, Alice admits to Bill that she nearly cheated on him with a
sailor. Bill is shocked by the statement, and sets about on a odd trip
through New York while thinking about sexual and moral politics. He also
stumbles across a mysterious secret society.
Kubricks career hasn't always be perfect, with unfulfilling movies such as
The Shining, and the pretty but empty Barry Lyndon. Of course, he's made
classics such as Dr. Strangelove and Full Metal Jacket. Eyes Wide Shut is a
mixture of both Kubricks best and worst: the plot and characters are
unsatisfying, but the look and feel of the film are so carefully crafted it
makes the film entertaining to watch.
The film has a strange, dreamlike aura which helps it immeasurable. The
deliberate grainy look Kubrick gives to the film makes it seem dreamlike,
with lights looking brighter than bright, and the majestic sets, especially
in the secret society headquarters, are a joy to watch. The direction is
also faultless, with nice zooms, cut aways and fade in, and is all largely
seamless. There's also an appropriate soundtrack, featuring a eerie
collection of tunes, although the piano solo which makes itself unwelcome
during some of the more dramatic scenes is rather grating and atmosphere
defeating.
Another pleasant surprise with Eyes Wide Shut is the strength of the main
cast, especially Tom Cruise. Although Cruise gave a nice performance in
Jerry Maguire, it wasn't particularly demanding, and it took Cuba Gooding
Jnr to give the film any bounce.  But Eyes Wide Shut centres heavily on
Cruise's character, and it takes Cruise to carry the film. Thankfully, h
can, and he gives a sterling performance as the troubled lead man. Nicole
Kidman, although featuring heavily during the start of the film, is slowly
pushed out of the plot. This is shame, as her performance is certainly,
well, 'off centre.' She's either stoned or drunk during most of the film,
which gives her an opportunity to over emphasise her emotions. There's a
delicious scene where a Hungarian flirts with her, and her performance as
she goes giddy eyed over him is a joy to watch. Her pot-induced argument is
also bizarrely funny. Sydney Pollack gives solid support as a friend with a
strange agenda, and Todd Field is fun as a grinning piano player who gets
Tom Cruise into trouble with the secret society.
The plot and characters themselves, however, are a little unsatisfying.
Firstly, it is somewhat hard to work out some points of the plot. Although
Kubrick explains the main plot with voice overs and flashbacks, other plot
elements are introduced and thrown away with no real explanation. Seeing as
Kubrick had three years to strengthen up the plot, it's a little
disappointing. Some of the characters are a little two dimensional, and
Nicole Kidman suffers terribly from the plot mechanics due to the stories
insistence of centring on Cruise. The script, written by Kubrick and
Frederic Raphael, is deliberately slow, if a little too slow, and never
really exciting. Occasionally, it just meanders on a bit.
One last note: those watching Eyes Wide Shut for the sexual content will
most likely be disappointed. Unless you worship Nicole Kidman, the film is
curiously unerotic. Perhaps Warner's should of advertised the other merits
of the film rather than the sex.
Eyes Wide Shut is a fitting movie to end Kubricks career. It's no
embarrassment, it's not perfect, it sums up what was great and not so great
about Kubrick. This review is not truly accurate: it will probably take
multiple viewings to truly understand what is going on here. But as many
people will only see this once, the verdict is: Eyes Wide Shut is a
interesting, somewhat overlong drama with enough style to keep it going.

Title
Review for Total Recall (1990)
The booming introduction music finishes, and the camera sweeps over red
mountains. We see two figures looking over a barren, and very red
landscape. They kiss, then walk on. One of the characters (Schwarzenegger)
slips, and falls. The glass on his mask cracks. His face scruches up, and
his eye's begin to pop.....
Then Doug Quaid, played by Schwarzenegger, wakes up. It's all been a dream.
He wakes up next to his beautiful wife, played by Stone, and the film
begins...
TOTAL RECALL is a typical sci-fi film wrapped around an intresting (if far
fetched) plot. Quaid, who has never been to Mars, keeps on having dreams of
the planet, which has now been colanised. One day, while riding on a train,
he's see's a ad for a company called 'Rekall', which implants memories of a
holiday, instead of you actually going there yourself. Quaid chooses the
'Secret Agent on Mars' memory, and then the s*** really hits the fan.
The implant goes wrong, and Quaid really thinks he is an agent on Mars for
about two minutes, until he goes back to normal and can't remember a thing.
However, everyone he knows (his workmates, his wife) turn against him,
saying how 'blabbed about Mars' and 'blew his cover on the mission' A
strange man, called Richter, played by Ironside, wants to kill him. Quaid,
now hopelessly confused, follows the advice given to him, by a 'friend'. He
get's his ass to Mars.
Mars is ruled by Cohagen, played by Cox, who charges people for air.
Against him are the rebels, who are mainly mutants. The rebel's need Quaid
to defeat Cohagen, because Quaid knows (but can't remember yet) about a
reactor that produces air. Eventually, Quaid kills Cohagen, turns on the
reactor, saves the planet, and goes away with a beautiful girl, just like
the guy at Rekall promised him.
Throughout this plot, there is huge explosions, thousands of deaths (and I
mean a LOT of death) swearing, sex, and everything else that make's a good
Verhoeven (director of Basic Instinct and Starship Troopers) movie.
Naturally, there's some pretty imaginative deaths, with arms getting ripped
off, someone getting drilled, and heads exploding. As you can tell, it's
violent stuff. But it's done so stylishly, and of course Arnie tones it
down with a one liner, that's it excusable.
The acting is variable. Arnie, of course, is useless, but he goes has some
good lines, and in the first twenty minutes, he even act's like a normal
bloke, not like some action hero. Stone, of course, is useless, making a
pretty poor wife, and a pretty poor action hero. But, she does sex scenes
alright. Ticoton (most recently seen in CON AIR), again, is OK, doing some
good action, but getting her emotions all wrong. One minute she hates
Quaid, the next she loves him, and she never gets this tranisition right.
So, the good guys are awful. But, the bad guy's are excellent. Cox is
basically reprising ROBOCOP, but he's still great in this, and he delivers
the best line in the whole film near the end. Ironside is superbly evil,
with an utterly emotionless face. The supporting cast are fine, and not
even the comedy sidekick (this time in the form of a taxi driver) is annoying.
One disappointing aspect, though, are the special effects. ILM and
Dreamquest do some good work (such as a subway station scene) but the model
work is not so good. Some of the model heads look appaling fake, and Quatto
is a major disappointment. Another irritating thing is the product
placement. There are a lot of plugs (and a  good Mars Today gag) However,
the sets look great, and the special effects at the end of the film aren't
too bad either. There's also a good soundtrack running through, by Jerry
Goldsmith (THE OMEN, POLTERGEIST, STAR TREK: THE MOTION PICTURE) 
Overall, then, TOTAL RECALL is a hugely violent, yet hugely enjoyable,
action fest, with a reasonable plot thrown in there too, some great bad
guys, and some imaganitive death. For a Schwarzenegger movie, this is not
bad at all. In fact, it's very good. 

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
The film Luc Besson had been wanting to make for ages is finally here.
And, its good fun! This film wa poorly recieved in America, with many
people saying that it was just 'rubbish.' But I found it enjoyable,
cheesy rubbish.  The film is knows it is cheesy, and never takes itself
seriously, which is what saves this film. If the film was serious the
whole way through, this would of been one of the worst films of 1997.
Willis plays a cab driver in the future, who is just driving along
until a young woman smashes through the roof. She turns out to be the
'fifth    element', who will save the earth from a planet heading
straight for it. However, they must stop Oldman from getting the her,
otherwise the whole world will be destroyed! Cheesy, eh?  But the film
makes up for its dreadful plot, with it sense of humour, and its very
good speacial    effects. Some of the effects are incredible. Willis
gives his usual 'John Maclane' performance, Oldman is just crazy, and
there is a D.J later on who did nothing but annoy me. But, generally,
the peformances are very good.
Overall, then, I found this film very enjoyable sci-fi hokum.
Recommended.

Title
Review for Serial Mom (1994)
Here we have another watered down John Waters film. While his earlier
films were, frankly, digusting (see Pink Flamingos) after Hairspray
(1987) his films generally toned down quite a bit. So although this
does have a few gross things in it, theres nothing here that will make
you physically sick.
Turner plays a mom who cares about her family. A lot. in fact, if you
say anything nasty about them, she'll probably kill you. So, a lot of
murders are going on in her town, and gradually the police narrow down
the murderer to her.
The films deaths are actually quite funny, and Turner gives a good
performance as the murderous mother. Also, the film isn't very long
(just over 90 mins) so it isn't one of those films that go on for
another 30 mins even though they've ran out of jokes. It is directed
well enough, and the supporting cast (which includes Ricki Lake) are
good.  In fact, it is the strengh of the cast that makes this film much
funnier than it really ought to be. Overall, enjoyable, trashy fun.

Title
Review for My Favorite Martian (1999)
Starring Jeff Daniels, Christopher Lloyd, Elizabeth Hurley and Darryl Hannah
Directed By Donald Petrie
Running Time: 1 hour 33 minutes
I love movies. I really do. Every time I watch great movies like Goodfellas
(1990) or Raiders of the Lost Ark (1981), a tear comes to my eye due to the
awesome talent, skill and entertainment that is on display. Even lower grade
films such as The Naked Gun 33 1/3 (1994) or Ghostbusters II (1988) while
not exactly brilliantly well made, are certainly not a waste of celluloid
and present entertainment value. Then there's My Favourite Martian, the
exact opposite of what a movie should be: a hurried, poorly written and
acted movie with one goal, to make money. Disney, ever since The Lion King
(1994) have lost their magic touch, but this dross just shows how far Disney
have sunk.
Christopher Lloyd plays a Martian who crash lands in front of T.V reporter's
Tim O'Hara car (Daniels), and soon Tim finds the Martian in his home, trying
to recover and fix his spaceship. Along with his 'Zoot' spacesuit, voiced by
Wayne Knight, must fix his spaceship before it explodes, and also try to
stop his identity being revealed to the public, firstly by O'Hara, but later
by rival T.V presenter Brace Channing (Hurley), by calling himself Tim's
'Uncle Martin.' 'Laughter' is supposed to arise from the 'comical' events,
but never does.
Many bad films have good intentions, but My Favourite Martian doesn't appear
to try to provide any entertainment. Filled to the brim with wham bang
special effects,  My Favourite Martian offers little more than some nice eye
candy. Christopher Lloyd mugs his way through the entire movie, I've never
seen a man pull a face for 93 minutes until now. Jeff Daniels plays 'staple
nice guy' and his role is useless. His performance is incredibly lazy,
although his paperthin character doesn't deserve more than the performance
he gives. Darryl Hannah looks as pretty as ever, but her role is somewhat,
erm, limited. Hurley mistakes 'acting' for 'shouting and looking like a
twit' and wins the David Wilcock award for 'Most Irritating, Godawful
Performance in a Moving Picture.' Way to go Liz! For the supporting cast,
Disney manage to assemble every character actor out there, during the film I
was going 'he was the guy in...ah..er...' before finally giving up and
switching off.
Another major setback is the staple 'comedy sidekick.' Unfortunately, the
writers (Sherri Stoner and Deanna Oliver, if anyone cares) forget that a
comedy sidekick needs to be 'funny.' Instead, they deliver Zoot, the
Martians deeply unfunny sidekick. Although meant to be a manic character no
doubt, every line that comes out of his 'neck' is a dud. A real dud. Citizen
Kane delivers more laughs a minute than his hell spawn piece of polyester.
Even the kids in the audience were insulted by this character: not one child
even bothered to smirk. It's a nice special effect, though.
Another problems with this comedy are the gags themselves. Or rather, the
lack of them. My Favourite Martian reaches a new level of toilet humour: it
goes past the bowl, down the pipe and into the sewer. Now, toilet humour can
be funny, as Dumb and Dumber (1994) humorously showed. But here, characters
farting, belching and almost getting crapped on (literally) is not
'amusing.' It's insulting. There's one good gag right before the credits,
but it appears the guy who wrote that gag tragically died and his unfunny
twin continued. Either that, or they were hoping that easy to please six
year olds wouldn't mind the fact that his movie is beaten by Men At Work in
the funny stakes. Yes, Men At Work. Yowza!
The fact that a lot of money was pumped into this film, and that they
actually got people to agree to be in this film just depresses me even more.
There are thousands of brilliant films out there that can't get
distribution, yet trash like this gets released nation-wide with ease.
Thankfully, as soon as it makes it's money, it will never be seen again, and
My Favourite Martian will end up where the two lead characters do near the
end of the movie: down the toilet.

Title
Review for Mask of Zorro, The (1998)
Starring Antonio Banderas and Sir Anthony Hopkins.
Directed By Martin Campbell.
Running Time: 2 hours 15 minutes
Swashbuckling adventure that can be enjoyed by both children and adults.
Steven Spielberg may not have directed (he only executive produced) but his
touch certainly is evident in this movie. And he knows a money making winner
when he sees one. The Mask of Zorro has the hallmarks of a blockbuster: big
action, funny comedy, and the pacing of a rollercoaster. Hopkins plays Don
Diego de la Vega, otherwise known as Zorro. A fighter for the people, he is
eventually captured by Don Rafael Montero (Stuart Wilson), who also,
unintentionally, kills his wife. The film cuts to twenty years later, where
Vega still wants to Montero dead. However, he's far too old now, and trains
up thief Alejandro Murrieta (Banderas) to become the new Zorro. Banderas
motive? To avenge the death of his brother, who was killed at the hands of
Captain Love (Matthew Letscher) who rather tastefully keeps the head in a
jar, in one of the more graphic scenes in this family movie.
With the scene set, the movie goes on full blast, with sword fights a-plenty
and witty one liners. Banderas and Hopkins have a marvellous chemistry as
the two Zorro's, playing each other off with ease. Hopkins seems to come off
a little better, but Banderas does some excellent work. As the bad guys,
Wilson and Letscher seem one dimensional, but they go through the bad guy
shtick in an above average way. The audience does hate them, which can't be
bad. Catherine Zeta-Jones also pops up as Hopkins daughter, and although she
provides little more than the usual female lead, she delivers a charming,
but one note, performance. The chemistry is excellent between Banderas and
Jones. There's a delightful little scene where Banderas and Jones have a
sword fight, and every swipe an item of clothing gets slashed, until Jones
clothes fall off all together.
The director, fresh from the enjoyable GoldenEye (1995) handles the film
perfectly. The action is well done and fast paced, the comedy put across
well. The cast help a lot, but the direction is still outstanding. Although
the film is very long, the plot keeps chugging along, and there's barely a
dull moment. However, the film is a little over indulgent, and it could have
been trimmed. It manages to hold the attention, thankfully, and the
adventure and charm holds right up to the last reel.
Screenwriters John Eskow, Ted Elliot and Terry Rosio have unfortunately
written an cliched and one dimensional script. Although they've bought Zorro
up to date with big explosions and wild action, the plot itself is barely
existent. There's lots of little sub plots hanging around, but there's
nothing substantial to bring them all together. The main story seems to be
the fact that Rafael wants to 'buy' California using gold stolen from the
guy he's buying the land off. This sets up for a Temple of Doom type plot
where we see peasants slave driven into getting the gold from little mines.
However, this doesn't seem to appear until nearly over a hour into the film,
so the film is never quite sure where it's going.
In the end however, Zorro provides action and comedy in spades. It suitable
for everyone, so put the guilt behind, and put some more money into
Spielbergs bank account. You won't regret it.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
